Not the End of the World
Hannah Ritchie

2024 

Contents
Cover
Title Page
Copyright
Dedication
Introduction
1 Sustainability: A tale of two halves
2 Air Pollution: Breathing clean air
3 Climate Change: Turning down the thermostat
4 Deforestation: Seeing the wood for the trees
5 Food: How not to eat the planet
6 Biodiversity Loss: Protecting the world’s wildlife
7 Ocean Plastics: Drowning in waste
8 Overfishing: Pillaging the oceans
Conclusion
Acknowledgments
Discover More
Endnotes
About the Author
For my parents, the perfect mix of heart and mind
Explore book giveaways, sneak peeks, deals, and more.

Tap here to learn more.

Introduction
It has become common to tell kids that they’re going to die from climate
change. If a heatwave doesn’t get them then a wildfire will. Or a hurricane,
a flood, or mass starvation. Incredibly, many of us hardly blink before
telling our children this story. It shouldn’t, then, come as a surprise that
most young people think their future is in peril. There is an intense feeling
of anxiety and dread about what the planet has in store for us.

I see this daily in the emails that land in my inbox. But it’s also reflected
in research from across the world.1 A recent global survey asked 100,000
16- to 25-year-olds about their attitudes to climate change.2 More than
three-quarters thought the future was frightening, and more than half said
‘humanity was doomed’. The feelings of pessimism were widespread, from
the UK and US to India and Nigeria. Regardless of wealth or security,
young people the world over feel like they’re hanging on for dear life.

In the same survey, two in five were hesitant to have children. In a 2020
poll of American adults (of all ages) without children, 11% said climate
change was a ‘major reason’ for not having them, and 15% more said it was
a ‘minor reason’.3
In younger adults, aged 18 to 34, the share was even
higher. One respondent said she felt ‘like I can’t in good conscience bring a
child into this world and force them to try to survive what may be
apocalyptic conditions’.

4 Of those surveyed, 6% said they regretted having
children because they felt despair about their future in a changing climate.

It’s tempting to dismiss these views as empty words. But a recent study,
not looking at surveys but actual data on people’s reproductive decisions,
suggests non-environmentalists are 60% more likely to have children than
committed ones.5 Of course, this may not be the only reason
environmentalists are less likely to have children, but it gives us some
concrete evidence that when people say they’re anxious about having kids,
they’re not bluffing. If people aren’t bluffing about their hesitation to have
kids, they’re probably not bluffing about their feelings of doom and anxiety
either.

Closer to home, I know these feelings are real, because I’ve been there. I
too used to be convinced that I didn’t have a future left to live for.

How to turn the world upside down
I spend most of my time thinking about the world’s environmental
problems. It’s my job and my passion, but I nearly gave up on it.

In 2010 I started my degree in Environmental Geoscience at the
University of Edinburgh. I showed up as a fresh-faced 16-year-old, ready to
learn how we were going to fix some of the world’s biggest challenges.

Four years later, I left with no solutions. Instead, I felt the deadweight of
endless unsolvable problems. Each day at Edinburgh was a constant
reminder of how humanity was ravaging the planet. Global warming, sealevel rise, ocean acidification, dead coral reefs, starving polar bears,
deforestation, acid rain, air pollution, overfishing, oil spills and the
annihilation of the world’s ecosystems. I don’t remember hearing about a
single positive trend.

During my time at university, I made a conscious effort to keep up with
the news. I needed to be informed about the state of the world. Everywhere
were images of natural disasters, droughts and hungry faces. More people
seemed to be dying than ever before, more were living in poverty, and more
children were starving than at any time in history. I believed I was living
through humanity’s most tragic period.

Many young people think the world is doomed due to climate change
Share of young people, aged 16 to 25 years old, who agreed with the following statements about our
future due to climate change.

As will be seen, all of these assumptions were wrong. In fact, in nearly
every case the world was moving in the opposite direction. You might think
such basic misconceptions would be squashed during a four-year stint at a
world-leading university. They weren’t. If anything, they became even more
ingrained, the shame of our ecological sins getting heavier with every
lecture.

Those years made me feel helpless. Despite working relentlessly to get
my degree, I was ready to turn my back on my obsession and find a new
career path. I started applying for jobs far away from environmental
science. Then, one evening, everything changed. I saw bubbles darting
across the television screen. A small man was chasing after them.

‘In my lifetime former colonies gained independence and finally they
started to get healthier, and healthier and healthier. Now here they come!
Countries in Asia and Latin America start to catch up with the Western
countries.’ The bubbles were red and green and superimposed on a graph
that looked almost holographic. The man started waving his arms around,
pushing and then dragging the bubbles across the screen. His excitement
made it hard to pin down his accent but I thought he might be Swedish.

‘And here Africa comes!’ he shouted.

The man was Hans Rosling. If you know of him already, you can
probably remember the first time you were introduced. If you don’t, I’m a
bit jealous: you still have the chance to discover his magic for the first time.

Rosling was a Swedish physician, statistician and public speaker. A review
of his work in Nature captures him well: ‘Three minutes with Hans Rosling
will change your mind about the world.’6
 It changed mine.

You see, my understanding of the world was wrong. Not just slightly
wrong. I’d assumed everything was getting worse. Yet here was Rosling,
leaping across the stage, showing me facts rooted in solid data. He was
telling me that I had it all the wrong way round. But he did it in a way that
meant I didn’t feel like an idiot. I was supposed to get it all wrong.

Everyone does. This became his main act. He would get crowds of
intellectuals, business leaders, scientists, and even global health experts at
TED, Google or the World Bank, and he’d show them that they were
completely ignorant of the most basic facts about the world. And they’d
love it! Watch his videos and you can hear the audience laughing at their
own ignorance. He had a generosity as a teacher that is impossible to
replicate.

In his lectures, Rosling explained what the data really told us about the
most important metrics of human well-being: the percentage of people
living in extreme poverty, the number of children dying, how many girls did
or didn’t get to go to school, and what percentage of children are vaccinated
against diseases. We almost never step back to look at the data on these
changes in global development. Instead, we watch the daily news and those
headlines become part of our world view. But doing this doesn’t work. The
news is designed to tell us, well, something new – an individual story, a rare
event, the latest disaster. Because we see them in the news so often,
unlikely events seem like probable ones. But they’re often not. That’s why
they make the news and why they capture our attention.

These individual events and stories are important. They serve a purpose.

But it’s a terrible way to understand the bigger picture. Many changes that
do profoundly shape the world are not rare, exciting or headline-grabbing.

They are persistent things that happen day by day and year by year until
decades pass and the world has been altered beyond recognition.

The only way to really see these changes is to step back and look at the
long-run data. This is what Hans Rosling did for social problems. The same
is true for our environmental ones. I’ve been researching, writing and
shouting about these trends for almost a decade now. I’m Head of Research
at Our World in Data, where we do this for every single one of the world’s
big problems – from poverty and health to war and climate change. I’m also
a misfit scientist at the University of Oxford. We’re ‘misfits’ because we do
the opposite of what people expect academics to do. Researchers tend to
zoom into a problem, to get as close as possible and pick it apart. We zoom
out.

My job is not to do original studies, or to make scientific breakthroughs.

It’s to understand what we already know. Or could know if we studied the
information we have properly. Then explain it to people: in articles, on the
radio, on TV, and in government offices so they can use it to move us
forward.

Just as Hans Rosling showed that news headlines don’t teach us much
about global poverty, education or health, I’ve found that trying to build an
environmental world view based on the latest wildfire or hurricane is no
good. Trying to understand the world’s energy system and how to fix it
from the latest breaking story won’t get us anywhere.

If we want clarity we have to take in the full picture, and that means
giving ourselves some distance. If we take several steps back, we can see
something truly radical, game-changing and life-giving: humanity is in a
truly unique position to build a sustainable world.

Why doomsday thinking is so damaging
‘We need people to wake up. We need people to start paying attention!’
People often say that is why the apocalyptic environmental story needs to
be shared far and wide. Or, as they argue, the apocalyptic truth. I get it. On
many environmental issues, we’ve been sleepwalking for a long time.

We’ve pushed action further and further into the future – happy to do so
because it can take decades or more for environmental impacts to hit us.

Except the decades have passed and now we are here. The impacts have
arrived: it’s already happening.

To get this out of the way, let me make one thing absolutely clear: I’m
no climate change denialist or minimiser. I spend my life – inside and
outside work – researching, writing and trying to understand our
environmental problems and how to solve them. The world has lacked
urgency to act. Bringing attention to the magnitude of potential impacts is
essential if we want things to change. But that is a long way from telling
kids they’re ruined.

Let’s, for now, say that total doom is an exaggeration. Does that really
do harm? If it makes people take these issues seriously, that can only be a
good thing, surely, and the exaggeration simply acts as a counterbalance to
those who underplay the issue. But I’m convinced that there is a better,
more optimistic and honest way forward.

There are several reasons why I think these doomsday messages do
more harm than good. First, the doom narratives are often untrue. I don’t
expect you to believe me on that straight away, but I hope that by the end of
the book I will have convinced you that while these problems are big and
pressing, they are solvable. We will have a future. By ‘we’ I mean us,
collectively, as a species. Yes, many people could be severely impacted, or
even have that future taken away from them, so it’s up to us to decide how
many people, based on the actions we take. If you believe people have the
right to the truth, then you should be against these exaggerated doomsday
stories.

Second, it makes scientists look like idiots. Every doomsday activist that
makes a big, bold claim invariably turns out to be wrong. Every time this
happens it chisels another bit of public trust away from scientists. It plays
right into the hands of deniers. When the world doesn’t end in 10 years,
deniers turn around and say, ‘Hey, look, the crazy scientists got it wrong
again. Why should anyone listen to them?’ In nearly every chapter of this
book I’ll list doomsday claims that turned out to be completely untrue.

Third, and perhaps most importantly, our impending doom leaves us
feeling paralysed. If we’re already screwed, then what’s the point in trying?
Far from making us more effective in driving change, it robs us of any
motivation to do so. I recognise this from my own dark period when I
nearly walked away from the field entirely. I can assure you that after
reframing how I saw the world, I have had a much, much bigger impact on
changing things. When it comes down to it, doomsday attitudes are often no
better than denial.

This option of ‘giving up’ is only possible from a place of privilege.

Let’s say we stop trying and temperatures climb by another degree or two,
taking us well past our climate targets. If you live in a wealthy country,
you’ll probably be okay. It won’t be plain sailing, but you can buy your way
out of serious danger. That’s not true for many less fortunate people,
though. Those in poorer countries cannot afford to protect themselves.

Accepting defeat on climate change is an indefensibly selfish position to
take.

Climate scientists are not accepting defeat. Most climate scientists I
know have children. They spend every day studying and thinking about
climate change. Yet they’re obviously not resigned to the idea that we will
face a climate apocalypse in the next century. They think there is still time
to ensure a liveable future for their children. As Dr Kate Marvel, a climate
scientist at NASA, puts it: ‘I unequivocally reject, scientifically and
personally, the notion that children are somehow doomed to an unhappy
life.’7
It’s not that they don’t think the impacts of climate change are worrying.

If they didn’t, they wouldn’t be working on them. They also don’t think the
world is doing enough to tackle it – they’ve been begging people to act for
decades. Nearly every one of them will say that we are moving too slowly,
and if we don’t get our act together, things could get very bad. Why, then,
are they optimistic that we can still do something? There are several
possible reasons. One is that there has been a miscommunication about
what our climate targets – of 1.5°C and 2°C – actually mean. It is wrong to
think of these as thresholds – that as soon as we pass 1.5°C, we’re toast.

That’s not true. There is nothing special about the number 1.5°C; it’s not
that things are liveable at 1.499°C and as soon as we hit 1.501°C the planet
becomes unbearable. There is a significant increase in the risk of tipping
points and non-linear climate impacts once we start to get into the 1.5°C–
2°C range. But that doesn’t make 1.5°C an all-or-nothing threshold. In fact,
it makes every 0.1°C even more important once we start to move into that
zone. The difference is that many climate scientists view these numbers as
targets. It would be incredible to meet them, but we need to keep going
even if we don’t.

This might seem like a pedantic point, but it’s an important one. The
reality is that we’re almost certainly going to pass 1.5°C. Most climate
scientists expect that. So, if people view it as an end-of-the-world threshold
then of course it’s going to feel apocalyptic.

Another reason some climate scientists are less pessimistic is that they
believe that things can change. The last few decades have been an uphill
battle for them. They’ve been mostly ignored. Often they were the ones
framed as apocalyptic scaremongers. But, finally, the world has woken up
to the reality of climate change, and people are taking action. The climate
scientists know change is possible because they’ve seen it happen. Against
the odds, they’ve driven much of it.

The world needs more urgent optimism
I used to think optimists were naive and pessimists were smart. Pessimism
seemed like an essential feature of a scientist: the basis of science is to
challenge every result, to pick theories apart to see which ones stand up. I
thought cynicism was one of its founding principles.

Maybe there is some truth to that. But science is inherently optimistic
too. How else would we describe the willingness to try experiments over
and over, often with slim odds of success? Scientific progress can be
frustratingly slow: the best minds can dedicate their entire lives to a single
question and come away with nothing. They do so with the hope that a
breakthrough might be round the corner. It’s unlikely they will be the person
to discover it, but there’s a chance. Those odds drop to zero if they give up.

Nevertheless, pessimism still sounds intelligent and optimism dumb. I
often feel embarrassed to admit that I’m an optimist. I imagine it knocks me
down a peg or two in people’s estimations. But the world desperately needs
more optimism. The problem is that people mistake optimism for ‘blind
optimism’, the unfounded faith that things will just get better. Blind
optimism really is dumb. And dangerous. If we sit back and do nothing,
things will not turn out fine. That’s not the kind of optimism that I’m
talking about.

Optimism is seeing challenges as opportunities to make progress; it’s
having the confidence that there are things we can do to make a difference.

We can shape the future, and we can build a great one if we want to. The
economist Paul Romer makes this distinction nicely.

8 He separates
‘complacent optimism’ from ‘conditional optimism’:
Complacent optimism is the feeling of a child waiting for presents.

Conditional optimism is the feeling of a child who is thinking about
building a treehouse. ‘If I get some wood and nails and persuade
some other kids to help do the work, we can end up with something
really cool.’
I’ve heard various other terms for this ‘conditional’ or effective optimism:
‘urgent optimism’, ‘pragmatic optimism’, ‘realistic optimism’, ‘impatient
optimism’. All these terms are grounded in inspiration and action.

The reason pessimists often sound smart is that they can avoid being
‘wrong’ by moving the goalposts. When a doomer predicts that the world
will end in five years, and it doesn’t, they just move the date. The American
biologist Paul R. Ehrlich1 – author of the 1968 book The Population Bomb
– has been doing this for decades.9
In 1970 he said that ‘sometime in the
next 15 years, the end will come. And by “the end” I mean an utter
breakdown of the capacity of the planet to support humanity.’ Of course,
that was woefully wrong. He had another go: he said that ‘England will not
exist in the year 2000’. Wrong again. Ehrlich will keep pushing this
deadline back. A pessimistic stance is a safe one.

Don’t mistake criticism for pessimism. Criticism is essential for an
effective optimist. We need to work through ideas to find the most
promising ones. Most innovators that have changed the world have been
optimists, even if they didn’t identify as one. But they were also fiercely
critical: no one picks apart the ideas of Thomas Edison, Alexander Fleming,
Marie Curie or Norman Borlaug more than they did themselves.

If we want to get serious about tackling the world’s environmental
problems, we need to be more optimistic. We need to believe that it is
possible to tackle them. As we’ll see in the chapters that follow, this is not a
pipe dream: things are changing, and we should be impatient about
changing them faster.

We can be the first generation to achieve a sustainable world
The Last Generation is an activist group in Germany, the name implying
that our unsustainability will push us to extinction. To force their
government into action, some of the group recently went on a month-long
hunger strike. It wasn’t a half-hearted effort: several ended up in hospital.

They’re not the only ones who feel this way. The global environmental
group Extinction Rebellion is also founded on this principle. And the survey
results earlier show that the notion of us being the ‘last generation’ isn’t far
from the minds of many young people.

But I’d like to take the opposite framing. I don’t think we’re going to be
the last generation. The evidence points to the opposite. I think we could be
the first generation. We have the opportunity to be the first generation that
leaves the environment in a better state than we found it. The first
generation in human history to achieve sustainability. (Yes, that seems hard
to believe. Stay with me and I’ll explain why.) Here I’m using the term
‘generation’ loosely. I am from a generation that will be defined by our
environmental problems. I was a child when climate change really came on
the radar. Most of my adulthood will be spent in the midst of the major
energy transition. I will see countries move from being almost entirely
dependent on fossil fuels to being free of them. I will be 57 when
governments hit the ‘2050 deadline’ of reaching net-zero carbon emissions
that so many have promised. In writing this book, I feel like I am
representing a generation of young people that want to see the world
change.

But, of course, there will be several generations involved in this project.

There are a couple above me – my parents and grandparents – and a couple
below me, my future children (and perhaps grandchildren). Generations are
often pitted against each other: older generations are blamed for ruining the
planet; younger generations are framed as hysterical and indignant. When it
comes down to it, though, most of us want to build a better world, where
our children and grandchildren can thrive. And we all need to work together
to achieve that. All of us will be involved in this transformation.

In Not the End of the World, I’ll explain why I think we can be the first
to achieve sustainability. I’ll explore each of our environmental problems
one by one, looking at its history, where we are today, and how we might
lay out a path to a better future. Most chapters will open with a flashy – and
damaging – headline that you might have seen before. I’ll explain why each
of them is wrong. We are overwhelmed with information about what we
shouldn’t be doing when it comes to the health of our planet. I’ll pull out
the big things that are really making a difference and which we should all
focus on, and the things we should all stress less about.

We will start high up in the atmosphere and travel downwards,
encountering the seven biggest environmental crises we must solve if we
are to achieve sustainability. We’ll look at air pollution first, followed by
climate change. Then we’ll move to ground level, covering deforestation,
food and the life of other species on land. Next, we’ll dip underwater,
looking at ocean plastics, before finally plunging deep to explore the state
of our world’s fish.

Our environmental problems overlap. What we eat matters for climate
change, deforestation and the health of other species on our planet. If we eat
more food from farms on land, we put less pressure on fish in our oceans.

Burning fossil fuels doesn’t just drive climate change, it pollutes our air and
damages our health. No environmental problem stands in isolation. I hope
by the time you finish this book you will have a clearer understanding of
this interconnectedness, the way some of the most important solutions at
our disposal help address several problems at once – and just how valuable
this is to our future.

Six things to keep in mind
The issues we’ll explore are complex. They’re uncomfortable. And,
unfortunately, some of the arguments or data I put forward can be abused in
the wrong hands. Here are six points to keep in mind as you read.

(1) We face big and important environmental challenges
Surprisingly, on many environmental issues, some trends are moving in the
right direction. In irresponsible hands, positive trends are often framed as
‘see, relax, it’s not a problem after all’.

This is not my position. The environmental challenges we face are
massive. If we don’t tackle them, the consequences will be devastating and
cruelly unequal. We must act. It must be large-scale. And so much quicker
than we have done before.

(2) The fact that our environmental issues aren’t humanity’s largest
existential risk doesn’t mean we shouldn’t work on them
I don’t think climate change – or any other environmental problem – is
going to wipe us out as a species. Risks that are much more likely to be
existential are nuclear war, a global pandemic or artificial intelligence.

Some have used this as an argument to focus less on climate change: ‘Why
are people working on that when they should be focused on dangerous
pathogens or the threats of nuclear war?’
That’s an odd way to think about it. There are eight billion of us – we
can work on more than one or two problems at the same time. We might
even argue that climate change increases the risk of some of these
existential threats. Reduce the damage from climate change and we reduce
other risks too.

Also, since when did a problem have to be existential for it to be serious
enough to work on? The risks from environmental damage are severe:
they’re large enough to impact billions of people. And for much of the
human population, it really is an existential risk.

(3) You will have to hold multiple thoughts at the same time
Doing this is essential if we’re to see the world clearly and develop
solutions that really make a difference. Things getting better does not mean
our job is done.

As an example: since 1990 the number of children dying every year has
more than halved. That is a tremendous achievement. But share this
important fact online and you’ll often get this response: ‘Oh, so you think
it’s fine that 5 million children die every year?’ Of course not. That fact is
one of the worst things about our world. But the two facts do not contradict
each other. We have made impressive progress, but we still have a long way
to go. As my colleague Max Roser puts it: ‘The world is much better; the
world is still awful; the world can do much better.’10 All three statements
are true.

By denying the first – that we have made progress – we lose out on
important lessons about how we keep moving forward. Denying this fact
also robs us of the inspiration that change is possible.

If I have to caveat every positive trend with ‘but I’m not saying that
everything is perfect’ then this book is going to be an exhausting and
repetitive read. Just assume this is always the case. When I say things are
improving, I am not saying they are fine as they are.

(4) None of this is inevitable, but it is possible
Alongside the history, and story of where we are today, I will propose a path
forward. My suggestions are never predictions, they are possibilities.

That’s an important distinction. I don’t know what’s going to happen in
the future. It depends on how quickly we act, and whether we make good
decisions. All I can do is lay out what I think our best options are.

Hopefully this book will play a small role in inspiring us to take them.

(5) We cannot afford to be complacent
The complacency trap is never far away. It’s easy to take our foot off the
pedal or to be led off course as new and short-term problems arise. We can’t
let this happen.

When Russia invaded Ukraine in 2022, many countries turned their back
on Russian energy supplies, the price of energy rocketed and the global
economy was shaken. Countries clambered to find other sources of energy,
and some turned to coal, restarting their old plants.

This was a disappointing backslide on climate action. But it looks like it
was a temporary one. After some months of higher CO2 emissions,
Europe’s coal consumption has fallen again and its transition to renewables
is as fast as ever. Russia’s invasion of Ukraine has given governments even
more reason to ditch fossil fuels and invest in low-carbon energy that they
can control.

There are two important lessons here. The first is that, on our journey to
a sustainable world, there will be blips along the way. Events that force us
to stall, or maybe even regress, on fixing our environmental problems. We
should expect this, and not panic when it happens. Where we end up is
determined by what we do over the next few decades, not the next three
months.

The second is that we need to develop systems that are resilient to world
events that might throw us off course. When our economies run on fossil
fuels, we’re at the mercy of those that produce them.

(6) You are not alone in this
I wish I could reach back to my younger self and hug her. For a long time, I
felt alone in trying to grapple with these problems. The headwind got
stronger and stronger.

If you currently feel this way, this book is me reaching out to you. To
show you that you are not alone in this journey: there are many people who
are working to build a better future. Some of them you see in the limelight.

But most of them you don’t: they are fighting in boardrooms to change
company strategies; they are in governments trying to shape policies; they
are engineering solar panels, turbines and batteries in labs; or they are in the
field creating sustainable ways to grow food.

Look around and you will find people at all levels – from individuals in
their local community to world leaders making consequential decisions –
pushing into the headwind. Many are concerned but determined. Optimistic
that what they do today will make a difference tomorrow.

When I started writing this book, I printed out a picture of my younger self
and hung it next to my computer. This is the book that I needed a decade
ago. It is a synthesis of nearly a decade of research and data that allowed
me to see our environmental problems more clearly and gave me the
perspective that helped me dig myself out of a very dark place. If you’re
currently there, I hope it gives you a way out too.

Footnote
i Paul R. Ehrlich is an American biologist. He’s not to be confused with Paul Ehrlich, the German
physician who won the Nobel Prize for his contributions to immunology. The latter invented the cure
for syphilis in the early 20th century, and saved many lives as a result. The same cannot be said for
Paul R. Ehrlich.

1
Sustainability
A tale of two halves
The world has never been sustainable
Before we start our tour of environmental problems, I need to let you in on
an unpopular truth: the world has never been sustainable. What we want to
achieve has never been done before. To understand why, we need to look at
what sustainability means.

The classic definition of sustainability came out of a landmark report
from the United Nations. In 1987, the UN defined sustainable development
as ‘meeting the needs of the present without compromising the ability of
future generations to meet their own needs’. That definition has two halves.

The first is making sure that everyone in the world today – the present
generations – can live a good and healthy life. The second half is about
making sure that we live in a way that doesn’t degrade the environment for
future generations. We shouldn’t create environmental damage that takes
the opportunity of a good and healthy life away from our great-greatgrandchildren.

This perspective is not without its controversy. Some definitions of
sustainability only focus on the environmental component. The Oxford
English Dictionary describes sustainability as ‘the property of being
environmentally sustainable; the degree to which a process or enterprise is
able to be maintained or continued while avoiding the long-term depletion
of natural resources’. That is a fancy way of saying: ‘make sure that what
you’re doing today does not damage the environment for tomorrow’. In
some definitions there’s no requirement for humans to meet their own needs
at the same time. As an environmentalist, I also put most of my focus on the
second half: limiting the damage to our planet. But on a moral level, I
cannot ignore the first half of the equation. A world full of avoidable human
suffering does not meet our definition of sustainability.

A lot of the controversy about these definitions is because we assume
there is an unavoidable trade-off between the first and second half. It’s
human well-being or environmental protection. That means one must be
prioritised over the other, and for ‘sustainability’ it’s the environment that
wins. This trade-off existed in the past. But the central argument throughout
this book is that this conflict does not have to exist in our future. There are
ways to achieve both at the same time, which means there should
increasingly be less conflict between the definitions. So, if you still want to
adopt an environment-only definition, then think of human flourishing as a
nice add-on.

The world has never been sustainable because we’ve never achieved
both halves at the same time. If we only focus on the second half, it might
seem like the world has become unsustainable in the very recent past, when
carbon emissions, energy use and overfishing accelerated. We think that the
world used to be sustainable, but our environmental damage has kicked
things out of balance. That’s the wrong conclusion. For thousands of years –
more so since the agricultural revolution, but also before then – humans
haven’t been environmentally sustainable. Our ancestors hunted hundreds
of the largest animals to extinction, polluted the air from burning wood,
crop wastes and charcoal, and cut down huge amounts of forest for energy
and farmland.1 –3
It’s true that there have been periods or communities that have achieved
a harmonious balance with other species and the environment around them.

Many indigenous groups have managed this, as well as being protective of
biodiversity and the ecosystems.4, 5 Respect for the Earth lies at the heart of
indigenous principles. As the Native American proverb goes: ‘Take only
what you need and leave the land as you found it.’ Similarly, the ancient
Kenyan proverb: ‘Treat the Earth well: it was not given to you by your
parents, it was loaned to you by your children.’ Our understanding of
sustainability starts there. The modern definitions are academic and uptight
versions of these beautiful proverbs.

But communities that achieved environmental sustainability were
always small, and that’s because rates of child mortality were high: losing
children stopped the population from growing.

A world in which half of all children die is not meeting ‘the needs of the
present generations’ and is therefore not a sustainable one.

That’s the challenge we face. We need to make sure that everyone in the
world can live a good life and we need to reduce our environmental impacts
so that future generations can flourish too. That puts us in uncharted
territory. No previous generation had the knowledge, technology, political
systems, or international cooperation to do both at the same time. We have
the opportunity to be the first generation that achieves sustainability. Let’s
take it.

There is no better time to be alive than today
Having thought I was living through humanity’s most tragic period, I now
believe I’m living through its best. There has never been a better time to be
alive. If someone had told me that eight years ago, I would have scoffed. In
fact, when I heard Hans Rosling say it on-screen for the first time, I nearly
stopped watching. What planet was he living on?
But it’s true. And I hope that looking at the data and progress of seven
key measures of well-being will help change your mind.

(1) Child mortality
Stopping children from dying has been humanity’s greatest achievement.

The majority of us think there’s a natural order to death: it’s the old not the
young that die. But this sequence is a very recent development. The
prospect that a child would outlive its parents is not a ‘natural’ occurrence
at all: it’s something that we’ve had to fight hard for.

For most of human history, your odds of living to adulthood were 50–
50. Around a quarter of children would die before their first birthday, and
another quarter died before they reached puberty.

6 There was no exception
to this. Children dying was commonplace, regardless of continent or
century.

7 Even the elite couldn’t buy their children a path to adulthood. The
Roman emperor Marcus Aurelius had fourteen children. Nine of them died
before he did. Charles Darwin lost three of his children. This rate was also
found in hunter-gatherer societies. Researchers looking at mortality rates
across 20 different studies in modern hunter-gatherers and archaeological
records found that at least a quarter died in infancy, and half died before
reaching puberty.

8
Until the last few centuries, there was almost no way for us to stop
children from dying. It wasn’t until the rise of clean water, proper sanitary
conditions, vaccines, better nutrition and other advances in health care that
rates of child mortality started to plummet. As recently as 1800, about 43%
of the world’s children died before reaching their fifth birthday.

9 Today that
figure is 4% – still woefully high, but more than 10-fold lower.

Stopping children from dying is a very recent achievement
The global child mortality rate, which is the share of newborns that die before reaching their 5th
birthday.

It would be wrong to think that this has only happened in rich countries.

Every single country has made massive progress in the last fifty years. In
1950s Mali, 43% of newborns would die before reaching the age of five.

Now, 10% do. India and Bangladesh have both reduced child mortality
from around one in three to less than one in 30.

It’s not just the share that is falling; the number of children dying is too.

The year I was born – 1993 – almost 12 million children under the age of
five died. Since then, this number has more than halved. We still have a lot
of work to do – five million children dying every year is a tragedy – but we
have achieved the unthinkable: our ancestors could never have imagined a
world where the death of a child was so rare.

(2) Mothers dying
When my mum went through a complicated birth with my brother, she was
told by my great-grandmother: ‘If it had been back in my day, dear, you
would have just died.’ In just a few generations we’ve made pregnancy tens
– in some countries, hundreds – of times safer.

10
My mum’s odds of dying in childbirth were around 1 in 10,000.i My
grandmother’s odds were more than twice as high. My great-grandmother’s
were a staggering 30 times higher. In most countries today, the chances that
a woman will die from causes related to pregnancy are very low.

Mothers dying: maternal mortality rates have plummeted in recent centuries
The number of women who die from pregnancy-related causes per 100,000 live births.

(3) Life expectancy
Until the 19th century, the average life expectancy at birth in the UK was
between 30 and 40 years.11 Even by the turn of the 20th century, it was just
50 years. By the middle of the century, it was 70 years. In 2019, the average
life expectancy was over 80 years old. Within 200 years, life expectancy
has doubled.ii And this improvement is not ‘just’ because we’ve managed to
reduce child mortality. It has improved at all ages.

Again, this progress has been seen across the world. Globally, average
life expectancy has increased from around 30 to more than 70 since the start
of the 20th century. In the poorest countries too, life expectancy has
improved substantially. In Kenya, Ethiopia and Gabon, it’s 67 years. The
average across sub-Saharan Africa as a whole is 63 years.

People are living longer across all regions of the world
Life expectancy at birth is the average number of years a newborn would live to if age-specific death
rates stayed at their current level.

(4) Hunger and malnutrition
For most of human history, every day for our ancestors was a fight to feed
the family. Crop yields were low and supply was tight. One bad season – a
drought, a flood or a pest invasion – and everyone could be left starving.

Food insecurity and famine were common. It’s possible that prior to the
agricultural transition, many tribes and communities had ample nutrition.

We just don’t know. What we do know is that after the advent of farming,
and as small groups grew into villages, food supplies were unpredictable.

There were more mouths to feed, less scope for travelling to find supplies,
and yields from the fields were often at the mercy of the seasonal weather.

It seemed like there was no way of preventing famine and hunger. This all
changed in the last decades of the 20th century. Despite several devastating
famines, technological advances in agriculture made it much more
productive and allowed people to break free from a subsistence lifestyle.

In the 1970s, around 35% of people in developing countries did not get
enough calories to eat. By 2015, this had fallen by almost two-thirds to just
13%. Many still face huge problems. In 2021, around 770 million people in
the world – almost one in 10 – did not get enough food.12 But it doesn’t
have to be this way. The world now produces far, far more food than it
needs. Many countries have come close to eradicating hunger. We need to
make sure that every country can do the same.

(5) Access to basic resources: clean water, energy, sanitation
For most of human history, we’d take water from the river, a stream or lake,
and it was a lucky draw as to whether it was clean or not. Disease was rife.

Children died from diarrhoeal diseases and infection – many in poor
countries still do. Getting access to clean water sources, sanitation and
hygiene has saved tens of millions of lives every year, if not more.

In 2020, 75% had access to a water source that was clean and safe – up
from just 60% in the year 2000
13 – and 90% of the world had access to
electricity.

14 Some might see electricity as a luxury – an unnecessary drain
on natural resources – but it has become essential for a healthy and
productive life. We need it to keep vaccines and medicines cold; to keep our
hospital machines running; to cook our food and wash our clothes without
spending all day doing chores; to keep our food cool and contaminationfree; to power lights for children to study at night; and to keep our streets
safe.

Progress is slower when it comes to sanitation and access to clean
cooking fuels: just 54% have a safe toilet, and just 60% have clean fuels.

We must ensure access to these resources, but regardless of what metric
we’re looking at, the trend is consistently upward. Every day, 300,000
people get access to electricity and a similar number get clean water, for the
first time. This has been the case every day for a decade.

(6) Education
I know how lucky I was to have the chance to finish school. Especially as a
girl. In the Western world, more of us should appreciate how fortunate we
are to be in that position. The world we are building, with better health care,
technology, connectivity and groundbreaking innovations, rests on the
power of education and learning.

In 1820, just 10% of adults in the world had basic reading skills.15 This
changed rapidly over the 20th century. By 1950, more adults in the world
could read than couldn’t. Today, we’re closing in on 90%.

In his 2014 TED Talk, one question that had Hans Rosling’s audience
stumped was ‘In all low-income countries across the world today, how
many girls finish primary school?’ Most people thought the answer was
20%. The correct answer was 60%. By 2020, this figure had increased to
64%. The share of boys in low-income countries that complete primary
school was higher, at 69%. In most countries – even many of the poorest –
it’s more likely than not that a girl will finish primary school and get a basic
education.iii
(7) Extreme poverty
Everyone in the world living in extreme poverty today wants to escape.

The United Nations defines ‘extreme poverty’ by using the international
poverty line of $2.15 per day. Adjusted for price differences across the
world, this figure equates to what $2.15 would buy you in the United States.

As the name says, this is an extremely low poverty line, used to identify
those in the most destitute conditions. For most of human history, nearly
everyone lived in dire poverty. In 1820, more than three-quarters of the
world lived below the equivalent of this poverty line.16 Today that figure is
less than 10%.iv
I’ve heard people argue that while the percentage is going down, the
total number of people living in extreme poverty has been increasing. This
isn’t true. In 1990, 2 billion people lived on less than $2.15 per day. By
2019, this had more than halved to 648 million. To put this development in
perspective, every day for the last 25 years there could have been a
newspaper headline reading, ‘The number of people in extreme poverty has
fallen by 128,000 since yesterday’.v
We should set our aspirations much higher than this poverty line of
$2.15. There is good news there too: more and more people are surpassing
higher poverty lines – of $3.65, $6.85, or $24 per day. In the past, poverty
was always the default. We can build a future where it is the exception.

Share of the world population living in poverty
Data is adjusted for price changes over time (inflation) and for price differences across countries.

Now it’s time for the second half of the equation
We’ve just seen seven developments that have transformed the lives of
billions of people. But this progress has come at a massive environmental
cost. The first half of our sustainability equation has improved dramatically,
but the second half has undoubtedly got worse. This brings us to the seven
big environmental problems that will be tackled in this book. To see how
we can balance the environmental side of the equation too, we need to
understand the progress we’ve already made, and how we got there. That
shows us what still needs to be done if we’re to realise our dream of a
sustainable world. It’s useful to give an overview here, to keep the bigger
picture in mind as we dig into the fine detail of each problem.

(1) Air Pollution
Air pollution is one of the world’s biggest killers. Researchers estimate that
it kills at least 9 million people every year. That’s 450 times more than die
in natural disasters in most years. But air pollution is not a modern problem:
it dates back as far as the human discovery of fire. When we burn stuff, the
air becomes polluted. That’s true regardless of whether we’re burning wood
or coal, or oil in our cars. The stakes for solving air pollution are high. But
we know it’s possible: the air in many rich countries is the cleanest it has
been for centuries or more. If we can replicate these efforts everywhere, it
would save millions of lives every year.

(2) Climate Change
Global temperatures are rising. Sea levels are rising; ice sheets are melting;
and other species are struggling to adapt to a changing climate. Humans
face an avalanche of problems from flooding and drought to wildfires and
fatal heatwaves. Farmers are at risk of crop failures. Cities are at risk of
being submerged. There’s one main cause: human emissions of greenhouse
gases. We’ve burned fossil fuels, cut down forests and raised livestock for
energy and food – undoubtedly important for human progress. But we’re
now paying the price of severe climate change. If you only look at a chart
of CO2 emissions over time, you might believe that we’re making no
progress at all. But in the last few years we have, and we’ve done so
quickly. There is hope that soon there will be no trade-off between having
plentiful energy and a low-carbon footprint: we will be able to live a
prosperous life without changing the climate around us.

(3) Deforestation
Over the last 10,000 years we’ve cut down one-third of the world’s forest,
mostly to grow food on expanding farmland. Half of this was in the last
century. When we cut down trees we release carbon that has been stored
there for hundreds or thousands of years. But deforestation isn’t just a
problem for climate change. Forests are home to some of the planet’s most
diverse ecosystems: complex, interconnected networks of animals, plants
and bacteria that have built up over millennia. Cut them down and we
destroy these beautiful habitats. While it might seem like deforestation is at
its peak, it’s not; but we’ve made a lot of progress in solving it over the last
few decades, and we have a real chance of being the generation that sees the
end of it.

(4) Food
Deforestation is mostly about food, which is our next big problem. We’ve
seen a rapid decline in hunger over the last 50 years. But growing more
food has affected almost every environmental issue we face. Food
production is responsible for one-quarter of the world’s greenhouse gas
emissions; it uses half of the world’s habitable land, 70% of the world’s
freshwater withdrawals, and the leading driver of biodiversity loss.

Growing enough food is not the problem – it’s about growing and using this
food in a smarter way. Make better decisions and we can feed 9 or 10
billion people without frying the planet at the same time.

(5) Biodiversity Loss
It’s not just farm animals that we should be concerned about. Wildlife is
also in dire trouble. Biodiversity loss is driven by many of the problems
covered in this book: species are affected by climate change, deforestation,
habitat loss through expanding land, hunting for meat, plastic pollution and
overfishing. Our conflict with other animals is nothing new – we’ve been
clashing with them for millennia. Over the last century these extinction
rates have accelerated, raising the question of whether we’re in the midst of
a Sixth Mass Extinction. For most of human history, it has been us versus
wildlife. But there is a path forward where both can flourish.

(6) Ocean Plastics
Plastic is the most ‘modern’ problem we’ll look at in this book. It is both a
miracle material and an environmental disaster. In fact, it’s probably an
environmental disaster because it’s so magical. It’s cheap, light, versatile,
and brings us so many benefits, from delivering life-saving vaccines to
preventing food waste. But a million tonnes of plastic pours into the ocean
from our rivers every year, leaving an environmental imprint for decades or
centuries to come. Many people think that the way to stop plastic pollution
is to stop using plastic entirely. But this is an unlikely – and undesirable –
solution. Thankfully, we have the tools we need to solve it. Many countries
have implemented them already.

(7) Overfishing
Finally, a deep dive into the ocean will look at the problem of overfishing.

Newspapers and documentaries have been filled with scary headlines about
the state of our oceans. The most popular claim is that they will be empty
by the middle of the century. That’s not true, but it doesn’t mean overfishing
isn’t a problem: many of the world’s fish stocks are depleting rapidly.

Whale populations are a fraction of what they were in the past. And the
world’s corals – some of its most diverse ecosystems – are being bleached
to death. But these are problems we can tackle – in fact, some of our most
iconic and endangered fish and whale species have seen an impressive
comeback over the last few decades.

Two ideas that won’t fix our problems
Before we take off into the air and the first stop on our journey, I need to
look at a few arguments that cut across all these challenges. Our collective
environmental impact is quite simple when we break it down: it’s the
number of people multiplied by everyone’s individual impact. When we put
it that way, two grand solutions emerge: reduce the number of people on the
planet or cut our individual impacts by intentionally shrinking the economy.

These arguments – referred to as depopulation and degrowth – are
represented by very loud advocates in environmental debates. But neither of
these options is viable. We will not achieve sustainability by shrinking the
population or the economy. In the following chapters I’ll walk us through
why in much more detail. But first, here’s what you need to know before we
start.

(1) Depopulation
Many people are worried that the global population is still growing rapidly.

That we’re seeing exponential population growth, and it’s out of control.

This isn’t true. The global population growth rate – the change from one
year to the next – peaked a long time ago. In the 1960s it was growing at
more than 2% per year.

17 Since then, this rate has more than halved, to
0.8% in 2022. And it will keep falling in the decades to come. For
population growth to be ‘exponential’ the growth rate would have to stay at
2% per year.

This is happening because women are having far fewer children than in
the past. For most of human history having five or more kids was not
uncommon. But this didn’t drive fast population growth because so many
children died young. By the 1950s and 60s, the global average was still
similar – women would give birth to five children.18 Thankfully far more
children now survived, which is why the population increased rapidly. But,
since then, the global fertility rate has more than halved and is now just
over two children per woman.

The number of children per woman is falling rapidly across the world
Fertility rate is measured as the average number of children per woman, assuming she was to live to
end of her life-bearing years.

As a result, the world has already passed ‘peak child’. According to
statistics compiled by the United Nations, the number of children in the
world peaked in 2017vi and is now falling. Take a moment to think about
what that means: there may never be more children in the world than there
were in 2017. Global population growth will peak when all these children
reach old age. The United Nations projects this will happen in the 2080s at
10 to 11 billion people.19 From there, it expects the world population will
start to shrink.

So, rapid population growth is behind us, the world is not facing an
uncontrolled ‘population explosion’. For some, this is not enough. They
argue that we should actively decrease the number of people in the world.

In The Population Bomb, Paul R. Ehrlich argued that the optimal global
population was around 1 billion people. He still argues for this today. Here’s
the thing: if we were to accept for a moment that this was the optimal
number of people (which I don’t), it’s not possible to reduce the population
quickly enough for that to help address our environmental problems. If
anyone argues that it is, they don’t understand how demographic change
works.

Even if some countries implemented a one-child policy and birth rates
became much lower – around 1.5 as the global average – we might be
talking about the population in 2100 being 7 or 8 billion, similar to our
current level. To get anywhere close to 1, 2 or 3 billion people would mean
killing billions or stopping people from having any children at all. If you
think that’s a viable and moral solution, then I don’t know what to tell you.

Trying to ‘control’ population in any humane way (if there is such a thing)
might reduce it a bit, but not by that much. Our sustainability solutions need
to be scalable for many billions of people. If we can make them scalable for
8 billion people, we can do it for 10 billion.

The end goal that we’re aiming for is to reduce our impacts per person
to zero – or at least very close to zero. If we’re to build a sustainable world
for the future then we all have to tread with the lightest of footprints. That’s
really the point of this book: to work out if and how we can do that. In a
world where our per capita impacts are zero (or, maybe even negative,
meaning we restore historical environmental damage) then it doesn’t matter
whether we live in a world with 1, 7 or 10 billion people. Our total impact
will still be zero. One half of our sustainability equation would be complete.

(2) Degrowth
What about ‘degrowth’ – shrinking the economy – instead? This argument
hinges on the fact that, historically, economic growth has been linked with
more resource-intensive lifestyles. As we got richer, we used more energy
from fossil fuels, had a higher carbon footprint, used more land and ate
more meat. And it’s true that in a world without technological change, we’ll
be stuck with fossil fuel power, petrol cars and inefficient homes. But as the
chapters that follow will show, new technologies are allowing us to
decouple a good and comfortable life from an environmentally destructive
one. This is what makes it possible for us to be the first generation. In rich
countries carbon emissions, energy use, deforestation, fertiliser use,
overfishing, plastic pollution, air pollution and water pollution are all
falling, while these countries continue to get richer.

vii The idea that these
countries were more sustainable when they were poorer is simply not true.

There is another important reason why degrowth will not build a
sustainable future. Degrowth argues that we can redistribute the world’s
wealth from the rich to the poor, giving everyone a good and high standard
of living with the resources already at our disposal. But the maths doesn’t
check out.20 The world is far too poor to give everyone a high standard of
living today through redistribution alone.

We can see this with a quick thought experiment. Let’s imagine that
every country in the world ends up like Denmark. Almost all its population
lives above the $30 poverty line that most rich countries adopt, and it is one
of the most equal countries in the world.21 That’s what I want: everyone in
the world to live a comfortable, poverty-free life, and in a society with low
levels of inequality.

In this scenario, we’re going to do a global redistribution: all the
countries that are richer than Denmark are brought down to its average level
of income, and all the countries that are poorer – which is 85% of the global
population – are brought up to it. There are no inequalities between
countries, and inequalities within countries are also shrunk massively.

Would it be possible to achieve this by just redistributing the world’s
money?
No: the global economy would have to be at least five times bigger than
it is today. That’s right: to lift everyone out of poverty, with a level of
equality like Denmark, the global economy would need to increase fivefold. If everyone in the world lived on $30 per day with zero inequality (so
the richest and poorest both get $30), the global economy would need to
more than double.

A world without economic growth would remain a very poor one. I’m
agnostic about growth in rich countries, but the data is clear that we need
strong economic growth globally to end poverty, even with lots of
redistribution.

Historically, countries have become rich from fossil fuels and other
resources. That means many people now assume that growth equals ‘bad’.

But there is no reason for it to stay that way. If a country, or an individual
for that matter, can lead the way in providing a cheap, low-carbon energy
source that could power the world, I would be more than happy for them to
get rich from it. And they could. There is a massive ‘solutions vacuum’ for
our environmental problems. The early movers in this space can build a
prosperous economy while building solutions to our problems at the same
time. Countries can ‘grow’ by leading the way on ‘good’ technologies, not
just exploiting polluting ones.

This leads to another argument, which is that having money gives us
options. The solutions and technologies we need to fix our environmental
problems have become viable only in the last few decades. Some, such as
solar energy and electric vehicles, only in the last few years. Before then,
these technologies did not exist or were far too expensive. They’ve become
competitive through years of investment and development – and that has
needed extra cash from governments and entrepreneurs.

For hundreds of thousands of years, burning wood was the only source
of ‘controllable’ heat and light that our ancestors had. Then, a few centuries
ago, our ancestors acquired a couple more – albeit destructive – options:
whale oil and coal. But we’ve only had real choice in the last few years.

Economic growth is not incompatible with reducing our environmental
impact. In this book I’ll show that we can reduce our environmental impact
and reverse our past damage while becoming better off. The big question
here is whether we can decouple these impacts fast enough. The answer to
that depends on what actions we take today.

We’ve seen how dramatically things have improved for humanity when it
comes to the first half of the sustainability equation. And that neither
depopulation nor degrowth, despite their many advocates, are the solution
to the second half. In fact, they would make both the first and the second
half of the equation worse. What should we do instead? It’s now time to
explore our seven environmental problems one by one and see what we
need to do to solve them.

Footnotes
i I’m using data from the United Kingdom here. These national averages don’t directly reflect
personal risk to my mother, and the women that came before her, but it gives us a decent proxy for
the chances.

ii Here it’s useful to clarify what ‘life expectancy’ means. It refers to the number of years a person
can expect to live. There are two common ways of measuring life expectancy. Cohort life expectancy
is the average life length of a cohort – a group of individuals born in a given year. When we can track
a group of people born in a particular year and track the exact date on which each one of them died
then we can calculate this cohort’s life expectancy: it’s the average of the ages of all members when
they died. This is quite hard to do: we need to follow an entire group of individuals through to the
end of their life. Instead, a more common measure is period life expectancy. This estimates the
average length of life for a cohort of people if they were exposed, from birth to death, to the mortality
rates observed in any given year. Period life expectancy doesn’t take future changes in life
expectancy into account. When we report life expectancy here, we’re talking about period life
expectancy.

iii Of course, this is not the only metric on education that we’re interested in. It’s not just the time in
school that matters, but the quality of teaching and learning. Here, the data is more concerning. We
see that many – if not most – children in the poorest countries in the world leave school without
being able to read and write (https://ourworldindata.org/better-learning).

They might be at school, but this doesn’t mean they’re learning a lot.

This is not a problem exclusive to girls: it’s across the board. Having access
to a basic education, then, is just a starting point. Kids need to be in school
first. Then we need to find a way of making sure that they receive the highquality education they deserve.

iv To be clear: here we’re focusing on the international poverty line – the poverty line that is
reflective of the poorest countries in the world. There is no single definition of poverty. Our
understanding of the extent of poverty and how it is changing depends on which definition we have
in mind. Obviously, richer and poorer countries set very different poverty lines in order to measure
poverty in a way that is informative and relevant to the level of income of their citizens. For instance,
while in the United States a person is considered poor if they live on less than $22.50 per day, in
Ethiopia the poverty line is set more than 10 times lower – at $1.75 per day.

v If you think this global development is just about the reduction in poverty in China, you’re wrong
there too. Even when we take China out of the picture, rates of extreme poverty have fallen
dramatically.

vi Here we’re talking about children under the age of five. But even if we take the population of
children under 15 years old, the world has passed the peak. According to the UN’s medium
projections, the global population of under-15s peaked in 2021.

vii If your gut reaction to this is ‘Yes, but they’ve only managed this because they’ve shipped all their
environmental damage overseas to poorer countries’, then you’re not alone. But while it’s true that
some countries have exported some of their impacts elsewhere, even when we account for this, the
footprint of rich countries is still falling.

2
Air Pollution
Breathing clean air
‘Inside Beijing’s airpocalypse – a city made “almost uninhabitable” by
pollution’
– Guardian, 20141
For years, Beijing was near the top of the list for ‘most polluted city in the
world’. It had become the poster child for global air pollution, especially in
the Western media. The pollution got so bad that it was named an
‘airpocalypse’.

The city’s air quality was put in the spotlight when Beijing hosted the
Summer Olympics in 2008. In the run-up to the event, the government took
action and its pollution levels dropped significantly.

2, 3 Half of its cars were
taken off the road, industrial plants were temporarily closed, and
construction activities were put on hold. Despite these improvements, it
hosted one of the most polluted Games in history. The media lamented the
impacts on the athletes’ and spectators’ health. But this missed the point: the
polluted air that participants were briefly exposed to was much cleaner than
the daily reality for the people living there.

In 2022 Beijing hosted the Winter Olympics, which was worlds apart
from the Summer Games 14 years earlier. The city’s air quality had
improved rapidly in the last decade. Once ‘almost uninhabitable’, news
headlines now referred to its blue skies and smog-free air.

4
It had dropped
off the list of the world’s 200 most polluted cities.6 This time, the
improvement was different: it wasn’t a temporary flex for its international
visitors. It was a permanent change demanded and achieved by the city’s
population itself. But how?
After the world packed up and went home in 2008, Beijing’s air quality
continued to get worse. By 2013, public anger boiled over. Citizens
demanded proper air-quality monitoring and data. Even Chinese state media
were reporting on the terrible pollution that cloaked not just Beijing, but
cities across the country.

5 The Chinese government responded and in 2014
declared a ‘war on pollution’. It moved quickly, bringing in tough
regulations on industrial plants; it took old cars off the road, shut down coal
stations near the city, and switched from coal to gas boilers, which produce
much less pollution.i
Between 2013 and 2020, Beijing’s pollution levels fell by 55%.6 Across
China as a whole, they fell by 40%. The health benefits of these changes are
huge: it’s estimated that the life expectancy of the average person in Beijing
has increased by 4.6 years.

By the 2022 Winter Olympics, China’s environmental image had
transformed. The media no longer focused on the smog. Instead, it focused
on the unique backdrop to the ski-jump venue: a closed and abandoned steel
mill, one of the casualties of the ‘war on pollution’. It stood majestically in
the background of every jump, a reminder of China’s new focus on clean
air, and its transition from the polluting industries that took years off its
citizen’s lives.

China’s air is still not perfect. It’s still well above the World Health
Organization (WHO) guidelines, and several times higher than you’d find
in a city in the United States or Europe. Its work is not done. But its
example offers us an important lesson in how quickly we can act when we
have the tools: a demanding citizenship, the money and political will.

How we got to now
We associate air pollution with modernity and industrialisation. But it is not
a modern problem. In fact, in many parts of the world, the air we now
breathe is the cleanest it has been for thousands of years.

The Roman philosopher Seneca (4 BC–AD 65) was stoic about most
things, but the air of ancient Romeii was filthy, and Seneca knew that it was
impacting his health. As he once remarked upon leaving the city:7, 8
‘As
soon as I escaped from the oppressive atmosphere of the city, and from that
awful odour of reeking kitchens which, when in use, pour forth a ruinous
mess of steam and soot, I perceived at once that my health was mending.’
Even further back, in 400 BC, Hippocrates documented the ills of
pollution in his book Airs, Waters and Places.

9 The Arab geographer AlMas’udi (896–956) wrote about it during his trips through the Silk Road in
Central Asia.10 Several writers from the Song Dynasty (960–1279)
documented their concerns about coal-burning.

Our understanding of air pollution’s impact didn’t develop much until
the 19th century, but now we are in a unique position where we can use
modern solutions to make sure that it is soon a problem of the ancients.

Air pollution is caused by one very simple principle: burning things.

When we burn stuff – whether that’s wood, crops, coal or oil – we generate
small unwanted particles at the same time. This is the root of the problem,
and the key to solving it.

Burning wood
When I was a kid, one of my favourite things was going camping with my
family. The climate in Scotland meant that the opportunities were few and
far between. But when there was a clear weather window, my dad, cousins
and uncles would pack up our stuff and make camp in remote woodland.

We would collect wood and set it alight. I would sit there for hours, at peace
with the intense heat and meditative from its warm glow. I still love an open
fire.

What I once thought of as a luxury has been one of humanity’s biggest
silent killers. It still is. Humans started burning wood for fire at least one
and a half million years ago.11
It gave us heat, fuels for cooking and
protection in the darkness. But it also gave us poor health from the pollution
it created.

The small particles produced when we burn wood can get deep into our
lungs and lead to a range of respiratory and cardiovascular problems,
including heart disease and cancer. We know that early humans were
exposed to these pollutants because we find them in their remains from
hundreds of thousands of years ago. When researchers looked at the
preserved teeth of hunter-gatherers from Qesem Cave in Israel from
400,000 years ago they found pollutants from charcoal in them.12 These
pollutants, they suggest, came from indoor fires for the roasting of meats.

Researchers also found evidence of air pollution in the preserved lung
tissue of Egyptian mummies. When the scientist Roger Montgomerie
looked at the lungs of 15 mummies – ranging from noblemen to priests – he
found fragments of fine particulates and scarring of the lungs, resulting
from exposure to pollution and conditions such as pneumonia.13 Despite all
the fossil fuels, cars and pollution we produce today, Montgomerie believed
the levels of pollution thousands of years ago were not much different.

While the odd night around a campfire in the open probably didn’t do
me much damage, we now know that long exposure to the particles from
wood-burning and the burning of other biomass is terrible for human health.

It’s particularly bad in enclosed spaces, where people huddle over a stove to
cook or get warm.

But this was the only energy option for our ancestors for what might
have been a million years.iii Whether or not they were aware of the health
impacts of what they were breathing in, the sacrifices of giving up woodburning were severe. They needed fuels for cooking, heating, light and
safety. Perhaps early death from respiratory infections, cardiovascular
disease or lung cancer was worth it for a better life. As we’ll see later, this is
a trade-off that billions of people still face today. In the end, having a source
of energy nearly always wins.

Burning coal
Coal is the dirtiest fossil fuel. Not only does it create the most pollution
when we burn it, but it’s also the worst for driving climate change. But
moving from wood to coal was a big step-up. Per kilogram, coal gives us
about twice as much energy as wood. And you don’t have to cut down
forests to supply it.

By the 15th and 16th centuries, many rich countries were quickly
running out of forest. Three-quarters of British and French forests had been
cut down.14 Protecting what was left was becoming a priority. Many
countries started burning coal in their homes for cooking and heating. Cities
rose up. Households filled with smoke from coal-burning stoves. The streets
filled with smoke too, as it wafted out from windows and doors. Whether
inside the home or out on the streets, smog hung in the air. A silent killer,
but one that seemed like an inevitable price to pay for progress.

London air was more polluted than the world’s most polluted cities today
I’ve spent much of my life living in two cities renowned for having filthy
air. A few centuries ago, one of Edinburgh’s central spots – Nor’ Loch –
was the drainage site for the city’s waste, and even the collection point for
dead bodies. A nauseating stench would fill the air. This was compounded
by the toxic fumes that leaked from chimneys and coal fires across the city.

The city was cloaked in a dense fog, and the name ‘Auld Reekie’ or ‘Old
Smoke’ was born.

If Edinburgh was the ‘Old Smoke’, London was the ‘Big Smoke’. It’s
hard to capture just how polluted London was in the 18th and 19th
centuries. The city was under thick smog for most of the year, and became a
breeding ground for crime – coal-burning providing an invisibility cloak for
thieves. It was often so bad that people couldn’t travel.

The massive health costs of air pollution became obvious. Just breathing
had become a ticking time bomb. In 50 years – from 1840 to 1890 – death
rates from bronchitis increased 12-fold, meaning 1 in 350 people died from
it.15 If that were still the case today, 26,000 Londoners would be dying from
air pollution every year.

That was nothing compared to the tragic smog that masked the city in
December 1952. Air pollution levels were already improving by this point,
but an unfortunate combination of cold and completely windless conditions
meant that the particulates hung in the air longer than usual. The city
ground to a halt. Londoners were rendered practically blind: to walk
outdoors they would have to shuffle their feet around, feeling for kerbs and
other obstacles. Ambulances stopped running. The pollution snuck indoors,
forcing concerts and plays to be cancelled. The Great Smog of London
lasted just four days but is estimated to have killed around 10,000 people
and made 100,000 seriously ill with respiratory problems.

In the world’s most polluted cities today, Delhi often tops the global
pollution rankings, but if 18th- or 19th-century London were to enter the
race it would be guaranteed to win this title, based on levels of suspended
particulate matter.

That doesn’t undermine the serious air pollution issues we face today.

Far from it. Dirty air is still one of the world’s biggest killers. I flinch when
I see images of Delhi or Beijing peeking out from a thick haze. My point is
that these modern levels of pollution might seem unprecedented, but they’re
not. That should be a relief: it’s scary to face waters that seem uncharted.

The fact that the level of pollution in our old cities comes as a surprise to us
is good news. It means we found a solution. We managed to clean it up.

London’s air was more polluted than Delhi’s air today
Average concentrations of suspended particulate matter, measured in micrograms per cubic metre.

How countries tackled acid rain
The dramatic reduction of air pollution in London is an example of a local
success. But there are two other big success stories that are worth
mentioning: acid rain, which needed countries to collaborate at a regional
level, and the ozone layer, which required the world to work together to find
a solution.

In the late 20th century, statues and monuments were dissolving. The
faces of queens and kings became featureless blobs. Rivers and lakes
became acidic, killing off fish. Freshwater insects were disappearing. Many
forests were dying, stripped bare of their vegetation.

The culprit was acid rain, which is caused by emissions of sulphur and
nitrogen oxides. In the atmosphere, these compounds react with water to
form sulphuric and nitric acid. The rain, and everything it then filters into –
trees, soils, rivers and lakes – become more acidic. The main sources of
sulphur and nitrogen oxide are fossil fuels, industry and some forms of
agriculture. Coal, for example, contains lots of sulphur. When it’s burned, it
emits sulphur dioxide (SO2
), a molecule that dissolves in rainwater and
makes it more acidic.

By the 1980s, acid rain had become the environmental problem of the
day. What became clear is that individual countries couldn’t tackle the
problem on their own. It was an issue that crossed boundaries: emissions of
SO2
from the UK drifted over Scandinavia, ruining Norwegian forests, and
emissions in the US blew over to Canada where they polluted freshwater
lakes. After strong resistance, the United States and much of Europe
brought in tight regulations. The impact was almost immediate. SO2
emissions in the US were cut by around 95% from their peak in the
1970s.16 In Europe, they’ve fallen by 84%, and in the UK, by 98%. The
solution was quite simple: add a reactant to the smokestack of a coal plant,
and the SO2 can be stripped away so that it’s not emitted into the
atmosphere.

Sulphur dioxide (SO2
) emissions have plummeted in many countries
Measured in tonnes per year.

Acid rain has almost disappeared across North America and Europe. Many
other countries are making fast progress too. To prove it, look at China. In
just over a decade its SO2 emissions have fallen by two-thirds. That’s while
the country’s coal use more than doubled.

Acid rain is a problem we know how to solve. It has a simple
technological solution. And when countries want to tackle it, with the right
political will and investment, they can do it incredibly quickly.

How the world fixed the ozone layer
The effect of pollution on the ozone layer was the climate change of its day.

The environmental problem that dominated the headlines. A problem that
no country could tackle alone. Now it barely gets a mention.

In the 1960s, scientists were starting to understand the reactions that
determined the photochemistry of the upper atmosphere. Ozone (O3
) is a
gas that is present in Earth’s atmosphere at multiple altitudes. You can find
it at ground level, where it presents as a local air pollutant that causes
respiratory problems for those who breathe it in. But the ozone we’re
interested in is very high in the atmosphere, around 15 to 35 kilometres
above the surface, in the stratosphere.

This is the so-called ‘good ozone’. It plays a crucial role in absorbing
dangerous ultraviolet (UV-B) radiation from the sun. This protective layer
of ozone guards humans against skin cancer, sunburn and blindness, and
protects other life forms as well. We might want to get rid of ozone at
ground level, but we definitely don’t want to remove it in the stratosphere.

A trio of scientists that would later win the Nobel Prize – Paul Crutzen,
Frank Rowland and Mario Molina – proposed that human emissions of
chlorine substances could be doing exactly that: destroying ozone in the
stratosphere.17 They couldn’t yet see ozone holes developing or measure
this breakdown directly, but they could hypothesise from their
understanding of chemistry that this might be happening. These substances
– the most well known being chlorofluorocarbons (CFCs) – were being
used in refrigerators, freezers, air conditioners, aerosol sprays and industry.

By measuring concentrations of chlorine molecules throughout the lower
atmosphere, they realised that these gases were not breaking down. Instead,
they were rising through into the higher stratosphere.18 There, UV radiation
would break the chlorine atoms free, allowing them to react with ozone, and
destroying it.

A scientific consensus on the decline of the ozone layer emerged
relatively quickly after this hypothesis was shared in 1974, and in 1985 a
major report laid out the evidence for it.19 However, the biggest scientific
game-changer was the discovery of the ozone hole over Antarctica. When
we emit CFCs they tend to spread across the upper atmosphere evenly –
including to spots in the world without direct emissions. CFCs are
transported over Antarctica and cold temperatures are a key catalyst for
these reactions, so ozone depletion is particularly bad at the poles.

Until this point, Crutzen, Rowland and Molina had faced strong
resistance and denial from industrial and political players.20 The chairman
of DuPont – the largest global manufacturer of CFCs – said the theory was:
‘a science fiction tale… a load of rubbish… utter nonsense’. The leading
producers formed the Alliance for Responsible CFC to coordinate their
efforts and launched intense PR campaigns discrediting the theory of ozone
depletion. Anne Gorsuch, the US’s first female head of the Environmental
Protection Agency, dismissed ozone depletion as an environmental scare.21
But the visual imagery of a growing ozone hole was hard to ignore: it
finally put pressure on governmental and industrial actors to take action.

Forty-three countries signed the Montreal Protocol in 1987, agreeing to
phase out ozone-depleting substances from 1989 onwards. The first
countries to take action were mostly richer ones that were the main
industrial producers – the US, Canada, Japan, most of Europe and New
Zealand. Their aim was to halve global production by 1999 before working
towards a total phase-out later.

22, 23
Regulations became tighter as more evidence of the problem emerged.

The deadline to phase out the production of ozone-depleting gases was
brought forward. By the turn of the millennium, 174 parties (which are
mostly countries and a few independent states) had signed the protocol. In
2009, it became the first international convention – of any kind, not just
environmental – to achieve universal ratification from every country in the
world.

The success of this international effort has been stunning. The phase-out
that followed the first protocol in 1989 was rapid. Within a year, the use of
ozone-depleting substances fell 25% below its 1986 levels. Within a decade
the levels had fallen by almost 80%. This was far beyond the initial target
of a 50% reduction. As of today, they have fallen by 99.7%.

International action on ozone depletion reduced emissions by more than 99%
The world adopted the Montreal Protocol in 1987 to reduce ozone-depleting substances.

Shown is the reduction in global emissions compared to 1989.

The concentrations of ozone in the stratosphere more than halved through
the 1980s and these levels stabilised in the 1990s. It will still take the ozone
layer a long time to recover and global concentrations of ozone probably
won’t get back to their 1960 levels until the middle of the 21st century.

24 It
might be the end of the century before ozone levels in Antarctica get back
to where they once were. But as long as we stick to our phase-out of ozonedepleting substances, the hole will continue to shrink. We’ve taken action,
and now all we need to do is wait.

Tackling climate change and some of the other problems in this book
will be more difficult, but there are still important lessons to learn from both
the acid rain and the ozone success stories. Humans can solve real global
problems. Every country has the opportunity to be involved. And we can
take action quickly when we’re up against it. It serves us well to remind
ourselves that we are capable of cooperating on such global problems.

As you go through the following chapters, you should keep these lessons
in mind, too. You might be sceptical. I certainly was. But what might at first
seem like unmovable barriers are not destined to stay that way. There are
many more Crutzens, Rowlands and Molinas working tirelessly in the
shadows.

Where we are today
Many of us are breathing in the cleanest air in centuries
The air I breathed as a child was much cleaner than my parents ever
experienced in their youth, and much, much cleaner than my grandparents
enjoyed. We’re breathing air that is cleaner than it has been for centuries.

But it’s a success story that we rarely tell.

It’s not just emissions of SO2
that have fallen in the UK. Emissions of
local air pollutants are just a fraction of what they were. Nitrous oxides are
down 76% from their peak. Black carbon is down 94%, volatile organic
compounds down 73% and carbon monoxide down 90%.

The UK is no outlier. It’s the same story across most of the world’s rich
countries. Reductions in the US, Canada, France and Germany, have been
just as impressive. This success is largely the result of successful
environmental regulation. The UK implemented its first Clean Air Act in
1956, following London’s Great Smog. Decade by decade, these regulations
were made tighter. In response, industries had to develop low-pollution
technologies. We learned how to strip the sulphur out of coal-burning. We
banned leaded petrol. We learned how to produce cars and trucks that emit
just a fraction of the pollution they once did. The US implemented its Clean
Air Act in 1970, with similarly impressive results.25
The rise and fall of air pollutants in the United Kingdom
This pattern – the increase, peak then rapid fall of emissions – is consistent across most rich
countries. Emissions are measured in tonnes per year.

Environmental action is often framed as at odds with the economy. It’s
either climate action or economic growth. Pollution versus the market. This
is just wrong. Countries have slashed air pollution while growing their
economies at the same time. Lower pollution, better health and a stronger
economy? That sounds like the perfect sales pitch to me.

It often gets worse before it gets better: air pollution is also falling in many
growing economies
The path that countries follow is a predictable one. Pollution first rises as a
country starts to move out of poverty. At this stage, access to energy is the
priority. It burns coal, oil, gas without tight restrictions on how clean it
needs to be. There are no demands for top-of-the-range power plants with
anti-pollution controls, or new car engines with particle filters. Pollution
levels continue to rise as more people get electricity, cars, and can afford to
heat or cool their homes. The country enters an industrial boom. People
have more money and life is getting better. The pollution isn’t pleasant, but
the trade-off seems worth it.

But, eventually, the country reaches a tipping point in its pathway to
prosperity. Once life is comfortable, our concerns turn to the environment
around us. Our priorities shift, and we no longer want to tolerate dirty air.

Governments have to shift too; they are forced to take action and reduce
levels of air pollution. The curve of air pollution reaches its peak and starts
to decline.26
This journey is often called the ‘Environmental Kuznets Curve’:iv plot
an environmental metric against income and it forms an upside-down ‘U’
(it’s low when we’re poor; it rises to reach its peak at middle incomes; then
falls again as we get richer). There are lots of environmental metrics where
this Kuznets Curve doesn’t hold true. But it works for air pollution, which
means we can tell what stage of economic development a country is in just
by drawing a curve of how polluted its air is. India, for example, is just
approaching its turning point. It’s on the brink of peak pollution. As seen
earlier, China is further ahead and has now passed the peak.

It took countries like the UK and the US two centuries to go through the
rise and fall of air pollution. With new technologies, countries are going
through this transition four times as quickly. Better yet, some of the poorest
countries might be able to skip the curve entirely.

China has now passed ‘peak air pollution’
Air pollution is now falling quickly in many upper-middle-income countries. Emissions are measured
in tonnes per year.

Millions of people die from air pollution every year
Air pollution might be falling in many countries, but it’s still one of the
world’s biggest killers. It increases our risk of respiratory disease, stroke,
cardiovascular disease and lung cancer.

And it’s the little particles we can barely see that are especially bad for
our health. Scientists often refer to them as ‘PM2.5’ – particulate matter that
is smaller than 2.5 micrometres in diameter. Almost invisible. The problem
is that these tiny particles can sneak deep into our lungs and respiratory
system. Visit the beach and you will find annoying bits of sand in your
shoes for days. You won’t find any hidden boulders in there, but the
smallest grains get into the smallest cracks. Particles in the air are no
different.

In 2020, nine-year-old Ella Adoo-Kissi-Debrah became the first person
in the world to have ‘air pollution’ on her death certificate. She died of
asthma, and a London Coroner’s Court concluded that air pollution played a
large role. This outcome is rare. Air pollution kills a lot of people, but it’s
not cited as a cause of death. Instead, researchers estimate premature deaths
from measurements of pollutants in the air, and our understanding of how
this increases our risk of deadly diseases. Researchers don’t agree on the
exact number. But they do agree that it’s tragically high – in the order of
millions. The World Health Organization estimates that air pollution kills 7
million people every year: 4.2 million from outdoor air pollution, and 3.8
million from indoor air pollution from burning wood and charcoal. The
world’s other big health institute, the Institute for Health Metrics and
Evaluation (IHME), gives a similar number: 6.7 million. Some scientists
think this number could be even bigger: some of the most recent and widely
cited studies estimate that at least 9 million people die every year from the
air they breathe.27, 28
To put these numbers into context, this is similar to the death toll from
smoking: around 8 million.29 It’s six or seven times higher than the number
of people that die in road accidents: 1.3 million. Hundreds of times more
than the number that die from terrorism or war each year. Air pollution is
the silent killer that doesn’t get enough headlines. It doesn’t shock us like
images of a flood or a hurricane, but it kills around 500 times more people a
year than all ‘natural’ disasters combined, in most years.v
But death rates from air pollution are falling
This is a bleak picture. But as with so many examples in this book, it is not
the whole picture. While the number of deaths from air pollution is still
horrifically high, the data does contain hope. We could be at the peak of the
human tragedy that is air pollution. It’s possible – in fact, it’s likely – that
we’re approaching ‘peak pollution deaths’. That sounds grim, but it also
means that the worst is behind us.

Why do I think we’re approaching the peak? The total number of deaths
from air pollution globally has been about the same for decades. The death
toll hasn’t changed much despite there being many more people in the
world. And, especially, older people who are at much higher risk of dying
from strokes, cardiovascular disease and cancers. This means that the death
rate from air pollution – or the risk for the average person – has been
declining, and not just a little: death rates have halved since 1990 by some
estimates.30
If global population growth slows down, and air pollution continues to
improve, the world will soon pass the peak of air pollution deaths. The
downward slope could be much steeper than the upward one. A rollout of
clean technologies could see pollution deaths plunge in a matter of decades.

Death rates from air pollution are falling, even in the most polluted countries
Death rates from indoor and outdoor air pollution, measured as the number of premature deaths per
100,000 people.

How do we achieve clean air?
To understand what we need to do to stop air pollution, we first need to
understand where it’s coming from.

Delhi’s average concentration of tiny particulates – those smaller than
2.5 micrometres – is twenty times higher than the WHO guidelines. In
winter, things get even worse. The winds drop, and the pollution settles on
the city. During these months, it’s not uncommon for levels to reach more
than 100 times the WHO limit.

In January 2016, the local government needed a quick fix. It decided to
take half of Delhi’s cars off the road, implementing the ‘odd-even’ rule: if
your number plate ended in an odd number then you could only drive it on
‘odd’ dates, and if it ended in an even number, the opposite. If it wasn’t
‘your’ day to drive then you’d have to use public transport or catch a ride
with someone who had the right number plate. Ignoring the rule resulted in
a fine.

You’d think this would have a dramatic effect, but researchers estimate
that the odd-even rule in 2016 only led to a 5% drop in Delhi’s pollution. It
tried again in November 2019, with a little more success: a drop of around
13%.

How could such a dramatic change make so little difference? The
answer is obvious if we step back to look at where Delhi’s pollution is
coming from. It’s not coming from its cars. In fact, only around 23% of
Delhi’s winter PM2.5 pollution was coming from transport, and cars were
just 4%, with most of the rest coming from trucks.31 But trucks, buses and
motorcycles were not included in the scheme. And, actually, not all cars
were either. Women drivers were exempt. So were cars running on cleaner
fuels, taxis, and those carrying VIPs such as government officials, judges
and embassy members. In other words, the rule applied to non-VIP males
driving a private petrol or diesel car.

There were benefits to the programme. Congestion got a lot better, for a
start. But it would have been clear to anyone that had studied the numbers
that this was not going to bring Delhi’s pollution under control. To do that,
the sources of pollution that trump cars would have been a better place to
start. That includes winter crop-burning, when farmers prepare their fields
for the new wheat season by burning the leftover stubble from their rice
harvest; industrial fumes in the city; dust from surrounding areas; diesel
generators for energy; and the burning of coal and wood in homes.32
Globally our emissions come from a handful of sources. The first is
burning wood or charcoal for energy or burning crops in the field. This is
one of the biggest sources at lower incomes, and a big contributor to indoor
and outdoor pollution. Then we have emissions from agriculture, with the
ammonia and nitrogen gases that come from manure and fertilisers. The
next is burning fossil fuels for electricity. Then emissions from industry –
the fumes leaking out of chemical plants, metal manufacturers and textile
factories. Finally, we have transport – the cars we drive, but also the trucks,
ships and planes that carry goods around the world.

To get air pollution close to zero everywhere, we need to knock these
sources off one by one.

How to get air pollution close to zero everywhere
The solution to air pollution – as we saw earlier – follows just one basic
principle: stop burning stuff. We need to find a way of producing energy
without burning things. Or, if we do, we need to capture the particles safely
and make sure they don’t make it out into the atmosphere. Many countries
are not far away from this step. The world’s poorest are lagging behind, but
they could already get pretty far by burning different things for energy.

(1) Give everyone access to clean cooking fuels
Not everything we burn creates the same amount of pollution. Wood is
worse than coal; coal is worse than kerosene; kerosene is worse than gas.

This process of moving from one form of energy to another is called
climbing the ‘energy ladder’. The world’s poorest still rely on wood as their
main (possibly only) source of energy. This puts them at the bottom of the
ladder. Once they get a bit richer, they might start to burn charcoal, then a
bit later, coal. These solid fuels are still terribly polluting, and toxic for
those inhaling the emissions every day. What’s shocking is that this is the
reality for around 40% of the world’s population – more than three billion
people.

No one in the world should be on this rung of the energy ladder.

Everyone should have access to clean fuels for cooking and heating. The
fact that billions of people don’t means this should be one of the
environmental movement’s top priorities. Our first step towards clean air is
a tried-and-tested one: reduce poverty and make sure no one is using old,
traditional fuels.

The ‘Energy Ladder’
The dominant energy source for cooking and heating, by level of income.

(2) End winter crop-burning
Crop-burning is a seasonal contributor to local air pollution in India.33, 34
October and November are the changeover months for farmers, when they
harvest their rice and get ready to plant wheat. The planting window is short
– the first two weeks of November – which means they need to quickly get
rid of the straw from the rice crop that has been left behind in the field. The
easy thing to do is burn it. Easy for the farmer, but costly for the country.

All the farmers do this at the same time, and the surrounding cities are filled
with pollution.

There are some possible solutions. The waste residue could be gathered
up to be used for animal feed or other materials. Or farmers could be
encouraged to plant a different rotation of crops. There are also some
technological solutions. A tractor-like machine called the Happy Seeder can
cut and lift the rice straw, sow the wheat underneath, then put the straw
back on top as organic manure. The Indian government has tried to support
the Happy Seeder by offering subsidies for farmers to buy one. And studies
have shown that these types of technologies can be profitable for the
farmer.

35 The problem is that it’s an expensive upfront investment, and an
ongoing cost for the farmer to maintain, for a piece of kit that’s only used
for 15 days a year.

To reach the scale that’s needed to put a dent in crop-burning, subsidies
from the Indian government would need to be substantial. Still, it would be
a massive benefit economically and environmentally. When weighing up
the price of taking action, we tend to compare it to the alternative of
investing nothing at all. But that’s wrong. There are societal costs to not
taking action that we forget to factor in. We might think that spending
hundreds of millions of dollars is expensive. But that’s because we ignore
the alternative: the costs of not fixing the problem.

There is no single estimate of how much air pollution costs us in
monetary terms; it depends on what ‘price’ we put on poor health and early
death. But most studies come up with a similar order of magnitude: trillions
of dollars are lost globally every year from ill health, sick days, loss of
productivity, crop losses and other ‘hidden’ impacts.36 In a 2022 report by
the World Bank, this figure was $8.1 trillion, which was equal to 6% of
global GDP.

37 In India, the cost of air pollution in 2019 was estimated at
$350 billion: that’s 10% of its GDP. We can look away and pretend these
societal costs don’t exist, but they’ll keep racking up a bill until we solve it.

(3) Remove the sulphur from fossil fuels
Coal will eventually be a fuel of the past, but it’s still going to take some
time for the world to move away from it completely. In the meantime,
people will continue to die from the pollution it creates, so we should do
what we can to limit this.

The sulphuric haze that hangs over Delhi and Mumbai doesn’t have to
be there. We already have a fix for it: capturing the sulphur dioxide that
comes out of coal power plants. Power plants need to add a ‘scrubber’ to
the smokestack. For example, add limestone and the sulphur dioxide in the
gas reacts to form a solid that you can capture.

Scrubbers can remove at least 90% of sulphur dioxide, hence the
nosedive in pollution in many countries over the last 50 years. A power
plant with these technologies is more expensive than one without them.

That’s why rich countries all have them, and poor countries don’t. But just
as we saw with China, each will reach its tipping point. When it does, the
solutions are ready and waiting. We can just scrub the sulphur away.

(4) Which is the cleanest car to drive?
When most of us think about air pollution in our cities, we picture bumperto-bumper cars idling in traffic. News stories about air pollution nearly
always cut to B-roll footage of fumes coming out of car exhausts. So most
of us know that the pollution from our cars is bad for our health.

In the UK, this attention was ramped up in 2015 when ‘Dieselgate’ (also
called ‘Emissionsgate’) hit the headlines. Many countries put strict policies
on how much pollution vehicles can generate, so they have to meet certain
air-quality standards to be sold on the market. In 2015, it was revealed that
one of the world’s leading car companies, Volkswagen, had been cheating.

They had programmed the engine’s pollution controls in many of their cars
to only run when the cars were being tested. During the test, these controls
kicked in and they passed. When the cars were let loose on the road, the
controls stopped working. Their emissions were well over the legal limit.

This scandal not only put a temporary dent in Volkswagen’s reputation, but
it also put the limelight on the emissions spewing out of our cars.

Some governments tried to push consumers towards diesel cars. The
rationale was that diesel cars emitted less CO2 per kilometre than petrol
cars. Moving from petrol to diesel would be good for the climate. But this
didn’t quite go to plan, and many of the governments eventually made a Uturn. This was partly triggered by the Dieselgate scandal, but also because it
emerged that diesel cars emitted quite a lot more of the local pollutants that
get lodged in our lungs than petrol cars. The dilemma was to decide what
matters more: climate change or local air pollution that damages our health.

Then it was discovered that diesel cars don’t in fact emit much less CO2
than petrol cars. Diesel cars need to be fitted with technologies to reduce
their emissions of local pollutants, and that comes at an energy cost. That
added cost takes away a lot of the climate benefits. Some studies suggest
that diesel cars are worse for both climate and local air pollution.38
Diesel cars are few and far between in the US, so American consumers
have escaped the petrol versus diesel dilemma. But what is the right
decision for consumers elsewhere? When it comes to diesel versus petrol,
the difference often isn’t huge. What plays a bigger role is how old the car
is. Modern petrol and diesel cars are much cleaner than their older cousins.

Emissions standards have become stricter and filtering technologies much
better. But, as we’ll see in the next chapter, the debate on petrol versus
diesel is quickly becoming outdated. Fossil fuel-powered cars are on their
way out. Electric cars and car-free living are making their breakthrough. We
should ditch the old technologies soon, and make that switch as quickly as
possible. It will save many thousands of lives every year.

(5) Drive less; cycle, walk and take public transport
We can debate which type of car causes the least pollution, but this misses
the solution that trumps them all: not driving at all. If it’s doable for you,
ditching the car for a bike or a walk is one of the best ways individuals can
reduce air pollution (and climate change). The congestion and pollution
benefits for the city become crystal clear any time you see a line of cyclists
roll past a queue of idling cars, fumes spewing out the back of the tailpipe.

This is both an individual and societal responsibility. Many of us have
the option to leave the car at home when our destination is within cycling or
walking distance. There are safe routes for us to use. We are healthy enough
to do so. It’s personal choice that stops us. After walking and cycling, the
next best thing is to go for public transport.

But some don’t have this option. Work is too far from home. There are
no cycle lanes, and sometimes no pavements to walk on. Public transport
systems are old. Buses and trains are late, unreliable and only come every
few hours (if they come at all). The lack of infrastructure forces people into
their cars.

We should be more ambitious about how we imagine our cities, towns
and transport systems in 2040 or 2050. They could be built around
pedestrians and cyclists, not cars. In my dream world, there would be no
need to own a car, especially if it does nothing 23 hours a day. We could
create networks of driverless, low-carbon Ubers that serve the city. When
you do need a ride, press a button on an app, and a clean, autonomous
vehicle will swing by to pick you up. If governments and planners think
about this carefully, this could even be a form of public transport. The
health and economic benefits would be massive.

(6) Ditch fossil fuels for renewables and nuclear
Cleaning up our coal power stations and putting filtration technologies in
our cars has got us pretty far. These measures can help us achieve pollution
levels that are just a fraction of what they were in the past.

But they are not enough. Even in the richest countries, most of us are
still breathing air that shortens our lives. Our children are breathing air that
might affect their concentration and learning potential. Just because things
aren’t as bad as they were in the past doesn’t mean we have to accept the
status quo. We deserve better. If we’re to stamp out air pollution completely
we need to stop burning fossil fuels.

The good news is that we need to do this anyway if we’re to tackle
climate change. That means we can fix two big problems at the same time.

In fact, people demanding clean air from their governments might be an
important way to accelerate climate action. When Beijing or Delhi is hidden
under a cloak of haze, people can’t ignore it.

When we ditch fossil fuels, what energy sources should we shift to? On
this, I’m more agnostic than most. In the environmental community, there is
an intense rivalry between two camps: pro-nuclear and pro-renewables. The
fights between these tribes get surprisingly fierce. To me, this rivalry is
frustrating and counterproductive.

Nuclear energy and renewable sources, like solar, hydropower and wind,
are all low-carbon. The reason they don’t emit zero CO2
is that we still need
energy and materials to build the panels and turbines in the first place. But
compared to fossil fuels they emit very little. Switching from fossil fuels to
any of these sources is such an obvious win for the climate. And switching
to nuclear or renewables would stop deaths from air pollution, so it’s a big
win for global health too.

One of the biggest misconceptions is that nuclear power is unsafe. In
fact, it’s one of the safest sources of energy. Over the last 60 years there
have been only two major nuclear accidents: Chernobyl in Ukraine in 1986,
and Fukushima in Japan in 2011. When we think about nuclear power, it is
these two terrible incidents that come to mind. When I polled my friends
about how many people had died in them, the most popular guess was
hundreds of thousands. The numbers are actually much smaller.

39
When we combine the direct deaths from the Chernobyl explosion, and
the potential deaths from cancer cases caused by the radiation, the accident
is likely to have caused up to 400 deaths.40, 41 Every one of those deaths is
tragic, but they’re much fewer than most imagine, especially given the fact
that this was the worst nuclear disaster in history and is unlikely to be
repeated. The Chernobyl reactors were an old and unsafe design, and the
secrecy of the Soviet Union at the time meant the response to the disaster
was slow.

In 2011, the Fukushima nuclear plant in Japan was hit by a tsunami after
the country’s largest recorded earthquake. Remarkably, no one died directly
from the incident. Several years later, the government announced that one
man died from lung cancer which might be linked to the disaster. Overall,
that is quite remarkable: a nuclear power plant was hit by a tsunami and
there was only one possible death. However, the government does attribute
around 2,700 premature deaths to the stress and disruption of evacuation
from Fukushima in the years that followed.

When the deaths from Chernobyl and Fukushima are combined, it’s
estimated that a few thousand people have died from nuclear power over its
history.

Does that make it safer or more dangerous than other sources of power?
Death rates – how many people have died per unit of electricity production
– from nuclear, solar and wind are all very low.

42 And there is not much
difference between them. Hydropower is also pretty safe, though its one
major incident – the 1975 Banqiao Dam Failure in China, which killed
171,000 – pushes its death rate up quite a bit.

Look at the chart below and see how the alternatives compare to fossil
fuels. Air pollution from coal kills thousands of times as many people per
unit of electricity production. Oil kills thousands of times more than nuclear
and renewables.

Those who squabble about whether nuclear death rates are a little bit
higher than solar, or a little bit lower, or whether solar is more deadly than
wind are completely missing the point. Separating these is like splitting
hairs. The big headline is that all of them kill far, far fewer people than any
fossil fuel. Millions die from fossil fuels every year, with estimates ranging
from 3.6 to 8.7 million – 1 to 2.5 million come from electricity, and most of
it from coal.43 Nuclear and renewables are hundreds, if not thousands, of
times safer. And, importantly, they all emit very little CO2
, so are much
safer for our climate too.

Renewables and nuclear energy are much safer and better for the climate than fossil fuels
Fossil fuels kill millions every year from air pollution, and also emit far more greenhouse gases per
unit of electricity.

When it comes to saving lives, it does not matter what low-carbon
source we transition to. We just need to get off fossil fuels, in any way we
can. We need to keep our existing nuclear plants in operation. Build some
more in countries where this is affordable and they have technological
expertise. Put solar panels on roofs. Put solar panels and wind turbines on
deserted land.

If we want to squeeze out these final sources of air pollution we need to
transition to low-carbon energy, and shift our cars to electric. Until recently,
this transition seemed impossible because batteries, solar panels and electric
cars were far too expensive. This is changing, and it’s changing fast.

Things to stress less about
Every day I come across motivated and thoughtful people trying to do their
best for the environment. They think about the environmental impact of
almost every decision they make. Or they home in on some things that they
think will make a huge difference. What’s heart-breaking is that this energy
and stress is often wasted: what they’re doing makes almost no difference,
and, as we’ll see later, occasionally makes things worse.

I said I would be clear about which things we should stress less about.

But in this chapter, I won’t be listing things to stress less about. Because
there are two problems I think people should stress a little more about. Air
pollution is one of them (the other is biodiversity loss). We worry a lot
about climate change, and the fact that it could kill many people in the
future. But air pollution is already killing millions every year and has done
so for a long time. Cutting out fossil fuels now would have an immediate
impact. It would save lives, and people living in highly polluted cities like
Delhi, Lahore or Dhaka would instantly see the difference. They could
breathe again. Reducing air pollution is one of the most impactful ways that
we can stop people from dying. That’s something we should be thinking a
lot more about.

Are there things that individuals – beyond walking, cycling, using public
transport and electric cars – should be doing more of? The first obvious one
is speaking up. Demanding clean air so that governments make it a priority.

At the beginning of the chapter, we saw the power of speaking up in
Beijing. The Chinese government took note and was forced into action. We
already have most of the tools and knowledge we need to reduce air
pollution. What’s missing is money on the table and the political will to act.

That’s something we can influence.

The second is making sure that we resist the temptation to return to
behaviours that seem environmentally friendly but are not. As I write, the
UK is seeing a surge in popularity for open wood fires and stoves. These
seem like an eco-friendly way to heat your home – it’s what we used to do
before we started burning fossil fuels – and feel more ‘natural’ and
‘primitive’. But burning wood is what many of the world’s poorest are
trying to move away from. It creates large amounts of pollution inside your
house, and also contributes to pollution outdoors. It’s much worse than gas
or electricity. Burning these solid fuels was once a massive problem that we
solved. Let’s resist the temptation to roll back this progress: it might feel
like the eco-friendly thing to do, but the data tells us that it’s not.

Footnotes
i It’s important to note that this was not a just or seamless transition. In the first winter, many
households had their coal boilers taken away, but did not yet have gas replacements. Many families
were left without heating for the year.

ii Seneca, technically named Seneca the Younger, was born in Hispania, part of modern-day Spain.

But he spent most of his life in Rome.

iii We don’t know exactly when early humans discovered fire. There is archaeological evidence of
widespread use of fire hundreds of thousands of years ago. However, there are also more localised
pieces of evidence that its discovery might be as early as 1.5 to 2 million years ago.

iv We’re focusing on the Kuznets Curve of environmental problems here, but this theory of things
getting worse before they get better is not just applicable to the environment. In fact, the original
Kuznets Curve was about income inequality: Simon Kuznets hypothesised that inequality got worse
as a country industrialised, but then fell again as the country got much richer.

v Globally, around 15,000 people die from disasters each year. This figure can vary from year to year,
usually depending on whether there have been any large earthquakes, which are the deadliest disaster
events today. They are the hardest to predict and prepare for.

3
Climate Change
Turning down the thermostat
‘Scientists say temperatures could rise by 6°C by 2100 and call for action
ahead of UN meeting in Paris’
– Independent, 20151
A world that was 6°C warmer than it is today would be devastating. And
remember, 6°C is just the average. Some parts of the world would get much
warmer, especially the poles. Crops would fail. Many people would be
malnourished. Forests would be stripped back into savannahs. Island
nations would be completely submerged. Many cities will have disappeared
due to sea-level rise. Climate refugees will be on the move. ‘Normal’
temperatures in many parts of the world would be unbearable. Even the
richest, most temperate nations would see devastating floods most winters,
and baking summers. We would be at very high risk of setting off warming
feedback loops – the melted ice would reflect less sunlight, the melted
permafrost might unlock methane from the bottom of the ocean, and dying
forests wouldn’t be able to regrow to suck carbon out of the atmosphere. A
6°C warmer world might be short-lived – it could quickly spiral into 8°C,
10°C or more. It would be a massive humanitarian disaster.

Only a few years ago I thought this was where we were headed. Forget
1.5°C or 2°C – we were destined for 4, 5 or 6°C and there was nothing we
could do about it. Most people still think that this is the path we’re
following. Thankfully, it’s not.

In 2015, I went to Paris for the big, famous climate conference, COP21.

Representatives and policymakers from every country came together to
hash out a new climate deal. The previous goal of the international
agreement was to keep the global average temperature rise below 2°C by
the end of the century. So I couldn’t believe it when there were rumours that
a target of 1.5°C was being discussed. Were they crazy? At that point, I had
already given up on the prospects of 2°C. It was so far out of our reach. The
notion that we could keep the rise below 1.5°C seemed delusional. And yet
the target made it into the final agreement. Mostly as an aspiration, but it
was in there nonetheless. The world pledged to ‘limit global warming to
“well below” 2°C above pre-industrial levels and also, if possible, “pursue”
efforts to cap warming at 1.5°C’.

My perspective on 1.5°C hasn’t shifted much since then. Without a
major, unexpected technological breakthrough, we will go past this target.

Nearly all the climate scientists I know agree: they obviously want to cap
warming at 1.5°C, but very few think it will happen. This doesn’t stop them
fighting for it, though; they know that every 0.1°C matters, and is worth
working for. But my perspective on 2°C has changed. I’m now cautiously
optimistic that we can get close to it. It’s more likely than not that we will
pass 2°C, but perhaps not by much. And there is still a reasonable chance –
if we really step up to the challenge – that we can stay below it.

My perspective flipped quickly after studying the data, not newspaper
headlines. I didn’t focus on where we are today, but on the pace that things
have moved at in the last few years, and what this means for the future. One
organisation – the Climate Action Tracker – follows every country’s climate
policies, and its pledges and targets. It combines them all to map out what
will happen to the global climate. At Our World in Data I sketch out these
future climate trajectories, and update them every year. Every time they get
closer and closer to the pathways we would need to follow to stay below
2°C.

If we stick with the climate policies that countries currently have in
place, we’re heading towards a world of 2.5 to 2.9°C warming.2 Let me be
clear: this is terrible and we have to avoid it. But countries have pledged to
go much further. They’ve committed to making their policies much more
ambitious. If each country was to follow through on their climate pledges,
we’d come out at 2.1°C by 2100.

What’s most promising is how these pathways have shifted over time. In
a world without climate policies, we’d be heading towards 4 or 5°C, at
least. This is the path that most people still think we’re on. That would be a
scary world indeed. Thankfully, over time, countries have stepped up their
commitments. As we saw with the example of the ozone layer, incremental
increases in ambition can make a huge difference.

The other big change is that moving to a low-carbon, sustainable
economy is not seen as the sacrifice it used to be. Fossil fuels were far
cheaper than renewables. Electric vehicles cost a fortune. But now lowcarbon technologies are becoming cost-competitive. It now makes financial
sense to take the climate-friendly path. Leaders have become more
optimistic about how the landscape is changing. We are still some distance
from a 2°C pathway. We need to step up our efforts – and quickly. But as it
becomes more and more realistic, I’m confident we can keep moving closer
to it.

How much warmer will the world get?
Projected warming by 2100 relative to pre-industrial temperatures based on different scenarios of
climate policies.

When I was in my early teens I thought most of us were going to die from
climate change. I tried to convince my classmates of this too. For my
English oral exam I held up a map of all of the cities and coastlines that
were going to sink by the end of the century. I showed projected satellite
images of the wildfires that would ravage the globe. In trying to light
flames of interest, I simply added fire to my own anxieties.

By the time I reached Edinburgh University, I was being flooded with
images every day. Some from my university lectures, which, given the fact
I’d chosen a degree in earth sciences, was expected. But, more importantly,
my obsession for environmental sciences was growing in tandem with the
uptick in the frequency of reporting. The more determined I became to stay
informed, the quicker the stories came at me, often accompanied by streams
of recorded videos. I didn’t have to imagine the pain of the victims, I could
see and hear it too. As a responsible citizen, I wanted to stay informed. I
had to know what the latest disaster was. To switch off from them seemed
like a betrayal to the lives that were lost.

With reports of disasters coming at me faster every day, it seemed that
things must be getting worse. Climate change was driving an intensification
of disasters, and more people were dying than ever before.

Or so I thought. The problem was that I mistook the increase in the
frequency of reporting as an increase in the frequency of disasters. I
mistook an increase in the intensity of my second-hand suffering for an
increase in the intensity of global suffering. In reality I had no idea what
was happening. Were disasters getting worse? Were there more this year
than last? Were there more people dying than ever before?
After Hans Rosling taught me that extreme poverty and child mortality
were falling and education and life expectancy were rising, I went looking
for other areas where my preconceptions might be wrong. I started with
data on ‘natural’ disasters. I would have bet a lot of money that more people
were dying from disasters today than a century ago. I was completely
wrong. Death rates from disasters have actually fallen since the first half of
the 20th century. And not just by a little bit. They have fallen roughly 10-
fold.3, 4
It’s at this point that I should make one thing clear: none of the above
means that climate change is not happening. The decline in deaths from
disasters does not mean that disasters are getting weaker or less common.

Deniers often misuse this data to downplay the existence or risks of climate
change. But that’s not what the data shows us at all.

In the past it was common for disasters to claim millions of lives a year.

The 1920s, 30s and 40s were particularly bad. There were a few large
earthquakes which claimed many lives: China, Japan, Pakistan, Turkey and
Italy were all hit by a series of earthquakes that cost tens of thousands of
lives. The most lethal – the 1920 earthquake that struck the Gansu province
in China – is estimated to have killed 180,000 people. But it was drought
and floods which were the most deadly. China endured a number of large
floods and droughts through the 1920s and 30s, which often led to
widespread famine and killed millions at a time.

Today the annual death toll is much smaller, usually between 10,000 and
20,000. Sometimes there are particularly devastating years where the toll is
much higher – like 2010, when the annual death toll was over 300,000 with
most deaths resulting from the Haitian earthquake.

When I zoomed out and saw these trends, I felt stupid. I also felt
cheated. I had been duped by an education system that was supposed to
teach me about the world. I was a diligent student. I won medals for coming
top for everything from earth materials to sedimentology, atmospheric
science to oceanography. I could create complex diagrams of seismic faults,
I could recite the chemical formulas of pages of minerals from memory, but
if you’d asked me to draw a graph of what was happening to deaths from
disasters, I’d have sketched it upside down.

Far fewer people are dying from natural disasters than in the past
Death rates from ‘natural’ disasters, measured as the number of deaths per decade per 100,000
people.

Deaths have fallen – not because disasters have become less frequent or severe, but because our
infrastructure, monitoring and response systems have become much more resilient to them.

I wasn’t alone in my ignorance. In the 2017 Gapminder Misconception
Study, the public, across 14 countries, were asked 12 key questions, one of
which was:
How did the number of deaths per year from natural disasters change
over the last hundred years?
A: More than doubled
B: Remained more or less the same
C: Decreased to less than half
Just 10% got the right answer: C. The most popular answer, 48% of the
vote, was A.

My fear is that this disconnect has only got worse since then. Climate
change gets more attention, and rightly so. But reporting has become more
frictionless. Some media outlets even see the frequency of stories as their
key performance metric. ‘With a piece of environmental journalism
published every three hours, the Guardian is a leading voice in the fight to
save the planet’ reads a large banner plastered across the newspaper’s
website.5
In other words, the Guardian wants to fire as many crushing
stories as possible, as quickly as it can. The faster it does this, the more
committed it is to ‘saving the planet’. It’s an anxiety-inducing feed, and one
that inevitably leads us to the conclusion that things are getting worse and
worse.

The falling death rates shouldn’t downplay the risks of climate change.

Instead, it shows us that humans are capable of solving problems. A century
ago, floods and droughts would lead to severe famines that killed millions.6
Food insecurity is certainly still a major problem – we’ll look at this in
Chapter 5 – but severe famines are almost a thing of the past. Our
infrastructure is now built to withstand earthquakes. We can predict and
track incoming hurricanes. We can evacuate, before it’s too late. When
disaster does strike, we can respond quickly. At home, we set up emergency
shelters and rebuild communities. Abroad, we facilitate international
support networks. We send in the world’s best experts and ship packages of
essential goods.

Building resilience, and predicting and responding to disasters costs
money. Our success in reducing their impacts comes from an increase in
knowledge and scientific understanding. Meteorologists can model storm
tracks. Engineers work with seismologists to design buildings that can
withstand extreme forces. Agricultural innovations mean that our food
systems can weather and bounce back from shocks. But the success also
comes from being a lot richer. These sophisticated networks and
infrastructure need money. There’s no point in designing quake-proof
buildings if no one can afford them. No point in planning escape routes if
there are no roads to drive on, or vehicles to drive in. No point in designing
new farming techniques if farmers cannot afford the seeds and fertilisers.

Fewer people die from disasters today because the world is richer.

But not everyone is richer, and this is the biggest risk of climate change.

Also, it’s not inevitable that deaths from disasters will keep going down.

There is a real chance that climate change will reverse this trend. But not if
we can slow climate change and stop it in its tracks.

Now we’re going to look at what we can do to tackle climate change. For
this to make sense, we have to accept two things: climate change is
happening, and human emissions of greenhouse gases are responsible. The
existence of climate change is not a question that I’m going to argue here –
I don’t have time or space, and many others have done so already. Second,
we don’t have time. By ‘we’ I mean all of us, collectively. The time for
debating whether climate change is or isn’t happening is over. We need to
move past it to the question of what we’re going to do about it.

How we got to now
From forests to fossil fuels
Carbon emissions started rising rapidly after the Industrial Revolution. But
humans have been tinkering with the balance of gases in the atmosphere for
tens of thousands of years. Our carbon dioxide emissions come from two
main sources: burning fossil fuels and changing the use of land. When we
cut down trees we release biological carbon into the atmosphere. As we’ll
see in the next chapter, deforestation is far from a recent phenomenon.

Humans have been reshaping the world’s landscapes for thousands of years,
and releasing carbon at the same time.

If we look at estimates for how much carbon we have released over the
last 10,000 years through deforestation and the conversion of grasslands
into farmland, it amounts to around 1,400 billion tonnes of CO2
.

7 So, our
ancestors were slowly tweaking the Earth’s thermostat for millennia, even
before we started to dig fossil fuels out of the ground.

Until the 1700s, people could only really get energy from three main
sources: their livestock, wood from forests and human power. But these
sources don’t scale very well: we don’t have unlimited forests, and there’s
only so much a human can do. Human development was hindered by not
having a scalable source of energy. Then we discovered coal.

In the UK – the birthplace of the Industrial Revolution – coal
consumption slowly rose through the 18th century into the early 19th.8
Then it really picked up speed. Other countries across Europe and the US
got involved. By 1900, emissions in the UK had hit 10 tonnes per person.9
In the US, as much as 14 tonnes. Compare that to just five tonnes in China,
and around one tonne in India today. It’s not hard to see why many growing
economies get mad when the rich world tells them to stop burning coal.

Per capita coal emissions are a fraction of rich countries in the past
Per capita emissions are measured in tonnes of carbon dioxide (CO2
) per person.

China and India are seen as big emitters today, but per capita emissions are just a fraction of
emissions in the UK and US in the past.

By the middle of the 20th century, the world had unlocked the power of oil,
and then natural gas. We could not only generate electricity, we could also
scale up transport and transition to cleaner ways to heat our homes.

The global population was growing rapidly, and people were getting
richer. Fossil fuels meant progress. People in the 1950s weren’t thinking
‘let’s screw over the generations that come after us by locking us into an
energy system built on coal and oil’. Fossil fuels were the route to a better
life.

Historically, the richer you were, the more CO2 you would emit, and it
was mostly rich countries that were responsible for the world’s carbon
emissions. That changed in the second half of the 20th century when
booming economies started to emerge. The rise of China, India, Indonesia,
Malaysia, Thailand and South Africa has been a human triumph. It has
alleviated massive amounts of poverty and suffering. But it has been
powered by fossil fuels and added hundreds of billions of tonnes of CO2
to
the atmosphere. At the same time, many richer countries have started to
reduce their emissions, while getting even richer at the same time. With
low- and middle-income countries coming up, and rich countries coming
down, the world’s carbon emissions per capita have started to converge.

Where we are today
Total emissions are still rising, but emissions per person have peaked
The world has already passed the peak of per capita emissions. It happened
a decade ago. Most people are unaware of this.

In 2012, the world topped out at 4.9 tonnes per person.10 Since then, per
capita emissions have been slowly falling. Nowhere near fast enough, but
falling nonetheless. This is a signal that the peak in our total (not per capita)
CO2 emissions is coming. This is the case with any metric in a world with
an increasing population. Per capita measures will peak first, then it’s a tugof-war over whether our impacts per person will fall more quickly than the
population is growing.

We are very close. Emissions increased rapidly in the 1960s and 70s,
then again in the 1990s and early 2000s. But in recent years this growth has
slowed down a lot. Emissions barely increased at all from 2018 to 2019.

And they actually fell in 2020 as a result of the Covid-19 pandemic. I’m
optimistic we can peak global emissions in the 2020s.

Global per capita CO2
 emissions have peaked; total emissions will peak soon too
Carbon dioxide emissions from fossil fuels and industry. Land-use change isn’t included.

Who emits the most greenhouse gases?
If we want to peak then reduce our emissions, we need to know where
they’re coming from. Who’s responsible? It seems like a straightforward
question, but there is no simple answer. It’s not doing the sums that’s the
problem – I have all of the numbers to hand. The problem is agreeing on
what ‘responsibility’ actually means. There are so many metrics we can use
to compare countries, and people never agree on which are best.

Are we talking about how much each country emits per year or per
capita? What about a country’s historical responsibility – should we tally up
all its emissions over time? Then there is the thorny issue of trade: if the
UK buys something that was manufactured in China, should it be China or
the UK that adds those emissions to its account? In the end, there is no
single ‘right’ answer.

It’s good to get some perspective on these numbers, so let’s look at how
different countries or regions stack up.i China tops the emissions list. This is
not surprising because it’s home to the most people. It emits around 29% of
the world’s emissions. The US is in second place at 14%. The European
Union (which tends to participate in climate negotiations as a group) is next
at 8%, followed by India at 7%, and then Russia at 5%.

We can already see the inequalities. India is responsible for 7% of
emissions but is home to 18% of the world population. The US contributes
14% of emissions but is home to just 4% of people. It is almost a direct
mirror image of the entire continent of Africa, which is home to 17% of the
world’s population but emits just 4%. The disparities get even more extreme
when we zoom into particular countries and compare their emissions per
person.

The picture is also skewed when we look at each country’s historical
responsibility. To do this we add up all of a country’s emissions since 1750.

The US is way out in front, having contributed 25% of the world’s
emissions. The EU comes in second at 17%. China slips down the list to
third place, having contributed only half as much as the US. India is even
further down, having emitted just 3%.

These perspectives can be useful. But when we turn climate change into
a blame game, there is no end to it. People are not really fighting about the
numbers. They’re fighting about what numbers they should be using in the
first place. If they don’t agree on that – which they often don’t – the fight
goes nowhere useful. This battle has plagued international climate
agreements for decades. The US and EU blame China and India, who then
pick another (very reasonable) metric and fire it back.

Which countries have contributed the most to climate change?
Carbon dioxide emissions from fossil fuels and industry. Land-use change isn’t included.

Richer people emit more, but that’s not the whole story
Some countries in sub-Saharan Africa contribute almost nothing to the
world’s emissions. The average person in Chad emits just 0.06 tonnes of
CO2 per year. In an entire year they emit the same amount as the average
American does in just a day and a half. If you don’t have access to fossil
fuels, electricity, a car or industry, then your carbon footprint is going to be
extremely low.

As we get richer we gain access to these things, and our emissions
increase. But that’s not the full story. We see large differences in emissions
among rich countries. Culture, transport infrastructure and our choices of
energy sources matter a lot. Living standards in Sweden are just as good as
they are in the US, if not higher. Yet the average Swede emits just onequarter of the emissions of the average American, and half as much as the
average German. And some middle-income countries – such as China and
South Africa – have now overtaken many richer countries across Europe in
per capita emissions. And this is not just because rich countries have
exported their emissions elsewhere.

Sweden and France, with lots of nuclear power and hydropower, have
very low-carbon electricity grids. They don’t have the massive transport
emissions of the US. Living well does not need to come at a high cost for
the climate.

There are large differences in CO2
 emissions per person, even among rich countries
Carbon dioxide emissions from fossil fuels and industry, measured in tonnes per year. Land-use
change isn’t included.

More sustainable than my grandma: many countries have already reduced
their emissions
One of the simple things that bring me the most joy in life is getting an
email from my grandma. My gran is in her mid-eighties, and can almost
work an iPad. By ‘work’ I mean do the basics of looking at a photograph,
and sending an email. She doesn’t have an iPhone, a laptop or a
smartwatch. My grandpa rejects all modern technology, except television.

Their life is very similar to how it was a few decades ago.

This has created something of a divide between the generations on
climate change. Many see the lifestyles of youngsters as the problem. We
spend all day on energy-guzzling gadgets. We flock to dense cities with no
gardens or green space. We buy lots of stuff and don’t bother to repair it.

We never ration food, and waste too much of it.

Yet my carbon footprint is less than half that of my grandparents’ when
they were my age. When my grandparents were in their twenties, the
average person in the UK emitted 11 tonnes of CO2 per year. We now emit
less than 5 tonnes. The gap between me and my parents is equally wide.

From the 1950s to the 1990s, emissions in the UK changed very little. It’s
only since then – in my lifetime – that emissions have plummeted.

This seems hard to believe. How can my lifestyle today be more
sustainable than in the 1950s? I won’t pretend that I am as frugal as my
grandparents. I’m more wasteful. I turn the heating on more readily. I spend
many more hours powering gadgets from the electricity grid. Still, I use
much less energy and emit much less carbon.

Technology has made that possible. In 1900, nearly all of the UK’s
energy came from coal, and by 1950 it was still supplying over 90%. Now
coal supplies less than 2% of our electricity, and the government has
pledged to phase it out completely by 2025. Coal is now almost dead in its
birthplace, where it all began. It has been replaced with other sources of
energy: gas, then nuclear, and now a transition to wind, solar and other
renewable sources.

That means that for every unit of energy we consume, we emit much
less CO2
. But that’s not the only change. We also use much less energy
overall. Per capita energy use has fallen by around 25% since the 1960s.

Year after year, more efficient gadgets have come into our lives. First, it
was improvements in the energy ratings of white goods, then it was the
trend of replacing inefficient light bulbs. Then it was double-glazed
windows and home insulation to stop heat leaking out into the street. When
I was a kid our family television – we ‘only’ had one – was a massive box
that seemed to be two metres deep. The screen was so small you had to sit
really close to see anything. Our car was a gas guzzler. Not a gas guzzler
like we see with SUVs today. My parents would never have bought one of
those. No, our car was second-hand and it was a ‘banger’. It was inefficient:
you could hear the engine roar, and feel it overheating. The miles per gallon
were terrible.

These massive strides in technology mean that we use much less energy
than we did in the past, despite appearing to lead much more extravagant
energy-intensive lifestyles. The notion that we need to be frugal to live a
low-carbon life is simply wrong. In the UK we now emit about the same as
someone in the 1850s. I emit the same as my great-great-greatgrandparents. And I have a much, much higher standard of living.

Like the UK, emissions are falling quickly across most rich countries. Per
capita emissions in the US and Germany have fallen by a third since the
1970s. They’ve more than halved in France, and fallen by almost two-thirds
in Sweden.

And yet very few people know that emissions are falling. Recently one
of my climate scientist peers – Jonathan Foley – polled his followers on
Twitter.

11 He asked what had happened to emissions in the US over the last
15 years. Had they:
a. Increased by more than 20%
b. Increased by 10%
c. Stayed the same
d. Fallen by 20%
My carbon footprint is half that of my grandparents
Per capita CO2
 emissions in the UK, measured as the average tonnes per person.

Thousands of people answered. Two-thirds of people picked (a) or (b). Just
19% picked the correct answer (d). No wonder people think we’re screwed.

Many countries have grown their economies while reducing their emissions
– and not because they’re sending their emissions overseas
When I mention that emissions in rich countries are falling, the common
response I get is that they ‘aren’t really reducing their emissions, they’re
just sending them overseas’. Since CO2 emissions are usually counted
based on the country that they’re produced in, maybe rich countries are
doing some devious accounting to make themselves look good. If they get
China, India, Indonesia or Bangladesh to produce their stuff for them, then
they don’t have to include these emissions in their reports. That would
make rich countries look good, but would actually achieve nothing for the
climate. The climate doesn’t care whether CO2
is emitted in the UK or in
China. It only cares about the total amount.

This ‘offshoring’ of emissions is an important concern. But, thankfully,
it is not the whole story. Researchers can use trade data across the world to
adjust for the carbon that is emitted in the production of goods that are
exported or imported.12, 13 When we account for all these traded goods we
get what are called ‘consumption-based emissions’: for the UK, these not
only reflect the emissions produced within the UK’s borders but also those
involved in all of the goods it imports from overseas.

In the UK, GDP per capita has increased by around 50% since 1990.ii
Domestic emissions have halved. Consumption-based emissions – those
that adjust for ‘offshoring’ – have fallen by a third. It’s not true that the UK
has sent all its emissions overseas. The reductions in emissions are real –
whether they are counted domestically or internationally. It’s the same
across most rich countries. In Germany, both domestic and consumptionbased emissions have fallen by a third. GDP per capita has increased by
50%. In France, consumption-based emissions have fallen by a quarter,
GDP per capita increased by a third. In the US, since 2005, emissions have
fallen by a quarter both domestically and when we adjust for offshoring.

Many countries have decoupled economic growth from CO2
 emissions
Shown is the change in gross domestic product (GDP) and CO2
 emissions per capita between 1990
and 2019.

CO2
 emissions are shown as production-based domestic emissions, and separately as emissions
which adjust for international trade and offshoring.

This is a narrative that rarely makes it into the headlines. Economic
growth and emissions reductions are often framed as being incompatible.

But countries are proving that they can be. This doesn’t mean that rich
countries are making reductions anywhere close to fast enough. They can,
and should, be making them much faster. But it shows us that reducing
emissions is possible. And it does not have to mean tanking the economy at
the same time.

Low-carbon technologies are getting cheaper and cheaper
I have a habit of underestimating how quickly things can change. Most of
us have been too pessimistic about renewable energy in the past, even the
experts. Part of the reason I thought that 2°C was so far out of reach was
that I couldn’t see how low-carbon energy could grow quickly enough.

Historically, energy transitions have been very slow. The scientist Vaclav
Smil has shown this many times in his work.14 –16 Remaking energy
systems and shifting from one source to another, whether it was from wood
to coal or coal to oil, happened over many decades, if not longer. And coal,
oil and gas were just so much cheaper than solar or wind, especially with
large fossil fuel subsidies.

Let’s go back to 2009. You’re the prime minister of a low-income
country, and you want to build a new power plant. One-quarter of the
population does not have access to electricity at all. Many of those that do
can only afford to consume very small amounts. Hundreds of millions live
in energy poverty. It’s your job, as the leader, to improve the lives of the
people in your country.

You have to decide which type of power plant to install. Obviously, cost
is a big factor. We’re going to compare electricity sources based on a metric
called the ‘levelized costs of energy’ (LCOE). You can think about LCOE
as the answer to the question: what would be the minimum price that my
customers would need to pay so that the power plant would break even over
its lifetime? This includes the cost of building the plant itself, as well as the
running costs for the fuel and operations.

Here are your options, and how much each will cost per unit of
electricity:17, 18
a. Solar photovoltaic (PV): $359
b. Solar thermal: $168
c. Onshore wind: $135
d. Nuclear: $123
e. Coal: $111
f. Gas: $83
What are you going to pick? If you’re worried about climate change, you’d
want to pick solar, wind or nuclear. But solar is more than three times the
cost of coal. For a given budget, you would supply three times less
electricity. In a country where one-quarter do not have any electricity at all,
and many more can afford very little, you’d therefore be denying people
affordable energy. It certainly wouldn’t be a popular choice with the public.

This is the decision that most countries faced, and they, unsurprisingly,
chose coal or gas. No wonder, then, that getting countries to act on climate
change has been so hard.

In just 10 years this has changed completely. It’s now 2019, and you
have to make the same decision. Here are the prices now:
a. Nuclear: $155
b. Solar thermal: $141
c. Coal: $109
d. Gas: $56
e. Onshore wind: $41
f. Solar photovoltaic: $40
In just a decade, solar photovoltaic and wind energy have gone from the
most to the least expensive. The price of electricity from solar has declined
by 89%, and the price of onshore wind has declined by 70%. They are now
cheaper than coal. Leaders no longer have to make the difficult choice
between climate action and providing energy for their people. The lowcarbon choice has suddenly become the economic one. It’s staggering how
quickly this change has happened.

Why did the cost of solar and wind fall so quickly? The price of fossil
fuels and nuclear depends on the price of the fuel – the coal, oil, gas or
uranium – and the cost of operating the plant itself. Renewable energy is
different. Sunlight and wind is free. Instead, the cost comes from the parts
of the technology itself – the electronic components and solar modules. In
the 1960s, solar power could never have made it to the mainstream. My
colleague, Max Roser, estimated that one solar panel in 1956 would have
cost at least $596,800 in today’s prices. Despite being wildly expensive, the
solar panel didn’t die out, because we needed it in outer space. In the 1950s,
it was being used as the electricity source for satellites. Year by year, the
technology developed. By the 1970s, it made it down from space and onto
land. But still only in expensive settings where there was no electricity grid
to tap into: lighthouses, remote crossings and the refrigeration of vaccines.

Over the last few decades, the price of solar (and wind) has become
cheaper as we’ve used more of it. This is what we call a ‘learning curve’.

As we deploy and scale technologies, we learn how to make them more
efficient. Technologies can get wrapped up in a virtuous cycle: more solar
panels are deployed, the prices fall, demand for them increases, so we
deploy more, and so on. The ‘learning curve’ for solar panels has been 20%:
this means that every time the installed capacity of solar PV doubles, the
price falls by around 20%.iii Onshore and offshore wind have followed a
similar path to solar.

This is not just the case for sources of renewable energy. To manage the
intermittency of renewables, and unlock technologies such as electric
vehicles, we need batteries. Large, cheap batteries. We’ve seen exactly the
same thing happen there. In the last three decades, the price of lithium-ion
batteries has fallen by more than 98%.19, 20 Only in the last few years have
they become remotely affordable for electric vehicles. More on this later.

What haven’t followed a learning curve are fossil fuels, like coal. It’s
hard to make coal plants much more efficient than they are. The amount of
energy you get out of a lump of coal, and the amount of heat energy that’s
wasted, is difficult to change. And the price of coal power is tied to the cost
of the fuel itself. This cost goes up and down, but there is a fixed cost to
how expensive it is to dig it out of the ground. In other words, new lowcarbon technologies will get cheaper and cheaper. Fossil fuels will not.

These very recent developments have been absolutely critical. They
have opened up new low-carbon and cheap pathways for countries to
follow. They mean poorer countries do not have to follow the fossil fuelheavy and unsustainable trajectories that rich countries did. They can
leapfrog the centuries-long journey that we’ve taken. And they don’t have
to sacrifice human well-being or access to energy. In fact, by adopting these
technologies they can ensure that even more people have access to
affordable energy.

How do we tackle climate change?
When it comes to climate action, things are starting to move in the right
direction. We’ve been laying the bedrock for what needs to change. We now
need to start building on top of it. And we need to do it quickly.

So far, 127 countries have committed to reaching net-zero emissions.iv
This is no small feat. It will force us to redesign and reshape our energy
systems. To change how and what we eat. How we live, how we move, and
how we build. But this change must go forward. It can’t be a step
backwards.

Solutions that involve cutting energy use to very low levels are no good.

People need energy to live a good and healthy life. They need it for health
care, for education, to power washing machines and kitchen appliances so
they have time to work, play and learn. They will also need it to adapt to
climate change.

What must we do to reduce our emissions? How do we get to net zero?
Unfortunately there’s no silver bullet. To see how big the challenges are, we
have to look at where our emissions come from. If we break it down into
two categories, we can see the energy system and industry is responsible for
around three-quarters of greenhouse gas emissions. Our food system is
responsible for the other quarter.

21 –23
Zooming in on individual sectors more closely reveals that energy for
producing stuff is responsible for around one-quarter of emissions.24, 25
Moving us – and stuff – around accounts for one-sixth. Energy in our
homes and offices is the same. Then there are some emissions from industry
that are really hard to tackle: cement and chemicals that form the basis of
many of the things around us.

Where do our greenhouse gas emissions come from?
Around one-quarter of the world’s emissions come from food systems.

Three-quarters come from energy and industry.

We can’t solve climate change without addressing each of these slices of
the pie. How do we do that?
Energy
As we’ve seen, we need to get off fossil fuels, and renewable sources and
nuclear are great options. They emit very little CO2 or air pollution, and are
far, far safer. The battle needs to be low-carbon sources versus fossil fuels,
not nuclear energy versus renewables. We are wasting energy on the nuclear
argument.

We have already seen how quickly coal died in the UK. It’s dying in
other countries too. Thirty years ago the UK was getting nearly two-thirds
of its electricity from coal. This is now less than 2%. The US was getting
55%; this is now less than 20%. Denmark was getting nearly 90%; this is
now 10%. Energy systems across the world have transformed.

Coal is now dying across the world
Share of electricity production that comes from coal.

To take its place, renewable energy has grown at an astounding pace.

And not just for the rich. Some unexpected countries are showing the rest of
us how it’s done. In 2014, Uruguay was getting just 5% of its electricity
from wind. Now it’s closing in on 50%. At that point, Chile had no solar
power. Now it has 13%. Many more countries will follow in their footsteps.

The continued plummeting costs of renewable energy technologies and
batteries will soon make these choices the default.

A switch to these sources, alongside batteries and energy storage, is how
we decarbonise our electricity systems. But we also need to decarbonise
other uses of energy, such as transport, heating and industry. This is harder
to do. There’s no sustainable liquid fuel that can just take the place of petrol
or diesel. So the mantra to fix these energy sources is: ‘electrify
everything’. If we can electrify our cars, industry and heating then we can
just build more and more nuclear and renewable energy to power them.

That sounds simple: just build lots of solar, wind and other renewables. But
aren’t there other things we should be concerned about? Do we have
enough land? Do we have enough minerals to build them?
Climate sceptics love to tell you that our landscapes will become littered
with solar panels. They do this to ‘prove’ how land-hungry and
unsustainable our so-called green technologies are. But when we crunch the
numbers, the results are surprising: a move to renewables (and especially to
nuclear) wouldn’t mean using more land. In fact, we might even use less.

When comparing the land use of energy sources, we need to think about
more than just the space used by the plant itself – the area that the coal plant
or solar panel physically takes up. We also need to include the land used to
mine the materials, extract the fuels, handle the waste at the end. A large
assessment by the United Nations Economic Commission for Europe
estimated the land needed by each source to produce one unit of electricity,
when we consider all of these steps of the supply chain.26
The most land-efficient source of electricity was nuclear: per unit of
electricity, it needs 50 times less land than coal, and 18 to 27 times less than
solar PV on the ground.27 Gas was the second most land-efficient.

The land efficiency of solar depends on what minerals we use: when
panels are made from silicon and placed on the ground rather than a roof,
land use is marginally higher than coal. But if we use a cadmium panel, it
needs less land than coal. Of course, that’s not our only option with solar
PV, which we can also put on roofs. Then, the only land use is for mining.

In that case, solar PV is almost as good as gas and is much better than coal.

We can also integrate solar and wind with existing uses of land, such as
farming. There is evidence that ‘agrivoltaic’ systems could be great
examples of shared land. Recent studies show that, under certain conditions,
the yield of agrivoltaic crops can even increase compared with conventional
crops, because of better water balance and evapotranspiration, as well as
reduced temperatures. The same is true of wind: many farmers are already
making extra money by allowing turbines to be dotted across their
farmland. The impact on the farm is usually minimal.

The conclusion is that a move to clean energy technologies will not need
much more land than we currently use for fossil fuels. If we use some
nuclear, utilise roofs for solar panels and share land we’re already using, we
might even need less.

We’ve looked at how the land efficiency of different sources stacks up.

But it’s worth considering whether the land use of energy is a big deal in the
first place. Are we talking about 5%, 10%, maybe even 50% of land? I
estimate that we currently use around 0.2% of the world’s ice-free land for
electricity production – most of it for the mining of fossil fuels. (That’s
small, considering we use 50% of the world’s ice-free land for farming.) In
a world with low-carbon electricity, we could reduce this number. If the
world moved to 100% nuclear, we’d need just 0.01% of the world’s land. If
we used solar panels on roofs, it’d be 0.02% to 0.06%.

Soon, the world will need much more electricity: we want people in
lower-income countries to use more, and we’ll need more to charge our
electric cars and run our heating. That’s still not a massive problem for land
use: we could double or triple the numbers above and they’d still be small.

Much less than 1% of global land.

One final concern is whether we’ll have enough minerals to build the solar
panels, wind turbines and batteries we’ll need. These technologies need a
range of different materials – lithium, cobalt, copper, silver, nickel – and
we’re often told that the amount of mining will be immense, or that these
minerals will run out.

Those that say low-carbon energy will use too many materials should
take a look at how much we currently mine for fossil fuels. The world
extracts around 15 billion tonnes of coal, oil and gas every year. The
International Energy Agency projects that the world will need around 28 to
40 million tonnes of minerals for low-carbon technologies in 2040, at the
height of the energy transition.28 That’s 100 to 1,000 times lower than fossil
fuels. Of course, rocks are not made of pure minerals; the minerals are often
in much lower concentrations, so the total amount of rock we’ll have to
move will be higher. But the same is true for fossil fuel mining: to get those
15 billion tonnes of fuel, we dig a lot more stuff out of the earth. Put
simply: moving to low-carbon technologies will mean less mining, not
more.

Studies also show that we will have enough lithium, nickel, and other
minerals.29 We won’t run out. This is especially true when we consider the
potential of recycling: many of the minerals we’ll use in panels, turbines
and batteries can be refurbished into new products. In this way we could set
up a circular economy where we continually reuse these materials without
increasing demand for more.

We do need to be careful about where we get these minerals from, and
how they are extracted. Some deposits lie under areas that we want to
protect for ecological reasons, or because they overlap with indigenous
lands. We need to make sure we utilise deposits elsewhere, and that they are
extracted in fair and safe working conditions. The era of fossil fuels has
been one that has exploited both people and planet. Let’s make sure that the
low-carbon world we’re building does neither.

Transport
Being able to cross the country in a matter of hours is a modern luxury.

Being able to cross the world in mere hours is a modern miracle.

The exciting world of travel will open its doors to billions in the next
few decades. Many have just recently gained access to basic energy services
– electricity and cleaner fuels to cook with. The next stop on their energy
journey is being able to afford a motorbike, maybe even a car. They will
then take their very first flight. In rich countries we despair of the side
effects of transport: the carbon emissions, the air pollution, the traffic. But
despite its troubles, transport has the potential to unlock the connectivity,
experiences and perspectives of billions. That is the balance we need to
strike.

Around one-sixth of the world’s greenhouse gas emissions come from
transport. As people across the world get richer, emissions from transport
will rise. How, then, do we build a future where we can keep the doors to
travel open while reducing emissions?
The bulk of our transport emissions come from roads. Road vehicles are
responsible for 74% of the world’s transport emissions.30, 31
Cars, planes and trains: where do our transport CO2
 emissions come from?
The average car today is more than twice as carbon-efficient as the average
in 1975.32 These improvements are impressive and have been important in
keeping some of our emissions in check. But transport emissions are still
rising because we’re travelling further, and there is a limit to how efficient
cars running on fossil fuels can get. We’re not going to decarbonise our
transport using petrol and diesel.

Some suggest that we use biofuels instead. Again, this is not going to cut
it. Studies have shown that biofuels can often emit more CO2
than petrol,
especially when we take into account land use.33, 34 As the following
chapters will show, putting cereals that people could eat into cars is not a
good solution. If we’re going to seriously reduce our emissions from road
transport we can’t run them on oil, or food. We need to run them on
electricity.

Switch to electric vehicles – they really are more climate-friendly
My brother – the least environmentally minded member of our family – was
the first to buy an electric car. It wasn’t the low-carbon footprint that won
him over, it was the beauty of driving one. That’s important: if we want to
get everyone on board with shifting to a low-carbon life, we have to make it
cool. People need to feel like it’s making their life better.

But is this decision really better for the environment, or are electric
vehicles a green scam? Lots of people think they emit just as much CO2 as
petrol cars – if not more – once we consider the production of the battery,
and the electricity to power it. Let’s run through the numbers and see.

My brother was faced with the choice of buying a new electric vehicle
(EV) or a new petrol one. When he first bought the EV, it had emitted more
carbon because it takes more energy to manufacture the battery than it does
to produce a combustion engine. So, the production of an electric vehicle
does actually emit more carbon than a petrol car. But once we start driving
them, the tables quickly turn.

Driving an EV emits much less carbon than petrol or diesel. How much
less depends on how clean our electricity is. In the UK we get more than
half of our electricity from low-carbon sources, and we’re now basically
coal-free (this will still be true if the UK does open a new coal mine,
because this coal will not be used for electricity production). If you’re
running one in France, Sweden or Brazil, the benefits would be even
greater. If you’re running one in coal-hungry China or India, they’re less.

But even in these countries, an EV is still better than a petrol one.

The lower emissions of driving an EV means that an electric car quickly
‘pays back’ its debt. In the UK, this payback time is less than two years.35
So, within two years your EV is already better for the environment. Within
ten years it has emitted just one-third of the CO2
 of a petrol car.

If anything, this is a pessimistic outlook: the carbon emissions of EVs
could fall even more. They are a fairly new technology, so there is plenty of
room for improvement. We also know that our electricity grids – our EV
juice – will get cleaner and cleaner.

But was my brother’s new car more climate-friendly than my parents’
decision to keep their existing petrol car running? Over four years, the
emissions of running an existing petrol car are higher than a new electric
one. So, my brother wins.

Electric vehicles are better for the climate
Based on running an average car in the UK. Manufacturing an electric vehicle emits more
greenhouse gases, but this pays back in 2 years.

In 2022, 14% of cars sold globally were electric.36 That might seem small,
but the change over time is what’s really staggering. Two years before it
was just 4%. In 2019, just over 2%. EV sales are exploding. They now
dominate the car market in some countries. In Norway, 88% of car sales in
2022 were electric. In Sweden, 54%. In the UK, it was 23%. The US has
been lagging behind, with just 8% of new cars being electric (although Joe
Biden’s new climate deal could change this quickly). In China in 2022,
nearly two-thirds (29%) of new sales were electric. This is a massive leap
from 2020, when it was just 6%.

The share of new cars that are electric
Sales of new internal combustion engine cars peaked in 2017.

The price of lithium-ion batteries has fallen by more than 98% over the
last three decades. This has opened up the world of electric transport. The
battery you’d find in a Tesla car today costs around $12,000. A Nissan Leaf
battery is around $6,000. But go back to the 1990s, and these batteries
would have cost between $500,000 and a million dollars.37 There was no
such thing as an ‘affordable’ electric car.

This growth in electric vehicles means that the world has already passed
peak petrol car. Sales of new petrol cars in the world peaked in 2017.38
Since people tend to run their cars for a decade or so, it will be a few more
years before we pass the peak of petrol cars on the road at any one time –
‘peak fleet’ – but that momentous occasion is also coming.

Affordability will be the key driving force of our transport revolution.

But the cost of these technologies might not come down fast enough for us
to meet our climate targets. We’ll have to combine it with political action.

Many countries are doing this already by banning the sales of new petrol
and diesel cars. In the UK, this happens in 2030. More and more countries
are committing to phasing them out by 2030, or 2040 at the latest. China
and the US both have a target date of 2035. Lower-income countries are
also taking a hard line: Ghana and Kenya have committed to 2040. This
combination of plummeting prices and political action will get us far. The
petrol car will disappear much more quickly than people might once have
imagined.

But there is one thing that will trump EVs in our efforts to drive down
our transport emissions, and that’s not having a car at all. I live in London,
where having one would be more hassle than it’s worth. I can hop on the
Underground and cross the city much faster than the queued cars, emitting
very little carbon in the process.

The rest of my family can’t do this: they live in a small town where the
public transport is not great. It’s even harder for my extended family who
live in a tiny village in the countryside, where the nearest shop is miles
away. People often picture eco-friendly living as rural. Living on your farm
in the countryside is the green thing to do. Living in the packed energyguzzling city is what’s wrecking the planet. In reality, it’s the opposite.

There are clear environmental benefits to cities: we can build efficient,
connected networks for travel.39 When we look at the travel emissions
across towns and cities we find a clear pattern: people in denser cities emit
less.40
Part of bringing down our transport emissions will involve rethinking
our living spaces. Many European cities are making good progress here.

Cars no longer take centre stage, pedestrians and cyclists do. Cities not only
become calmer, less polluted places to live, they also function much more
efficiently. There’s nothing less efficient than having roads filled with cars
bumper-to-bumper. A well-designed combination of cycle lanes, pedestrian
walkways and high-speed public transport can transform the feel and
efficiency of cities. It slashes our emissions and gives us cleaner air too.

The big dilemma of the 2000s and 2010s was whether to get a diesel car
or a petrol one. The big dilemma of the 2020s and beyond is to get an
electric car or no car at all.

Long-distance transport will need innovation
Things get tricky when we’re looking at trucks, lorries and long-distance
travel. The problem with batteries is that they’re heavy. The heavier your
vehicle, the more energy batteries need to store. That makes them even
heavier too. The balancing act can be made to work at the scale of cars. But
trucks and planes are just too big.

We might edge closer to a solution as electric transport and battery
technologies improve. There has already been progress in short-distance
hauling.41 We’ve sent electric planes into the air successfully. But these
planes are small: a far cry from the jumbo jets that carry us across the
world. Whether these solutions will scale to the level we need – and
whether this can happen fast enough – is an open question.

In the meantime, we need to try out other options. Solar-powered flight
– where we harvest solar energy during the flight so that we need less
battery storage – could be one way forward. Another developing technology
is hydrogen power. Hydrogen fuel is produced by splitting water molecules
(H2O) into hydrogen gas (H2
) and oxygen.v Hydrogen in this form is ideal:
it’s stored energy in a gaseous form. It holds on to this energy until we burn
it, just like we do with petrol or diesel. Except it’s much better than them
because it can store and release three times as much energy per unit.

Hydrogen could be a game changer. Its big sticking point is that it takes
energy to split water molecules. If we’re producing this energy in the form
of electricity from low-carbon sources then it could be a low-carbon fuel. If
we’re relying on fossil fuels, this obviously comes at a climate cost. For
hydrogen to be a fuel of the future we need to improve its efficiency, but we
also need to ramp up the amount of low-carbon electricity we’re producing.

You might wonder why I’m not talking about cutting out flying
completely. ‘Flygskam’ or ‘flight shame’ was born as an environmental
movement in Sweden in 2018. But people have been talking about flying
less for as long as I can remember. It’s a very reasonable position to take:
most people in the world have never flown. It’s a luxury of the few. Some
people had got used to hopping on a plane to attend a one-hour meeting. If
the coronavirus pandemic taught us anything, it’s that most of these
meetings can be done just as well online. It’s perfectly sensible that those
who do fly should cut back. But aviation has given the world too much to
cut it out completely. It has offered people the opportunity to migrate from
one country to another. It lets them return home to visit their families. It has
provided jobs. Driven innovations in new technologies. It has made our
societies more diverse and multicultural and has allowed us to experience
the beauty of other countries. These are experiences I want everyone in the
world to have access to.

We don’t have to fly across the world to connect with others. We can
find other ways to travel, and we can get a long way by connecting online.

But to make flying an act of shame is a step backwards. If we want to make
flying only an occasional experience for people, it needs to be one that they
appreciate. It shouldn’t be one that they spend the next year trying to make
amends for.

Food
Anyone that trusted the Netflix documentary Cowspiracy would believe
that cutting out meat will stop the climate crisis. The film claims that more
than half of the world’s greenhouse gas emissions come from livestock.

This is nonsense. The actual number is just under a fifth.42
Changing what we eat is not going to solve climate change. We need to
stop burning fossil fuels to do that. But only fixing our energy systems, and
ignoring food, will not get us there either. Researchers have looked at how
much greenhouse gas emissions our food systems will emit over the next
few decades if we keep eating as we are. The news is not good. We would
blow right past our 1.5°C and 2°C targets.

Between 2020 and 2100 food production would emit around 1,360
billion tonnes of greenhouse gases.43 To have a good chance of keeping
global warming below 1.5°C, we can only emit around 500 billion tonnes.44
And that budget is not just for food, it’s for everything: food, electricity,
transport, industry, the whole lot. Food on its own would emit almost three
times as much as our 1.5°C budget would allow. It would eat up all of our
budget for 2°C. The numbers are clear: to stand a chance of tackling climate
change, we can’t ignore food.

The good news is that we can get there. While we have a plateful of
options, most boil down to a few key changes in what we eat (and don’t
eat), and how productive we are at making our food. The next two chapters
will look at food in more detail.

For now, let’s look at the things we need to do to cut the climate impact
of our food. Every day another evil food emerges in the media: don’t eat x;
don’t eat y; if you eat z you should feel guilty about it. If we were to cut out
every food that makes it into the headlines, there would be nothing left to
eat. Thankfully the list of things that really make a difference is short. Here
are the five big things we need to focus on.

(1) Eat less meat and dairy, especially beef
This one will make the biggest difference. It’s one of the most effective
things you can do to cut your carbon footprint. When we look at the impact
of different foods, a hierarchy emerges. At the very top of this list – way
ahead of everything else – is beef. Producing 100 grams of protein from
beef emits around 50 kilograms of carbon dioxide equivalents.45 Then we
have lamb, at around 20 kilograms. Then dairy, then pork, followed by
chicken. You will notice here a clear ranking of animal foods: from the
biggest animal (cows) to the smallest (chickens, then fish). Chapter 5 will
look at why.

Most plant-based foods – soy, peas, beans, lentils, cereals, nuts – lie at
the bottom of the list. They have a much lower carbon footprint than
animal-based products. The takeaway from this is simple: if we want to
reduce our carbon footprint, we should eat a more plant-based diet. This
doesn’t mean we have to go vegan. And people in the world that can only
afford a few kilograms of meat a year don’t need to cut it out either. What it
does mean is that those of us eating 50 or more kilograms a year could have
a large impact by eating less. Even substituting chicken for beef – choosing
the chicken burger rather than the beefburger – would go a long way.

Researchers estimate that if everyone were to adopt a more plant-based
diet we could halve our emissions from food production. This plant-rich
diet doesn’t cut out meat and dairy completely.

46 It includes the equivalent
of one slice of bacon, four thin slices of chicken and a glass of milk per day.

You could also have an egg and a fish fillet every few days. This is much
less than most people in rich countries eat. But it’s more than many people
in poorer countries do.

Plant-based foods are better for the climate
Measured in kilograms of carbon dioxide equivalents (CO2
e) per 100 grams of protein.

(2) Adopt the best and most efficient farming practices we can
The numbers above are global averages from studies spanning thousands of
farms across the world. But farming practices vary a lot. Beef from an
efficient producer in New Zealand or the United States might not have the
same carbon footprint as the producer in Brazil who had to cut down some
of the Amazon rainforest.

That’s an argument I hear a lot when I say that eating less meat –
especially beef – is the most effective way to cut your carbon footprint.

People will argue that the beef they consume – from their local farm in the
UK – has a much lower carbon footprint than the global average. It
probably does emit less, but it’s still going to be much higher than plantbased alternatives.

When we look beyond the global average to the distribution of carbon
footprints for each food – from the most sustainable producers to the least
sustainable – the overall message doesn’t change. The worst plant-based
foods still have a lower carbon footprint than the best beef or lamb. Eating
less beef and lamb is still the most effective way to cut your footprint, but
these differences within a given food product do matter. People will
continue to eat some beef, lamb, dairy and pork, so we should source it
from the most efficient and carbon-friendly producers.

The lowest-carbon meat emits more than the highest-carbon plant protein
Measured in kilograms of carbon dioxide equivalents (CO2
e) per 100 grams of protein. Emissions
are measured in kilograms of carbon dioxide equivalents per 100 grams of protein. This is based on
data from 39,000 commercially viable farms in 119 countries.

(3) Reduce overconsumption
The world produces enough food to feed everyone, twice over. More on this
in Chapter 5. Unfortunately, massive inequalities exist. One in 10 people
don’t get enough calories. Four in ten get too much and are overweight. It’s
a conversation we often shy away from, but it should be obvious that if we
were to reduce the overconsumption of food we would need to produce less
in the first place.

(4) Reduce food waste
We need to stop food from rotting on its way from the farm to the shops and
prevent it from going in the bin when it reaches us. We probably won’t cut
it out completely, but it’s possible for us to reduce food waste by at least
half.

(5) Close yield gaps across the world
Over the last century the world has achieved what seemed impossible:
massive increases in crop yields. In many countries they have tripled,
quadrupled, or more. It means we can grow much more food without using
more land and cutting down forests. But some countries have lagged
behind. If we can close these yield gaps across the world, we can spare a lot
of forest from being cut down.

Do these five things listed here and we can build a low-carbon food system.

In the chart we can see the impact of doing any one of these things on its
own. They could get us far. If we manage to do all of them, we could
reduce our net emissions from food to zero. It’s not that we would emit
nothing – we would still have some emissions from fertilisers, and small
amounts of livestock – but this could be offset by all the land we would free
up, the forests that would grow back, and wild grasslands that would be
restored. Even if we manage to achieve just half of the target for each (for
example, only reducing food waste by a quarter instead of a half, or
overeating by only half as much as we do today) we could cut emissions by
two-thirds. This would free up lots of space in our carbon budget and buy
us some time to get our emissions from energy and other sectors to zero.

When it comes to food, there are a few interventions that matter much
less than we think. Eating locally produced food doesn’t make a big
difference. Nor does eating organic food. In fact, in both cases, those
choices could actually increase our emissions if we’re growing foods that
are better suited for other climates or conditions. The plastic packaging of
our food also doesn’t matter much for our carbon footprint. I’ll explain all
three of these misconceptions in Chapter 5.

How do we reduce greenhouse gas emissions from food?
Shown are estimates of emissions from our food systems between 2020 and 2100 based on a
business-as-usual scenario, and five options to reduce them.

Building stuff
When I was a kid, my dad would travel to China for work. This was in the
early 2000s. He recently went back – after more than a decade – and
couldn’t believe how much had changed. Behind every row of houses,
another was being constructed.

The pace of this development has been staggering. It’s a transformation
that has needed a lot of construction materials. Cement, steel, iron. There is
an often repeated claim – that China uses more cement in three years than
the US did in the entire 20th century. This is true. I know because I
recalculated the numbers myself to check.

China is not the only country that is developing rapidly. People are
quickly shifting from rural areas to cities. This is a positive step for human
development, but it comes with challenges in how we build cities in a
sustainable way. Around 5% of our CO2 emissions from fossil fuels and
industry comes from cement production. That might not seem like much,
but over the coming decades, billions of people will make the move to
towns and cities, so this will grow.

When it comes to energy, we already have a lot of the solutions we need.

Decarbonising how we make stuff is going to be trickier. Making cement
needs energy, which is not a barrier in itself: if we can make our energy
from low-carbon sources, this wouldn’t be a problem. The real issue with
cement is that the chemical processes involved in its manufacture also
produce CO2
.

vi Tweaks to the process might be able to reduce these
emissions a bit, but they won’t get us close to producing zero-carbon
cement.47
What we’re going to have to do is capture the CO2 and do something
else with it.48 We could store it underground, to make sure it doesn’t escape
into the atmosphere. We might be able to inject the CO2 back into the
process, to become part of the reaction and then the cement itself. We’d end
up with cement that has CO2 permanently ‘locked’ into it. There are lots of
companies working on promising solutions to this tricky problem.

Why don’t we just ditch the cement and make everything from other
materials? The first problem is about cost and scale. Developing economies
are growing quickly and need a ready supply of cheap materials to build
with. For countries such as China, cement has been perfect. It’s hard to
produce massive volumes of wood quickly. It’s also more expensive. Not to
mention impossible without a huge change in how we use the world’s land.

Many countries would have to chop down their primary, natural forests and
grow timber plantations instead. Over the very long-term this might save
some carbon through the repeated process of growing forest, cutting it
down, then regrowing it, but it could also come at a huge cost to
biodiversity. As we’ll see in the next chapter, timber plantations are among
the largest drivers of deforestation globally. At local scales, sustainable
projects might be manageable, but at the scale and pace that we need
materials, it is no global solution.

The reality is that we need low-carbon innovations for materials such as
cement and steel. Since cities are rising up across the world, the sooner we
do, the better.

Put a price on carbon
The final thing we need to do to decarbonise our economy is not specific to
any one sector. It’s an intervention that underpins everything else.

I’ve asked many economists what we need to do to tackle climate
change. Every single one has given me the same answer: put a price on
carbon. It is, perhaps, the only thing that economists agree on.

What do we mean by putting a price on carbon? It means implementing
a carbon tax on everything we buy based on how much greenhouse gases
were emitted to produce it. Using carbon-intensive fuels like coal, oil and
gas would result in higher tax. Using low-carbon fuels such as nuclear, solar
or wind would attract very little tax, and would be much cheaper in
comparison.

The argument for having this tax is that the current price we pay for
things is not an accurate reflection of what they actually cost. We pay a
price for burning fossil fuels that isn’t reflected in the market: it has a cost
in the form of climate change (which we and future generations will have to
pay for), and other impacts such as air pollution which already kills millions
every year. The purpose of a carbon tax is to even this playing field, to
rebalance the market so that we start paying our dues.49
A carbon tax would change the decisions that consumers make. The
energy-guzzling SUV would be considerably more expensive next to a
clean, electric Nissan Leaf. The beef would be expensive next to the
popular plant-based Impossible Burger. It would push everyone towards
low-carbon choices. It would also change the incentives of companies that
make stuff. Their high-carbon items would be priced out of the market.

They would end up in a rat race with their competitors to lower their prices.

To lower their prices, they would need to cut their carbon footprint.

A carbon price could be incredibly effective. The strongest climate
deniers would still end up making more sustainable choices. They wouldn’t
do it for the planet; they would do it for their wallets. Even leaders like
Donald Trump would choose solar and wind energy over coal. The key to
decarbonising our economy is to make it as pain-free as possible. It needs to
be easy and products cheap.

One concern I have – and many others do too – is that putting a price on
carbon would hit the poorest people the hardest. If you were to double the
price of petrol tomorrow, the rich guy with five Lamborghinis might feel a
bit of a pinch. But he’ll be all right. He might have to sell one of his five
cars or fly first class rather than by private jet. He’ll get over it. But the
parents living on the breadline might already struggle to heat their home
and drive their kids to school. They cannot afford to buy an electric car.

Carbon pricing policies need to include support for poorer households to
make up for the increased cost of energy. This could be done by directing
the tax revenues towards poorer households. This revenue could be used in
other positive ways: to invest in developments in low-carbon technologies,
for innovations in clean energy and meat, to build sustainable cities, stop
deforestation or restore forests that have been cut down.

It should be the richest – those who emit the most carbon – that pay the
most. Any carbon pricing scheme needs to be designed so that they do.

How do we adapt to climate change?
The very poorest countries in the world have contributed next to nothing to
the climate problem. Not even 0.01% of the world’s emissions so far. Yet
they are the ones that will experience climate change most harshly and will
have the fewest resources to adapt. Unbearable heat is tolerable when you
can keep the air conditioning running all day. Crops can be managed when
you can afford irrigation. You can protect against floods when you can
invest in defence infrastructure and repair the damage when the water
subsides. When you are living hand to mouth, a bad crop season could be
the last one for you and your family. That is the cruelty of climate change.

We need to find ways to adapt to the changes that are coming and are
already here. Some will argue that focusing on adaptation is a distraction to
reducing emissions. That’s not true. There is no doubt about it: we must
rapidly reduce the world’s greenhouse gas emissions. But regardless of how
quickly we reduce our emissions, some climate change is inevitable. Even if
we did miraculously manage to keep temperatures to 1.5°C, we would still
need to adapt to a world that’s hotter than it is today. For many people
across the world, ignoring it is not an option.

The latest Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change report on
impacts and adaptation to climate change is 3,675 pages long.50 Even if we
can’t get into the nitty-gritty here of how each and every country needs to
adapt to climate change, there are a few basic principles that are universal.

(1) Pull people out of poverty
This is the most important thing we need to do to adapt to climate change.

Being poor makes you incredibly vulnerable to the impacts of climate
change. In fact, being poor makes you vulnerable to almost any crisis.

When you live close to the poverty line, you are just one shock away from
being pushed below it. If you already live under the poverty line, you live
with the constant stress that the smallest shock could be the last straw. It’s a
truly terrible position to be in, but it is the reality for billions.

Even though deaths from natural disasters have fallen by roughly 90%
over the course of the 20th century, we expect that the frequency and
intensity of disasters will get worse with climate change. As we’ve seen,
fewer people die from natural disasters because we’ve figured out how to
protect ourselves against them. Much of that resilience has come from
poverty alleviation. We can now predict extreme weather events ahead of
time, but it is only with good network connections that we can spread the
word across countries so that people can prepare, with houses and
infrastructure that can withstand floods and hurricanes.

(2) Improve the resilience of our crops to drought, floods and a warming
world
For me, the most worrying aspect of climate change is the impact it could
have on food security. Crops are often adapted to particular climatic
conditions. When these conditions change, our crop response does too; we
might get higher yields, we will often get lower yields; in some cases crops
might fail. Here we have a lot of potential to develop crops that are either
more resilient to these changes or better suited to the new climate we’re
creating. We know we can do this because we’ve done it in the past. We can
improve yields using nutrients, pesticides and irrigation; but we can also
develop seed varieties that are resistant to disease and pests.

Genetic breeding gets a bad reputation in environmental circles, but it has
been absolutely crucial to increasing crop yields across the world, and could
play a much bigger role if we’re to develop agriculture that works well in a
changing climate. Not only would it allow farmers to achieve good, stable
yields, it could even mean we’d need to use fewer fertilisers and pesticides
too. What’s most frustrating about the opposition to genetic engineering is
that, once again, it often hurts the poorest the most. The ones who will be
most vulnerable to a potential crash in yields and food supply. To stand in
the way of solutions that might help to alleviate this damage is an injustice.

(3) Adapt our living conditions to deal with sweltering heat
Extreme temperatures will become increasingly common. We will need a
range of measures, from very basic public health advice on how to stay
cool, to increased capacity of health care facilities to deal with those who
are suffering. Again I have to loop back to my first point about poverty
alleviation: those who will be most vulnerable are those that cannot afford
shelter or air conditioning, or have no option but to go out to work in the
extreme heat. In the 21st century, everyone should have access to air
conditioning when they need it. This is a controversial statement in
environmental discussions because that will require more energy. But I
stand by it. We want to build a comfortable future for everyone, and baking
in extreme heat cannot be part of it.

One of the big sticking points of international climate agreements has been
how to finance adaptation efforts. The countries that have contributed to
climate change the least and have the fewest resources are the ones that
have to adapt the most. Rich countries should contribute financially to
adaptation. They have committed to doing so, but are coming up short in
their delivery. This needs to change, and it needs to change quickly.

Things to stress less about
The reputation of being a climate data person is hard to shake. Doctors at a
party get asked about everyone’s potential life-ending illnesses. I get asked
‘Is this really bad for the environment?’ or ‘What’s worse: this or that?’
These questions often go really deep – right down to the behaviours that
emit just grams of CO2
.

I’m happy to answer them, not least because I’ve geeked out on all the
relevant numbers. The book How Bad are Bananas? The Carbon Footprint
of Everything by Mike Berners-Lee was the bible I used to carry
everywhere with me.51 I was desperate to understand and optimise every
tiny detail of my carbon footprint. I wanted to know if I should use the hand
dryer or a paper towel. (The answer is paper towel if you’re just using one
sheet, but hand dryer if you go for two.) Is it more climate-friendly to read a
book or watch TV? (It’s definitely reading a book.) Should I use the
dishwasher or the sink? (Unless you use cold water, or hot water very
sparingly, the dishwasher wins.)
These comparisons are fun and nerdy. But sometimes they can do more
harm than good. I can justify spending a lot of time on them because it’s my
job. But people shouldn’t be stressed out by every tiny decision they make.

It can get overwhelming. Tackling climate change feels like a massive
sacrifice that has taken over our lives. That would be okay if all of these
actions were really making a difference, but they’re not. It’s misplaced
effort and stress, sometimes even at the cost of the few actions that really
will matter. There is a concept called ‘moral licensing’: it explains the
psychological trick we play on ourselves where we justify one behaviour
because we’ve made a sacrifice somewhere else. So, we go for the steak
because we’ll recycle the plastic wrapper it comes in. Or, we’ll drive rather
than cycle across town because we used the ‘eco-friendly’ setting on the
washing machine.

When we ask people what they think are the most effective things they
can do to reduce their carbon footprint, they often mention the stuff that has
the smallest impact.52 Recycling, using more efficient light bulbs, not
leaving their television on standby or hanging their washing out to dry.

They often miss the big stuff: eating less meat, switching to an electric car,
taking one less flight, insulating their home or investing in low-carbon
energy.

53
That’s why understanding the numbers is important. Not so we can stress
about how much CO2 we’re emitting by watching Netflix, but by helping
people understand the handful of behaviour changes that really make a
difference.

So, what should we all stress less about when it comes to climate
change?
In no particular order, here is a list of common things that people think
make a big difference, but usually have a small impact on their carbon
footprint. Sure, continue doing them if you want to (I do some), but don’t
stress and definitely don’t do them instead of the big things that really do
matter.

 Recycling your plastic bottles (see Chapter 7)
 Replacing old light bulbs with energy-efficient ones
You don’t have to stop watching TV, streaming movies or using the
internet
 How you read: whether it’s Kindle, paper or audiobook, it doesn’t
matter
Washing your dishes in the dishwasher, it doesn’t matter much
 Eating local food (see Chapter 5)
 Eating organic food (this can be worse for your carbon footprint – see
Chapter 5)
 Leaving your television or computer on standby, it doesn’t matter
much
 Leaving your phone charger plugged in, it doesn’t matter much
 Plastic or paper bag – your plastic bag actually has a lower carbon
footprint, but it doesn’t matter muchvii
What we think is effective in cutting our carbon footprint often isn’t
Actions such as giving up a car, eating a more plant-based diet, reducing flights or switching to an
electric car are most effective in cutting our personal carbon footprint.

But surveys across 21,000 adults in 30 countries showed that people think actions such as
recycling and upgrading light bulbs were among the top 3 most effective.

Footnotes
i Here we’re looking at emissions from fossil fuels and industry, which account for over 90% of CO2
emissions. Emissions from land-use change is not included, because the changes from year to year
can be quite noisy.

ii This figure is adjusted for inflation.

iii This relationship between the deployment of technologies and falling prices is commonly referred
to as ‘Moore’s Law’. We see it across many technologies.

iv You can find the latest commitments, which are being followed and documented by the Net Zero
Tracker: https://zerotracker.net/.

v To make these balance, the actual chemical formula for this reaction would be: 2 H2O + energy =
2H2
 + O2
.

vi We make the key part of cement – clinker – by heating up limestone (CaCO3
) to temperatures as
high as 900°C. From this process, we get lime (CaO) and, unfortunately, carbon dioxide.

vii The data shown in the chart overleaf combines estimates of emissions reductions from Wynes and
Nicholas (2017) and survey data from Ipsos (2021). All figures on emissions reductions come from
Wynes and Nicholas, except estimates for the adoption of a plant-based diet. This has been updated
with data from Poore and Nemecek (2018) – it includes the emissions savings from dietary change,
as well as sequestered carbon from the reduction in agricultural land use (i.e. carbon opportunity
costs of land).

One action – having one less child – has been excluded from the chart shown here. This is because
the underlying data didn’t take account of changes in the carbon footprint of people over time. It’s
fair to say that my child will not have the same footprint as me: in the coming decades as we rapidly
decarbonise, the emissions of a ‘person’ will hopefully decline significantly and eventually reach
close to zero.

4
Deforestation
Seeing the wood for the trees
‘The Amazon rainforest – the lungs which produce 20% of our planet’s
oxygen – is on fire’
– President Emmanuel Macron, 20191
The Amazon rainforest is often called the ‘lungs of the Earth’. Emmanuel
Macron is not the only one to claim that it produces 20% of the Earth’s
oxygen. Leonardo DiCaprio, Kamala Harris and Cristiano Ronaldo are just
a handful of others that have made similar claims.2, 3 Former NASA
astronaut, Scott Kelly, even tweeted this statistic out, followed by ‘we need
O2
 to breathe!’4
What they’re implying is that the disappearance of the Amazon is a
threat to the planet’s oxygen supply. As we hear about the loss of the
Amazon rainforest, these claims become scary. An article in the New York
Times stated that ‘if enough rain forest is lost and can’t be restored, the area
will become savanna, which doesn’t store as much carbon, meaning a
reduction in the planet’s “lung capacity”’.5 Now, there are very real
concerns about a ‘tipping point’ with the Amazon. But it’s not a concern
about oxygen. The Amazon doesn’t provide 20% of the world’s oxygen. On
balance, it contributes almost none of it.

The Amazon does produce huge amounts of oxygen. During
photosynthesis, it sucks up carbon dioxide and emits O2
. The estimate of
20% is too high, though: it is closer to 6 to 9%.6, 7 However, these numbers
are beside the point: the Amazon produces a lot of oxygen, but it consumes
a lot too. During the night, when there’s no sun around for photosynthesis,
trees convert sugars into energy, using oxygen to power the process.

Bacteria on the forest floor also consume oxygen when they’re
decomposing organic matter that has landed there from the canopies above.

The amount of oxygen the Amazon consumes is almost exactly the same as
the amount it produces. These cancel each other out, so it provides almost
none of the oxygen in the atmosphere.

It’s not just the Amazon. None of the world’s forests or vegetation give
much to our oxygen supply. As the geologist Shanan Peters calculated: ‘if
every living thing other than humans burned up, oxygen levels would fall
from 20.9% to 20.4%’.8
It would also take millions of years to deplete the
globe’s oxygen supply by any notable amount. The oxygen in our
atmosphere came from phytoplankton in the oceans, millions of years ago.

Before then, Earth’s atmosphere had none; microorganisms lived
anaerobically – meaning they didn’t need oxygen – or were ‘extremophiles’
living in intense environments, fuelled by elements such as sulphur. Around
2.5 million years ago, the Earth had its ‘Great Oxidation Event’ where
cyanobacteria – the first organisms to photosynthesise – started to convert
CO2
into O2
. That’s where most of our oxygen comes from, and it’s very
hard to significantly change this balance.

This shouldn’t stop us from taking action. The Amazon – and other
tropical rainforests – is home to some of the most biodiverse ecosystems on
the planet. They are under threat. Deforestation is also terrible for the
climate, because when we cut trees down, we can release the carbon that
was locked up for hundreds or thousands of years. The reality is bad
enough, and should give us plenty of motivation to act. We don’t need to
resort to misleading headlines to gain attention, because when the truth
comes out, they erode the public’s trust in scientists and belief in the
reasons that we actually should care.

In fact, there are reasons to be cautiously optimistic that we can bring
deforestation to an end. The headlines that often accompany the ‘20% of the
world’s oxygen’ figure also claim that Amazon deforestation is at a historic
high. This is also not true: Amazonian deforestation rates peaked in the late
1990s and have fallen since then.

How we got to now
Today’s rich countries lost their forests long ago
The threat of running out of forest was real for many countries. A thousand
years ago half of France was covered in forest. By the 19th century, it
covered just 13% of the country. In the centuries from 1000 to 1300, the
French population doubled from 8 to 16 million people. This period was
one of peace – without wars to fight, the population could increase without
interruption. A country with more people needs more food, more energy and
more materials for construction. This meant cutting down trees to heat
homes and make space for farmland. This period was described by some as
the ‘great adventure of the French countryside’. Half of the country’s
forests were chopped down.

But then Europe was hit by the Black Death. This plague was caused by
a bacterium that was spread by fleas, but also from person to person
through droplets and aerosols. It was incredibly deadly. As much as half of
the continent was killed. France was hit badly and its population shrunk
from 16 million to around 10 million. Having fewer people meant that
France needed less food, energy and resources. It abandoned farmlands and
the forests returned. Forest cover almost doubled again over the course of
the 14th and 15th centuries. This regrowth of natural landscapes was
common across Europe after the Black Death. When researchers look at
pollen samples from restored forests and grasslands, they can see a large
drop in plant material of cereals and a return of other plant life.9
This forest comeback was only temporary. It took several centuries, but
the French population eventually returned to its pre-plague levels, and then
some. France became a global power. Demand for land, energy and wood
surged. They needed ships for expeditions to build their dominance.

Running out of wood was a key concern. In the 1600s, Louis XIV cried out
that ‘France will perish for lack of timber!’
The population also had to be well fed. Crop yields were only a fraction
of what they are today, and the only option to grow more food was to turn
forests into farms. The government actively encouraged this: in the 1700s,
you would get a tax exemption for 15 years after clearing the land. Finally,
the demand for fuelwood also increased. Urban centres were booming
across France. People needed wood to heat homes and power industries.

Hectare after hectare of forest disappeared.

Just across the English Channel, the same was happening in Britain. A
thousand years ago 20% of Scotland was forested, and 15% of England.10,
11 By the 19th century, this had been slashed to less than 5% in both
regions.12, 13 Trees were tumbling across the Atlantic too. Nearly half of the
US was forested in the 17th century, but two centuries later this had shrunk
to around 30%.14
The disappearance and comeback of forests in rich countries
The share of each country that was forested.

If you were living in 18th-century France or Britain, you might have
assumed that this decline would continue. But just when it seemed like
these forests might disappear entirely, countries turned the tide.

This turnaround was not like the blip after the Black Death. This time
the forests were coming back while the population was still growing. There
are a number of reasons why. One was the beginning of the transition to
productive farming. The intensification of agriculture meant that crop yields
started to increase (albeit slowly). Countries switched to more productive
crops – France ditched rye for potatoes, which can feed a lot more people
per hectare. And policies changed: rather than incentivising people to cut
down forests, governments brought in strict policies on deforestation and
persuaded rural populations to abandon unproductive farmland.

Finally, the coal boom had begun. In Paris, in 1815, the average person
used 1.8 m3 of fuelwood per year. By the 1860s this had fallen to 0.45 m3
,
and by 1900 it was down to 0.2 m3
. Wood was on its way out, and coal was
the new fashion.

These changes meant that rich countries managed to decouple
population – and economic – growth from deforestation. This trajectory is a
consistent pattern that we still see across the world today. It follows a
country’s journey from less to more industrialised. Deforestation and
development are tightly linked when a country is poor, but this relationship
eventually breaks down. Once countries get rich enough, forests stage their
comeback.

The world has lost one-third of its forest since the last ice age
Let’s not sugar-coat the truth, though. Things might be improving in many
countries today, but the cost of deforestation globally has been huge.

The world has lost one-third of its forest since the end of the last ice age
around 10,000 years ago.15, 16 That’s an area twice the size of the United
States. Half of this forest was lost before 1900. Still, the world has lost an
astounding amount of forest over the last century too. Nearly all of this has
come from the expansion of agriculture. The area of crop and grazing lands
has almost doubled. We now use much more of our land for farming than
we have left in forests. Agriculture has been the driving force for
deforestation for a long time, and still is today. Nowhere is this pattern more
evident than in Brazil.

Humanity cut down one-third of the world’s forest to make room for agriculture
Agriculture has always been the biggest driver of deforestation. This is still true today.

The former Brazilian president, Jair Bolsonaro, often created a
smokescreen with his promises on tackling deforestation. At the 2021
international climate conference in Glasgow – COP26 – the Bolsonaro
government pledged to end illegal deforestation by 2028, two years earlier
than previously agreed.

As other countries put pen to paper, the world rejoiced. Brazil is where
most of the world’s forests are being lost. End deforestation there, and we
can end it everywhere. On that stage, Bolsonaro sounded like a man
committed to ending deforestation in the Amazon. Just a few months on, it
was clear that the world shouldn’t have been fooled. INPE – Brazil’s Space
Agency – published the latest deforestation results. Rates in 2021 were the
highest in 15 years.17 This damning and important figure hit the headlines.

It did in 2022 too. It was easy to imagine that global deforestation rates
were at their highest level ever, getting worse and worse.

But zoom out and we see that this is not the full picture. No doubt about
it, the world has cut down a lot of forest. And we’re still losing it at an
alarming rate. The 2020 UN Forestry Report estimates that in the decade
from 2010 to 2020, 110 million hectares was deforested. An area twice the
size of Spain. The world did regrow around 50 million hectares of forest, so
the net loss of forest was around half as much.

But the data also suggests that global deforestation has fallen from its
peak in the 1980s.

The UN has assessed the state of global forests for more than half a
century. Its 2020 stocktake suggests that deforestation rates have fallen by
around 26% since the 1990s. Earlier reports suggest that rates were even
higher in the 1980s.

Now, deforestation numbers are not without their controversy.

Researchers don’t even agree on the simple question of what a ‘forest’ is.

There are various methods of measuring deforestation; none are perfect.

One newer method is using remote sensing and satellites. In 2022, the UN
published a full assessment using remote sensing. Its results were in line
with its earlier reports of falling global deforestation rates.

Where estimates differ is that satellite methods often measure ‘tree cover
loss’. This is not the same as deforestation. Deforestation is defined as the
permanent conversion of forest to another land use, such as pasture,
cropland, cities or roads. Tree cover loss includes deforestation but also
includes trees that are temporarily lost due to wildfire, agroforestry or the
periodic harvest of timber plantations. Since these trees regrow, they are not
within the UN’s definition of ‘deforestation’. Consistent long-term data on
tree cover loss doesn’t exist, but recent data show that rates are still very
high, and increasing in some regions.

Overall, the data shows us that deforestation rates are still worryingly
high. Tragically, nearly all of this loss is happening in the tropics, where
biodiversity is highest. But global deforestation probably peaked decades
ago. And there a range of examples – some that we’ll see later – that show
how countries can reduce deforestation dramatically with the right tools and
policies.

Where we are today
Where are we losing and gaining forest today?
Looking at the history of deforestation – and it’s a long one – gives us
perspective on how much forest we’ve lost, and why countries cut it down
in the first place. We need to halt deforestation, and we need to do it
quickly. Losing forest in the tropics while we regain it in temperate
countries is not enough. There are so many things that are lost when we cut
these forests down. We lose a lot more than carbon. When we cut a tropical
rainforest down, we lose the equilibrium that it had accumulated over
centuries or millennia. Tropical forests are teeming with unique wildlife;
rebuilding those ecosystems will take a long time, if they bounce back at
all. Preventing one hectare of tropical deforestation in the first place is
much better than replanting one hectare of forest. It’s not the same as
buying an offset for your summer holiday flight.

When we look at which countries are losing forest, and which are
gaining it, there is a clear divide. Rich countries tend to be regrowing their
forests. Low- and middle-income countries are losing theirs. This is no
coincidence. Forest cover follows the classic U-shaped curve that also
tracks a country’s development. In the deforestation sphere, we call this the
‘forest transition’ model.18 –20
This curve has four stages, which are defined by only two variables:
how much forest a country has, and how this is changing from year to year.

In Stage 1 – the Pre-Transition phase – a country has lots of forest and
is not losing much of it over time. Deforestation might not be zero but is at
a very low level.

In Stage 2 – the Early Transition phase – countries start to lose forests
very rapidly. Forest cover falls quickly, and the annual loss of forest is high.

In Stage 3 – the Late Transition phase – deforestation starts to slow
down again. At this stage, countries are still losing forest but at a lower rate
than before. At the end of this stage, countries are approaching the
‘transition point’.

In Stage 4 – the Post-Transition phase – countries pass through the
transition from losing forest to gaining it. Forests start to regrow naturally,
or countries may replant them. At the start of this phase, a country might
not have much forest left, but it is making a comeback. Hopefully, by the
end of Stage 4, a country will have not only regrown some of its forest, but
will be closing in on historical levels of cover. This might even be a whole
stage of its own: Stage 5.

From England and France to the USA and South Korea, countries have
followed this very predictable U-shaped pattern. But why – and how does
this link with economic development? Let’s think back to why people cut
trees down. They either want the materials – for energy, for buildings, boats
or paper – or they want the land to grow food. As countries break out of the
deadlock of little population or economic growth, their demand for both
increases. We need more fuelwood to cook, more houses to live in and,
importantly, more food to eat. That’s when countries start to transition from
Stage 1 to Stage 2. They start to cut down forests, and this gets faster and
faster as the demand continues to rise.

But as countries get richer this demand slows. Instead of using wood for
fuel, people switch to fossil fuels (or now, hopefully, more renewables and
nuclear energy). Crop yields increase so we need less land for agriculture.

This is when a country moves into Stage 3 – deforestation slows down
considerably. Finally, a country reaches a stage of development where
deforestation comes to an end. Agriculture is very productive, population
growth is slow, no one wants to burn wood for fuel, and we find other
materials to build things. Countries reach Stage 4 – the point where forests
make a comeback.

Most low- to middle-income countries are in the tropics and subtropics,
so 95% of the world’s deforestation happens in the tropics.21 This is bad
news. Tropical forests are home to some of the richest and most diverse
ecosystems on the planet. They’re home to over half of the world’s
species.22 These forests also store lots of carbon; cutting them down is
terrible for climate change.23
It’s quite clear: we need to stop deforestation in the tropics. Since forests
follow the development pathway of countries, this might happen on its own
if we just sit back and let things play out. Countries will get richer and
eventually reach Stage 4. But this will take too long. We won’t be able to
tackle climate change, and we’ll lose too much wildlife in the process. It
would be tragic if low- to middle-income countries followed the same path
as industrialised countries.

The good news is that they don’t have to. They’re not in the position that
Britain was in two centuries ago. We have technologies that help us to make
agriculture productive. We have institutions that can enforce policies and
regulations. We have satellites to help us track and monitor deforestation
across the world. We have alternatives to using wood for energy. And we
have each other: an international network of collaborators to share
knowledge.

We need to support lower-income countries through this transition
quickly. Or, better yet, skip stages 2 and 3 completely. We have the tools to
do this. The question is whether we are motivated enough to use them.

How much of the Amazon have we lost, and are we losing it at record rates?
The Amazon rainforest is 14% of the world’s total forest, but takes up a
much bigger share of the global conversation. People look at what’s
happening in the Amazon and extrapolate from it.

But with so many news headlines reporting on it, it’s hard to get a real
perspective on what’s going on. How much of the Amazon has been cut
down? How much do we have left? And are deforestation rates really at an
all-time high?
The Amazon basin spans 7 million square kilometres (km2
) – an area the
size of Australia. The actual rainforest is 5.5 million km2 – an area 23 times
the size of the UK. Around 60% of it is in Brazil, with the rest split across
other South American countries.

Most deforestation has occurred in Brazil, the majority in the last three
decades of the 20th century, so we can use 1970 as the starting point of
when deforestation really kicked in. Pre-1970, the Brazilian Amazon
spanned 4.1 million km2
; today, that stands at 3.3 million km2
. This means
we’ve lost around 20% of the Brazilian Amazon. Deforestation rates have
been a bit lower in neighbouring countries, so we’ve lost around 11% of the
Amazon as a whole.24
Now, to the question of how much of it we’re still losing. While global
deforestation rates peaked in the 1980s, in the Amazon these rates
continued to climb in the 1990s and early 2000s, in fact doubling from
15,000 km2 a year to almost 30,000 km2
in just a decade. When Lula da
Silva became president of Brazil in 2003, he vowed to turn things around.

And he did. By the end of his term in 2010, he had reduced deforestation
rates by 80%, from 25,000 to 5,000 km2
. In the years since then, rates
stabilised then began to climb again, although nowhere close to where they
were at the start of the 21st century.

Today, deforestation rates in the Amazon are less than half what they
were in the early 2000s. But still more than double what they were at their
lowest point. This makes a few things clear. First, we have passed the peak
of Amazon deforestation. Headlines about all-time highs are wrong. Despite
an uptick in rates over the last few years, much less of the Amazon was cut
down than in the past. Second, progress can happen quickly. Brazil
managed to slash deforestation by 80% in just seven years under Lula da
Silva’s presidency. In October 2022, he was re-elected as the Brazilian
leader. That should give us hope. Anyone who says it’s impossible to end
deforestation by 2030 has not seen how quickly things can change. Third,
this won’t happen on its own, and if we get complacent we will see things
just as quickly slipping back to where they were.

Deforestation in the Brazilian Amazon peaked in the early 2000s
Deforestation rates are measured in square kilometres (km2
).

What are the drivers of deforestation?
‘Ben & Jerry’s does not produce any ice cream that contains palm oil,’ says
a banner at the top of the ice-cream company’s website.25
In 2017 it got rid of the last few delicious chunks that still contained the
stuff. It was lauded for its commitment to sustainability. Customers who
had boycotted the brand filled their freezers with cookie dough again. A PR
stunt or not, it’s obvious why they’d want to declare themselves palm oilfree. Everyone hates palm oil. It has become the poison of the food
industry.

A few years ago I also really hated palm oil. It was 2018 and time for the
Great British Christmas TV ad competition to start. Which of the big brands
would bring the nation to tears and win? Well, that year, Iceland’s
i advert
was produced by Greenpeace. In the cartoon ad, a young girl has an
orangutan swinging around her bedroom. It’s causing havoc, throwing her
chocolate away, and crying at her shampoo. ‘There’s a rangtan in my
bedroom, and I don’t want her to stay. So I told the naughty rangtan that she
had to go away,’ narrates the actress Emma Thompson.

The scene then cuts to the rainforest. ‘There’s a human in my forest, and
I don’t know what to do. You destroyed all of our trees for your food and
your shampoo… He took away my mother, and I’m scared he’ll take me
too. There are humans in my forest, and I don’t know what to do. They’re
burning it for palm oil, so I thought I’d stay with you,’ she says to the little
girl. Iceland then announces at the end of the video that it’s removing palm
oil from all of its own-brand products.

The advert never actually made it to our television screens. Regulators
banned it for being too political. Perfect. Just what Iceland needed for it to
go viral online. What sparks more outrage than a banned political ad? I was
furious.

I held this position for several years. When people asked me for
recommendations on living sustainably, eliminating palm oil was one of my
top tips. I cheered on the Ben & Jerry’s of the world.

Then, in my role at Our World in Data, the time came to tackle our big
project on deforestation. The idea was to complete the full global picture:
how much forest has been cut down, from where, what’s driving
deforestation, and what can we do about it. I knew palm oil was going to be
a big deal. I wondered if the modern story of deforestation might even be
built around it. I started digging into the research.

I read countless scientific papers and policy documents. I thought the
message from the experts would be clear: palm oil is a leading driver of
deforestation, and we have to stop it in its tracks. I expected
recommendations of a boycott. There were none. In fact, the advice was
that boycotting palm oil was a terrible idea. Do that, and we’ll make
tropical deforestation worse not better.

The more I read, the more humbled I became. I had got this wrong. Palm
oil, deforestation and food are complicated problems, and I had been won
over by simplistic messages that played on my emotions. When faced with
such a problem, it’s tempting to look for a villain: ‘You’re the problem, so
once we get rid of you, everything will be fixed.’ Palm oil fitted the role
perfectly.

Let’s return to the emotive, complex topic of palm oil. Are orangutans
really losing their forest at the mercy of palm oil? Was the Iceland advert
right? Yes and no.

Indonesia and Malaysia produce around 85% of the world’s palm oil.

It’s undeniable that both countries have cut down forests to make space for
their palm plantations. What’s less clear is how much. The International
Union for Conservation of Nature (IUCN) set up a task force to assess the
environmental and biodiversity impacts of palm oil, and what we could do
about them.26 Their estimates for how much global tree loss was driven by
palm oil ranged from 0.2% to 2%. When we look at how much of the
world’s primary forests – which are the old, diverse forests that haven’t
been cut down in recent times – it’s in the range of 6% to 10%.

That’s a lot of forest – a lot of orangutan homes – chopped down. But, at
a global level, palm oil has not been significantly worse than many other
drivers. What about Indonesia and Malaysia specifically? Palm oil was the
biggest driver of deforestation in Indonesia in the first decade of the twentyfirst century, responsible for one-quarter of it.27 But its contribution has
been shrinking, and in the last few years it has actually been one of the
smallest drivers.

What makes it difficult to put a concrete number on palm oil
deforestation is that it depends on whether you only consider palm
plantations that immediately replaced existing forest, or whether you
include plantations that replaced forests that had already been logged for
wood and paper. In a paper in Nature, researchers used satellite imagery to
assess what types of land palm oil plantations had replaced in the Borneo
region of Indonesia and Malaysia.28 They found that three-quarters of the
oil plantations were grown on land that had been forested in the 1970s. But
three-quarters of post-1973 oil plantations were grown on land where the
forest had already been chopped down for the paper and pulp industry. Only
a quarter of the oil plantations replaced forested virgin land.

So we don’t quite know how much deforestation has been driven by
palm oil. Definitely some. Much less than other products such as beef.

Nonetheless, it has been responsible for the tragic loss of forests and we
should do something about it. Our gut reaction is often to just cut out a
product completely. That’s what Ben & Jerry’s did. Most consumers want
brands to follow this lead. But it wouldn’t solve the problem. In fact, it
might make it worse. Cut out palm oil and you’ll replace it with another oil.

Most of the alternatives are no better.

Before we get into the environmental sustainability of foods like palm
oil, I should address some concerns about their health impacts. There has
been a recent backlash against ‘seed oils’, which is an umbrella term for
refined vegetable oils such as soybean, canola, corn, sunflower, rapeseed
and palm oil. Critics have argued that these oils are bad for our health,
contributing to diabetes, heart disease and other illnesses. They say we
should be eating alternatives such as coconut, avocado or olive oil instead.

I’ve seen no credible evidence to support this. The basic argument for
why seed oils are bad is that they contain a lot of omega-6s, which people
argue are linked to inflammation.ii But many studies point to the opposite:
that higher consumption of omega-6s is associated with a lower risk of
disease. Researchers at Harvard University have loudly pushed against this
backlash.29 A meta-analysis covering 30 studies found that omega-6s
lowered the risk of heart disease: those with more in their bloodstream were
7% less likely to develop it.30 Another study followed around 2,500 men for
an average of 22 years, and found that those with the highest blood levels of
omega-6s had a much lower risk of dying from any disease. Studies show
that they lower cholesterol and blood sugar.

31 And the American Heart
Foundation found that getting 5% to 10% of your calories from omega-6s
reduces your risk of heart disease.32 That’s not to say we should eat seed
oils in excess. Or that alternatives, such as olive oil, do not also have
massive health benefits. But I’m not concerned about eating seed oils for
health reasons.

Now, back to the environmental credentials. Palm oil is an insanely
productive plant. It’s why it has been so successful. It gets incredibly high
yields – much higher than any of the other options. One hectare of palm
currently gives us 2.8 tonnes of oil in return. Olives give us 0.3 tonnes.

Coconuts give us 0.26 tonnes – that’s 10 times less. Groundnuts, just 0.18
tonnes.iii
Think about what that means. If we were to boycott palm oil and replace
it with one of these alternatives, we would need far more farmland. If every
company were to follow Ben & Jerry’s lead and use coconut and soybean
oil instead of palm, we would need about 5 to 10 times as much land
devoted to oil crops. Where is that land going to come from? Coconut is a
tropical crop. It’s going to come at the expense of tropical habitats. That
doesn’t sound like the sustainability solution to me. It would be a disaster.

Here’s another thought experiment to drill this point home: let’s consider
how much land the world would need to produce all its vegetable oils from
any one of these options. We currently use 322 million hectares to grow oil
crops. That’s an area the size of India. If we were to get all of it from palm
oil we’d need just 77 million hectares – four times less. We’d free up a lot
of land. On the other hand, if we got it all from soybean oil, we’d need
more land: 490 million hectares. From olive oil we’d need twice as much
land as we currently use – around 660 million hectares. Two Indias. Again,
we might be able to use a bit less land if all of these crops went to oil
production, but we’d still need much more land than if we used palm oil.

Palm oil is much more productive than other oil crops
The amount of vegetable oil we get from one hectare of land.

In a large-scale consumer survey in the UK, palm oil was deemed to be
the least environmentally friendly of the vegetable oils.33 Forty-one per cent
of people thought palm oil was ‘environmentally unfriendly’, compared to
15% for soybean oil, 9% for rapeseed, 5% for sunflower and 2% for olive
oil. And yet, for all of its flaws, palm oil has actually been a ‘land sparing’
crop, at least in a world that demands lots of vegetable oil. It gets a bad
reputation, but it is surely the best of a bad bunch.

Deforestation is almost entirely about farming: around three-quarters of it is
driven by the conversion of primary forests for agriculture or plantations for
the paper and pulp industries. The single biggest driver, by far, is beef.34
Forest clearance to make room for cows to graze on is responsible for more
than 40% of global deforestation.35 South America is home to most of this
destruction. In fact, Brazilian beef production alone is responsible for onequarter of global deforestation.

The next largest category is oil crops. This spans a wide range of crops,
but is dominated by two: soybeans and palm oil. However, deforestation
rates for both have been falling rapidly over the last decade, which might be
a sign that some of the world’s policies are making a difference.36, 37
The expansion of paper and pulp industries is another key driver of
tropical deforestation. Tree plantations have expanded rapidly, particularly
in Asia and South America. In the UK we plant lots of trees to then cut
down to harvest wood or make paper. These trees are often planted on nonforested land – or, rather, land that was forest centuries ago but hasn’t been
for some time. These plantations are sustainable in some sense. They suck
carbon out of the atmosphere when they grow, lose some when they are cut
down, but suck it out again when they are replanted. This isn’t the same in
Indonesia, where old, primary rainforests are cut down to make space for
plantations, releasing a lot more carbon and destroying ecosystems that had
built up over centuries or more.

Finally, straggling at the back, we have a range of different crops. Crops
like cereals, coffee, cocoa and rubber. Many of these – such as maize or
wheat – are staples that countries rely on to feed themselves. The challenge
that many lower-income countries face – especially across sub-Saharan
Africa – is that their crop yields are very low. That’s why improving crop
yields is so important for the planet, and people too.

What are the drivers of tropical deforestation?
Most of global deforestation happens in the tropics.

Shown are the drivers of the conversion of primary forest over the period from 2005 to 2013.

How much deforestation is caused by trade?
If rich countries are regrowing their forests, and low- and middle-income
countries are cutting theirs down, are the wealthy off the hook? Not so fast.

Deforestation isn’t only about our domestic forests. Countries are also
guilty when they import food from poorer countries.

This is similar to the concept of ‘offshoring emissions’ from the last
chapter. Studies have looked at how much deforestation could be attributed
to the foods a country imports.

38 This analysis is difficult to do without
closely tracking foods throughout the supply chain (which companies
should be doing much more of). But the data we do have is surprising. It
suggests that most of the world’s deforestation is driven by demand in
domestic markets. Around 71% of it. Beef – again – is the biggest culprit
here since it’s often consumed close to home. Much more soy, palm, cocoa
and coffee are consumed internationally. Overall, just under one-third
(29%) of deforestation happens for the production of goods that are then
traded. I was taken aback by this finding: I had thought global trade would
contribute more.

It’s not just rich countries that import foods, but they are responsible for
around 40% of traded deforestation. If we then do the sums, rich countries
are responsible for 12% of the world’s current deforestation through the
products they buy.

iv
Rich consumers changing their buying habits will certainly help, but it’s
not going to end global deforestation. This goes against the message that is
often portrayed in the media. ‘If rich countries would just produce their
food locally, this wouldn’t be a problem.’ If only it were that simple.

How to end global deforestation
Zero-deforestation policies, not boycotts
Ben & Jerry’s is not alone in its boycott of palm oil. Many other companies,
and consumers, are doing the same. But the message from experts is clear:
cutting it out completely would be a big mistake. As seen earlier, if we were
to replace palm oil with another oil, we would need to use much more land
and potentially risk even more deforestation. But we shouldn’t accept that
deforestation for palm oil is inevitable. We can use the benefits of its high
productivity while protecting the orangutans’ forests at the same time.

Boycotts won’t get us there. What can we do instead?
The biggest recommendation from experts is to make sure that we’re
buying palm oil that is certified as sustainable, even if that means buying it
at a slight premium. The most well known certification scheme is the
Roundtable on Sustainable Palm Oil (RSPO). Certified suppliers conduct
impact assessments, manage and protect high-value areas of biodiversity,
don’t clear primary forest, and avoid land clearance through fires. Suppliers
can only be certified if their plantations have not replaced primary forest or
areas rich in biodiversity.

Studies have shown that the RSPO scheme has been successful in
reducing deforestation in Indonesia.39 But to stamp it out completely, we
still have far to go. Just 19% of palm oil production is covered by the
RSPO. To have a real, permanent impact, certification needs to cover a
much larger number of growers. That’s why consumers – that is, you and I
– need to demand sustainable palm oil. It puts pressure on food and
cosmetic companies. It rewards the most sustainable growers and
incentivises others to change their practices and get certified too. But our
pressure doesn’t stop there. While RSPO standards are obviously better
than no standards, they’re not perfect. There have been various examples of
laxity from the RSPO, so if we want to stamp out deforestation completely,
we not only need to get all of our crops covered by these certifications, we
need to make the rules tougher too.

Palm oil can be a good choice for many of the food products we buy.

But there are a few areas where we should just cut it out. It’s used in
industrial applications from shampoos to cosmetics, and substituting there
to synthetic oils – oils produced in the lab – could give us what we need
with a much lower impact.

Palm oil is also used in biofuels for transport. Here, we should
absolutely stamp it out. Globally, we only put small amounts of palm oil
into bioenergy. Just 5% of production. But for some countries – often the
richest ones – bioenergy is a big user of palm oil. Germany is one example:
41% of its palm imports go to bioenergy. That’s more than it imports for
food products. This is incredibly stupid, and terrible for the environment. To
be clear: Germany imports palm oil from an area at high risk of tropical
deforestation to put it into cars. What’s even more insulting is that it then
counts this towards its ‘renewable energy’ target. In reality, biodiesel from
palm oil results in more carbon emissions than petrol or diesel.40 Here, a
boycott is certainly justified.

Finally, and perhaps most simply, we could eat less oil overall: that
would not only reduce our demand for palm oil but would stop us moving
to more land-hungry alternatives.

Eat less meat – especially beef
The bad news if you’re a cheeseburger fan is that beef gets some very bad
press throughout this book. That’s because its impacts are so large and cut
across so many connected problems. Beef is the largest driver of global
deforestation. The most obvious way to reduce deforestation, then, is to eat
less of it.

Raising cattle is a very resource-intensive way to make food. Cows need
a lot of food, water, emit a lot of greenhouse gases and need a lot of land.

When it comes to how much land is needed to produce a kilogram of food,
beef and lamb are miles ahead of any other food. The same is true when we
compare foods based on grams of protein, or calories. To produce 100
grams of protein from beef, we need 164 square metres (m2
) of farmland.

That’s a lot more than other meats. Pork takes just 11 m2 – fifteen times
less. Poultry is just 7 m2
. And beef needs nearly 100 times more land than
plant-based proteins, such as tofu or beans.

Land use per 100 grams of protein
When I tell people that eating less meat will reduce deforestation, two
counter-arguments always come up. The first is that around two-thirds of
the land that cows graze on is not suitable for growing crops. So, they say,
it’s better to use that land for livestock than to try to use it for growing
crops. But that’s not our only option: we could just leave that land to be
forest, grassland or other wilderness.

Globally, we don’t need it for food production. As the next chapter will
show, by eating less meat the world would actually need less cropland than
we currently use today. We feed lots of our crops to animals, and by
reducing our meat consumption we could use this land to grow crops for
humans instead, and we could leave more land to nature.

The second counter-argument is that not all beef is created equal. Lots of
people argue that their locally sourced beef is much better than the average
because it comes from cows raised on large open pastures. It’s certainly
true: some beef needs much more land than the global average, and some
much less. Beef produced in South America, for example, needs lots of
land.41, 42 This is terrible news when that land has to be taken from the
Amazon rainforest. But the best choice for the climate is often the opposite
of what people imagine: cows raised on grassland alone (rather than grasses
plus grain) need two to three times the amount of land as the global
average. That comes at a climate cost.

What we have, then, are multiple dangers stacked on top of each other.

Beef needs lots of land. Cows feeding on grass need even more land than
those raised on grains and crops. The grazing cows that are raised at the
lowest density on expansive grasslands are those in regions that are at high
risk of deforestation.

There are three solutions to these arguments. First, we can all try to eat
less beef. That is the change that would have the biggest impact. It seems
possible that people could cut back a bit, but we’re not going to all stop
eating beef completely, any time soon. So we need some solutions for the
beef that we do still eat.

That brings us to our second solution, which will be unpopular with
many: switching to grain-fed rather than grass-fed beef. It needs much less
land, which is what we’re concerned about when it comes to
deforestation.43 One important conflict that comes up here – and will come
up later when we think about other types of meat – is that the goals of
animal welfare and environmental impact are not always aligned.

Unfortunately, the environmentally friendly or ‘efficient’ choice is often one
that is worse for the animal. How you balance these priorities is up to you.

The third solution is to optimise for beef production in the regions that
can do it most efficiently. The ‘worst’ (where we’re defining ‘worst’ as
those that use the most land) 25% of beef producers use up 60% of the total
land that is used for beef production. If globally we were able to reduce the
amount of beef we eat by 25%, and eliminate this from the ‘worst’ beef
producers, land use for beef production would be cut by a whopping 60%.

When it comes to solutions, we’re often presented with extremes. We’re
told that we all need to go vegan overnight. Or we need to cut out every
single food – meat, soy, palm oil, avocados – until there’s nothing left. But
if we need to pick the truly effective ones, the changes needed are often not
as dramatic as we think.

Improve crop yields – especially across sub-Saharan Africa
One of the world’s biggest weapons against deforestation over the last
century has been a big increase in crop yields. If we can grow more food
from a given plot of land, we don’t need to cut down forests. This has been
a huge success story across Europe, the Americas and Asia. But one region
has lagged behind: sub-Saharan Africa.

It’s not that crop yields haven’t increased there at all. But they haven’t
kept up with the rest of the world. Let’s see how it compares with South
Asia. Both regions have increased cereal production since 1980. But they
achieved this increase in completely different ways: Africa through using
more land, Asia through increasing yields. South Asia uses the same amount
of land for cereal production as it did in 1980, but its yields have increased
by nearly 150% from just 1.4 tonnes to 3.4 tonnes per hectare. In Africa,
yield improvements have been small – they’ve increased by just 30%
(rising from 1.1. to 1.5 tonnes per hectare). To make up for these poor
yields it has to use a lot more farmland. Land use for cereals has more than
doubled. This extra farmland has to come from somewhere, and it’s often
from existing forests.

If we look at the decades ahead, population and economic growth means
sub-Saharan Africa will have to grow a lot more food. If it can’t produce
this food through higher crop yields, it will have to cut down more of its
beautiful forests which are teeming with biodiversity. Of course, it doesn’t
have to be this way. Studies show that if countries across sub-Saharan
Africa can close their yield gaps, they can produce much more food without
more farmland at all.44
The next chapter will look at how countries – not just across subSaharan Africa, but everywhere in the world – can do this.

Rich countries should pay poorer countries to keep their forests standing
Centuries ago, when my ancestors in the UK were cutting down the forests,
there was no such thing as a ‘carbon budget’ or an ‘emissions target’. Few
cared that the populations of wolves or deer might decline. There were no
international conferences where leaders wagged their fingers at each other
about not doing enough for the planet. If you wanted to cut trees down, you
just went ahead and did it.

Rich countries got wealthy from this guilt-free destruction. They freed
up land to grow food, they could provide energy from wood, and they could
build naval boats, weapons and infrastructure to colonise the rest of the
world. It’s similar to the story of fossil fuels. Rich countries burned coal
freely throughout the 19th and early 20th centuries, generating huge wealth
in the process. Low- and middle-income countries have tried to replicate
what rich countries did centuries ago, but they are shamed for doing so – we
tell them that they have to stop, that they can’t keep doing this if the world
is to reach its climate targets.

It’s an unfair and cruel position to be in. We can pretend that there is no
cost to developing countries, but that’s a lie. Renewable energy is becoming
much cheaper and hopefully, soon, there will be little trade-off between
gaining access to energy and keeping fossil fuels in the ground. But for
deforestation, the cost is still there. If a farmer opts to leave a forest
standing, they are forgoing money and food. There are long-term benefits to
countries keeping their forests – they provide important ecological services
– but in the short term, there is a clear opportunity cost to stopping
deforestation. This is an opportunity cost that my ancestors never had to
contend with.

There is a strong case for paying countries to stop deforestation. At the
very least, these countries should receive some form of compensation for
the money they will pass up. It’s a controversial proposal. How much
should countries be paid? Who should get this money? How would we
know that countries were actually keeping their promises?
Some of these questions are easier to answer than others. We know when
a forest has been cut down, and how much of it. Working with local
organisations, we can often track down who was responsible. Coming up
with a system to verify the compensation due seems doable. One way is to
calculate the opportunity cost of a given hectare of forest. Patterns of crop
production are quite predictable. Some regions grow soy, others grow
maize, and others grow bananas. We can make assumptions about what
would be grown on that hectare of forest, and calculate how much money
those bananas or soy would get in the market.

The trickier question is agreeing on how much countries really would
have cut down without the compensation scheme, as there are strong
incentives to exaggerate deforestation plans. Looking at previous
deforestation patterns would help here. If a country has been cutting down
forests at a steady rate of 1 million hectares per year and suddenly claims
they would cut down 10 million hectares, we can be pretty sure they’re
trying to pull a fast one.

There are some smaller programmes that have already had some success
with compensation schemes. The most well known – the REDD+ scheme –
was set up by the UN Framework for Climate Change. It has achieved some
transfer of payments from rich countries to poorer ones, and has shown that
these transfers can be successful in reducing deforestation and carbon
emissions.45 However, most of the funding has been provided by only a
handful of countries – Norway has led the way, followed by the US,
Germany, the UK and Japan.46 And this funding has been nothing on the
scale that is needed to bring tropical deforestation to an end.

The obvious question here is: what’s in it for rich countries? Well, for a
start, it seems like a no-brainer if leaders care about climate change and
biodiversity as much as they claim to do in conference speeches. If they
think that bringing global deforestation to an end is one of our most
pressing challenges, supporting these efforts would be the obvious thing to
do. And to go beyond the ethical case to the economic one: halting
deforestation is actually a relatively cheap way of stopping carbon
emissions. It’s much less expensive (and easier) than stopping people’s beef
consumption, or decarbonising air travel.

This doesn’t just have to be about one country supporting another.

Companies and the private sector can get involved too. Many already pay in
some way to offset their emissions through tree planting. Paying to prevent
deforestation in the first place would have an even greater impact. If we
want to spend our dollars in a way that maximises positive climate and
biodiversity impacts, then stopping deforestation is a good bet.

Things to stress less about
Cities and urban areas have a small impact
Many people imagine that the rise of cities has come at the cost of the
world’s forests. These concrete jungles seem at odds with their green
cousins. Perhaps a move away from urban to rural areas – a dismantling of
these dense hubs – would help?
It’s a romantic idea, but it couldn’t be further from the truth. Our cities
and urban areas take up just 1% of the world’s habitable land. Agriculture
takes up 50%. Our biggest footprint on the world’s land is not the space that
we ourselves take up, and build our houses on; it’s the land that’s used to
grow our food. This is the biggest driver of deforestation, not the rise of
urbanisation.

In fact, the migration of people from rural areas to cities has mostly been
good for protecting our forests. There are still indigenous populations that
play a vital role in protecting local forests and ecosystems. They live and
maintain a balance in these environments. But this only works at a very
small scale. For large populations, the migration to cities and intensification
of farming has freed up land for forests to return. Billions of us taking up
rural living would be a disaster for the world’s forests.

Your tofu, soy milk and veggie burgers are not driving deforestation
A lot of soy is grown in Brazil. Brazil is home to the Amazon. The Amazon
is being cut down. Join the dots and we quickly reach the conclusion that
our tofu, soy milk and veggie burgers are killing the rainforests. People are
faced with a dilemma. They want to eat less meat and dairy, but they fear
that the replacements are just as bad. This isn’t true.

Brazil produces around one-third of the world’s soy. Argentina produces
another 11%. In the past – particularly in the 1990s and early 2000s – soy
was responsible for deforestation, both directly and indirectly. But it isn’t
your tofu or soy milk that’s driving this. Around three-quarters of the
world’s soy is used for animal feed: to raise chickens and pigs mostly, but
also some cows and fish too.47 One-fifth goes directly to human food, and
most of that is for vegetable oil. Just 7% goes to the classic ‘vegan’
products such as tofu, tempeh and plant-based milks. This is particularly
true for soy grown in Brazil. Nearly all of its soy – 97% – uses genetically
modified (GM) varieties, which are more likely to be used for animal feed
than human consumption. In fact, GM soy is not allowed for direct human
consumption in some markets, such as the European Union.

It’s very unlikely that your tofu is killing the Amazon. Switching from
meat and dairy to these alternative products is much more likely to save the
forest than destroy it.

Three-quarters of the world’s soy is fed to livestock
We often associate soy with meat-substitute products, but only a small fraction is used directly for
human food.

Footnotes
i Iceland is a supermarket chain in the UK.

ii All oils contain some combination of polyunsaturated, monounsaturated and saturated fats. The
reason some people think seed oils are bad for us is that they contain lots of omega-6, a type of
polyunsaturated fat. One type of omega-6 is called ‘linoleic acid’, which people claim causes chronic
inflammation. It’s not actually the linoleic acid itself that’s inflammatory, but the body converts it to
‘arachidonic acid’, a building block for inflammatory compounds.

It is unlikely to have this effect in humans. Only a small amount of
linoleic acid – 0.2% – turns into arachidonic acid. And not all of this causes
inflammation. And arachidonic acid is a complicated compound: it also has
anti-inflammatory effects. Some animal studies in rats have suggested that
linoleic acid causes inflammation, but the opposite effect has been found in
humans: it may lower inflammation, protecting against disease.

Linoleic acid is an essential amino acid, which means that the human
body doesn’t produce it. We need to eat it. It’s important for several
reasons, including the production of cell membranes and skin health. The
argument that we should cut seed oils – and linoleic acid – out of our diets
completely is not supported by the evidence, so far.

iii This is based on oil production and land use data from the UN’s Food and Agriculture
Organisation, affected by how much of these crops are used for oil versus other co-products (e.g.

seeds or coconuts). I’ve seen some other estimates over 3.5 tonnes for palm, and 0.7 tonnes for
coconut. So, yields could be higher if crops were grown primarily for oil, but none come close to
palm yields.

iv We can calculate this as 40% (rich countries’ contribution) of 29% (the share of deforestation that
comes from traded goods). This is 12%.

5
Food
How not to eat the planet
‘Only 60 Years of Farming Left If Soil Degradation Continues’
– Scientific American, 20141
One of the most frightening claims about our environmental mess is that the
world has only got ‘60 harvests left’, because the world’s soils are
degrading so quickly that they’ll be useless by the year 2074. If true, this
statistic is so grim that it makes almost everything else in this book
meaningless. If that’s not scary enough, in 2017, Michael Gove, the UK’s
environment secretary, warned that the UK had only 30 harvests left.

Google ‘harvests left’ and you’ll find hundreds of thousands of results.

These claims have made front-page news in the Independent and the
Guardian several times, and they’ve been repeated by leading
environmental campaigners. The figure they report is sometimes as little as
30 years and other times it’s a ‘generous’ 100 years. One thing the claims
do have in common is that they are nonsense.

The ‘60 harvests left’ headline seems to have been made by someone at
a farming conference held by the UN’s Food and Agriculture Organization
in 2014. How did they come to the figure of 60? No one knows. The FAO
has never provided anything to back this up, and the person who made the
statement has never come forward to defend it. All in all, it sounds like they
made it up.

What about the other predictions? The ‘100 harvests left’ figure
apparently came from a 2014 study which compared the amount of organic
matter in garden allotments in Leicester with surrounding farmland.2 First,
I’m not sure how a single study of a garden allotment in England tells us
much about the state of the entire world’s soils. Or even of the UK’s soils.

Second, and more worryingly, the study didn’t mention anything about the
‘number of harvests left’. It certainly didn’t mention the number 100. The
botanist James Wong tried – and failed – to track this source down.3
I also
tried, and found nothing. Again, the number appears to have been made up.

As for Michael Gove’s ‘30 year’ claim: who knows.

The specific number doesn’t actually matter, because there is no
number. Ask a soil scientist how many harvests the world has left, and they
will laugh. The concept has no scientific meaning. The world’s soils are so
diverse and heterogeneous: some are degrading, some are improving, and
many are stable as they are. The idea that there is a deadline by which the
world’s soils will just die – apparently all at the same time – is bonkers.

When soil scientists looked at the ‘lifespan’ of soils across the world,
they found that they spanned five orders of magnitude.4, 5 A thinning soil is
bad; a thickening soil is good. Some soils were thinning quickly and could
be in trouble within the next 100 years. Some were still depleting but had a
‘lifespan’ of thousands or tens of thousands of years. And others were not
degrading at all: they were thickening.

It’s not that soil loss isn’t a problem. It really is. We need to find ways of
farming that rebuild soils rather than depleting them. But the idea that we
only have 30, 60 or 100 harvests left is just wrong. These zombie statistics
are frustrating but they do have one silver lining: they are a great way of
knowing which campaigners and reporters are more interested in a headline
than the truth. It’s a red flag for someone to make such a big claim without
bothering to check if there is anything to it.

Similar headlines on global hunger might make you think that we are
always just on the brink of running out of food. But step back to look at the
data and you’ll see that, again, this is just wrong.

‘Today we’re going to talk about how to feed everyone without wrecking
the planet at the same time.’ The audience went quiet, which I was grateful
for. I was just 21 years old and giving my first lecture to a room of
undergraduates at the University of Edinburgh. I was bricking it. I had just
two goals for the lecture: keep as many people awake as possible, and have
them leave with something they didn’t know before.

‘The average person needs around 2,000 to 2,500 calories a day. If we
were to split the world’s food production equally among everyone, how
many calories would the average person get?’
If you want to have a shot now, take a guess.

‘Put your hand up if you think we could all have at least 1,000 calories.’
Everyone put their hand up. Phew. They were willing to play along.

‘Keep your hand up if you think we could have at least 1,500 calories.’
Around 10% to 20% put their hands down. The rest kept them raised.

‘What about 2,000 calories?’ A further 50% of the room put their hands
down. Less than a third were still hanging on.

‘Two and a half thousand calories?’ Nearly everyone put their hands
down. Less than 10% were still in the game.

‘Three thousand calories?’ Out of around 100 students, only one person
was hanging on.

‘Three and a half thousand?’ The last hand went down. The game was
over.

I grinned. This was my Hans Rosling moment. ‘If we split the world’s
food production equally between everyone we could each have at least
5,000 calories a day. More than twice what we need. Or, to put it another
way, we produce enough food for a global population twice the size that it
is today.’
The room was silent. No one was asleep. I’d hit my two goals before I’d
even put my slides on the screen.

I wish someone had told me that fact while I was doing my degree. I wish I
had looked more closely at how food production had changed across the
world. I wish I had spent more time looking for data, and less time reading
the news headlines.

If I had been in the audience in that lecture theatre I would have put my
hand down at 2,500 calories per day. The world could maybe just produce
enough food for everyone, but because some people overeat, some go
hungry. So, global hunger must be getting worse.

Thankfully I was wrong on that. The world has made dramatic progress
in reducing hunger in recent decades. Although rates of undernourishment
are still tragically high, with nearly one in 10 people in the world not
getting enough calories, this figure is far lower than it was in the past. For
nearly all of our history, most of our time was spent trying to hunt or
produce enough food for everyone. Nutrition was often incredibly poor. Go
back a few centuries and most people barely got enough to eat.

The fact that hundreds of millions still go hungry while we produce
enough to feed a population twice our size is truly shocking. But knowing
that the world is capable of producing so much food should give us all the
means and motivation we need to fix the problem. It is solvable. Hunger
and famine still exist today, but they’re political and social in nature. The
limits to us feeding everyone are entirely self-imposed. This is a unique
position in human history: until the last century our ability to feed large
numbers of people well was constrained by our ability to hunt down
animals, then our ability to grow more food from the limited land we had.

Now it is only constrained by our choices of what to do with the food we
produce.

How we got to now
The endless struggle to have enough food
The evolution not just of food systems but food cultures is so vast, so
varied, so individual, that I can never do it proper justice in just one chapter
of a book. But to understand where our food systems are today we need
some context for how we got here.

The earliest humans – dating back millions of years, from the erectus to
the neanderthalensis to sapiens – didn’t grow their own food. They took
from what was already there: they hunted animals and foraged for fruits,
nuts and seeds. There is a common misconception that hunter-gatherers ate
lots of meat and very few carbohydrates. It’s the classic ‘paleo’ diet that
many people follow today. But when we look at archaeological evidence,
and the diets of indigenous tribes today, we don’t find any universal ‘paleo
diet’.6
It varies a lot between groups, but also across the year. During dry
seasons they eat more meat; in the wetter seasons, more berries and honey.

7
In some months meat makes up more than half of their food; in others it
makes up less than 5%.

We might think that these small populations lived in perfect balance
with nature. Unfortunately not. As we’ll see in the next chapter, slowly but
surely, humans contributed to the extinction of many large mammals.

What’s staggering is how few humans there were at the time. The global
population was in the order of millions. The total impact of our huntergatherer ancestors might not be comparable to ours today, but the notion
that they lived in perfect balance with other species is a fantasy. Humans
have always competed with other animals, first hunting them directly,
impacting landscapes with fire, and later fighting them for space to grow
crops.

Most of human history involves long stretches of incredibly slow, linear
change. But there are a couple of key inflection points, innovations that
took us on a different path entirely. Agriculture was one of them. It started
around 10,000 years ago, and allowed us to develop larger societies of
people, all built around a single place. Rather than going with the whims of
‘nature’ we could begin to shape it ourselves. The very purpose of farming
is to shape the environment, it’s about nurturing the soil to make the
conditions just right for what you want to grow, and painstakingly getting
rid of the intruders – the weeds and pests – that get in the way.

Farming wasn’t easy. (It’s still not easy.) In fact, it might initially have
had a detrimental impact on nutrition and health. When archaeologists look
at the skeletons of humans across time, they tend to find that those in early
farming societies were shorter than their ancestors, and shorter than their
neighbours in foraging tribes.8 Staple crops such as cereals and tubers grow
very well. They’re a great source of calories and carbohydrates. But not on
their own: if you’re relying on these foods for the bulk of your calories then
you’re going to be deficient in important nutrients. The transition from a
diverse diet that included meats, fruits, vegetables, seeds and other foods to
one dominated by cereals probably worsened the diet for the average
person. But what it did do was feed a lot more people. Human societies
could grow, with enough calories to go around. The agricultural revolution
was probably bad for the individual, but advantageous for the population as
a whole.

Our battle with agriculture has been centred on one thing: having enough
nutrients in the soil at the right time. Until a century ago our ability to grow
more was limited by a key element: nitrogen. Nitrogen is the building block
of life. It’s the basis of proteins and is essential for the successful growth of
all plants. If a soil doesn’t have enough nitrogen, crops will grow poorly if
they grow at all. It’s the most abundant element in our atmosphere – making
up 78% of it. But it’s inert in the form we find in the atmosphere. That
means plants can’t use it: they need it to be in a reactive form where it can
react with hydrogen, carbon and other important biological elements. Only
a tiny fraction of the world’s nitrogen is available in this reactive form that
plants and animals can use to grow.

Our ancestors had three options to overcome this. Shifting
agriculturalists moved around to find new lands that were not depleted of
nitrogen. This is the ‘slash-and-burn’ technique. These types of shifting
farming systems could support around 10 times as many people as even the
most productive hunting and gathering societies. But the continuous
movement of these societies was disruptive and didn’t allow for the
settlement of larger groups.

Sedentary – or so-called ‘traditional’ – agriculture took this one step
further. Rather than moving around to find new nitrogen-rich spots, they
stayed in one place and recycled nitrogen back into the soils. Traditional
farming could provide for 10 times as many as shifting agriculturalists.

Large societies and cultures could start to develop.

Traditional agriculturalists had two options for recycling nitrogen back
into the soil. The first drew on the miracle of peas and beans. Most crops
can’t use nitrogen in its atmospheric form. Legumes are special because
they can pull it out of the air and create usable nitrogen on their own. When
you plant legumes you’re adding nitrogen into the soil. Not so much that
you have an endless supply, but enough to add a decent amount. The second
option was to raise livestock and put manure on the fields. This was an
effective way to add nutrients to the soil, but you needed tonnes of the stuff.

It was hard work to gather, and a lot of the nutrients leaked into the
surrounding environment rather than being taken up by the crops.

For millennia, human societies got by using these approaches. But they
were still limited by nitrogen. But then, in the early 20th century, we hit
another inflection point. Our deadlock with nitrogen was finally broken.

Fritz Haber and Carl Bosch invented synthetic fertiliser, an innovation that
changed the world beyond recognition.

Haber–Bosch: making food out of thin air
One of my favourite websites is called Science Heroes: it ranks the giants of
the scientific world according to estimates of how many lives they’ve
saved. We might imagine that someone in the medical sciences tops the list.

But no: it’s the agricultural scientists, Carl Bosch, Fritz Haber and Norman
Borlaug. Many of us owe the fact that we are alive to them.

In the Haber–Bosch duo, Haber did the scientific tinkering, and Bosch
was responsible for bringing it to scale.

Fritz Haber was born in Poland (at the time, Prussia, part of Germany) in
1868, and initially worked with his father in the chemical business.9 After
one-too-many failed experiments in the business world he was ousted to
academia. There he set to work on tackling the nitrogen problem. Nitrogen
exists in the atmosphere in the form of N2
: two nitrogen atoms bonded
together. To get it in a form that can be used by plants, we need to turn it
into ammonia (NH3
). But pulling this off was no mean feat. Most believed
it couldn’t be done. Fritz Haber was not deterred. The trick was getting the
pressure and temperature just right. Nitrogen and hydrogen had to be highly
pressurised and the temperature ramped up to 400–500°C. They had to be
passed over beds of a catalyst, which would break down the incredibly
strong triple bonds holding the nitrogen atoms together. Only then could
nitrogen and hydrogen atoms bond together to give us NH3
. In 1909, Fritz
Haber managed to replicate the process that peas and beans do so
effortlessly. He produced ammonia from thin air.

The challenge was now to scale this process. It had to move from a lab
demo to something that could feed the world. The German company BASF
purchased the rights and got one of their best minds on the project: Carl
Bosch. It was his job to take Haber’s invention and turn it into something
that could sell. It took him just one year. By 1910, synthetic ammonia –
from the Haber–Bosch process – was ready to be rolled out into the world.

Both scientists would eventually win the Nobel Prize in Chemistry for
their work, Fritz Haber in 1918, then Carl Bosch in 1931. There is no doubt
that the two men transformed the world beyond recognition, and their
breakthrough changed the farming game completely. It took several decades
to make it energy- and cost-efficient enough to launch into the global
market, but by the middle of the century, production skyrocketed. The US
market gobbled it up, and by the 1980s, it had also become an essential part
of agriculture in emerging economies too.

Adding nutrients to the soil allowed crops to be more productive than
they ever had before. Crop yields had been stubbornly low for millennia.

Suddenly they were on the rise. Fertilisers were not the only innovation in
agriculture –irrigation, improved varieties of seeds and acquired machinery
such as tractors were also added – but they were critical to growing more
food. Around half of the world would not be alive today without the
invention of synthetic fertilisers. Several scientists have separately
estimated how many people the world could support without these added
nutrients, and all converge on a similar figure: around half as many.

10 –12 In
the tropics, the contribution of fertilisers might be even higher.

That is why conversations about whether the world should go organic or
not get so messy. The reality is that the world cannot go organic. Too many
of us rely on fertilisers to survive. As we’ll see later, many countries can
reduce the amount of fertiliser they use without sacrificing food production,
but we can’t do this everywhere.

Half of the world population is reliant on synthetic fertilisers for food
Without synthetic fertilisers, the world could only support a population about half the size that it is
today.

Norman Borlaug: the Green Revolutionist
Fritz Haber and Carl Bosch were the agricultural heroes in the first half of
the 20th century. Norman Borlaug gets the crown for the second half.

Borlaug was an American scientist, born in 1914, shortly after Haber
and Bosch had their fertiliser breakthrough.13 In the 1940s he was
employed by the Rockefeller Foundation and sent off to Mexico to try to
solve a problem that many had already given up on. Mexican farmers were
struggling with the problem of ‘stem rust’. Their wheat was being infected
by a fungus, Puccinia graminis, which causes disease in the plant. It’s a
common, but terrible problem for cereal production. The rust makes the
harvest and yield of wheat very poor: it sucks up the essential nutrients that
the crop needs to grow.

Borlaug was tasked with finding a solution. He started an ambitious
series of plant-breeding experiments, such as breeding the same type of
wheat at different latitudes and climates, an experiment that went totally
against any basic rules of botany – much to his supervisor’s despair. The
conditions of the programme were rough. The Mexican farmers were not
particularly welcoming – they had experienced too many failed experiments
of this type before. Borlaug lacked the funding and team for the ambitious
project he wanted, but over the course of the next 10 years, he tried more
than 6,000 cross-breedings of wheat crops. Borlaug’s persistence paid off,
and he made a series of breakthroughs that transformed the crops available
to farmers across Mexico.

In 1960, Mexican farmers could expect a wheat yield of 1.5 tonnes per
hectare. Today, with the improved varieties of wheat that Borlaug unlocked,
they can get 5.5 tonnes per hectare. Crop yields more than tripled, and
Mexico went from being a net importer of wheat to a net exporter. Once
dependent on other countries, they could now grow more than they’d ever
need to feed themselves.

Borlaug’s work didn’t stop there. He was soon in South Asia, where
India and Pakistan experienced the same results as Mexico: stubborn crop
yields suddenly skyrocketed. In 1960, they were achieving less than one
tonne per hectare. Now they produced more than three tonnes. This
transformative change in how crops were produced across the world was
later called the ‘Green Revolution’, and Norman Borlaug received the
Nobel Peace Prize for his work in 1970. His persistence and willingness to
disregard the conventional rules is estimated to have saved the lives of over
a billion people. He silenced the calls that the world would soon be on the
brink of famine. His cross-breeding breakthroughs showed that even when
the challenges seem insurmountable, there is often an opportunity to
engineer our way out.

The Green Revolution saw wheat yields rise dramatically
Access to fertilisers, improved crop varieties and agricultural inputs led to a doubling, tripling or
greater increase in yields.

The innovations of geniuses like Carl Bosch, Fritz Haber and Norman
Borlaug mean we can now grow unimaginable quantities of food –
production that far outstrips the amount we actually need.i Yet there’s still
panic about overpopulation. ‘There are just too many people, that’s the
problem’ is a claim I hear all the time. The notion that global hunger exists
because there are just too many mouths to feed is widespread, even leading
to calls for depopulation.

The depopulation argument is not a new one. Throughout the 1950s, 60s
and 70s, concerns about the world running out of food ran high. In 1968,
the UN published a report titled ‘International Action to Avert the
Impending Protein Crisis’.14 That was the same year that Paul R. Ehrlich’s
book The Population Bomb said that population growth is out of control;
we will never be able to produce enough food; there will be large-scale
famines; and hundreds of millions will starve to death within decades.

Of course, we now know that his predictions did not come true. That’s
totally fine: nearly everyone who makes predictions about the future turns
out to be wrong. What makes his book so terrible are the inhumane policies
he advocated for based on this strong (and wrong) conviction. World
population had to be strictly managed. Humans were cancer – a reproducing
organism that had to be controlled. As he put it: ‘we can no longer afford
merely to treat the symptoms of the cancer of population growth; the cancer
itself must be cut out’.

In the US and other rich countries, he discusses the option of adding
temporary sterilants to the water or food supply.

ii Rather than providing
financial support to families, ‘responsibility prizes’ could be handed out to
couples who reached five years of childless marriage, or men who accepted
irreversible sterilisation. Another idea was to have special lotteries where
tickets were only handed out to the childless.

That’s nauseating. But it’s nothing compared to his suggestions for
‘underdeveloped countries’. Not only did he suggest sterilisation
programmes, but he also proposed a ‘triaged’ system of who should be left
to starve to death. Some countries could be redeemable – they might be able
to dig their way out of it. But some countries were a lost cause. Rich
countries should withdraw any food aid and support, and just leave them to
die. It’s not clear how committed Paul R. Ehrlich really was to these ideas.

But many – including senior officials in the US government – took his
suggestions seriously. He could have cruelly affected the lives of billions
based on predictions that turned out to be wrong.15
It’s possible to feed 8, 9, 10 billion people a nutritious diet without
wrecking the planet. We don’t need population control to do it; we just need
a better plan for how to grow what we need and use it more efficiently.

Where we are today
Hungry cattle; greedy cars
So, how can it possibly be true that we produce 5,000 to 6,000 caloriesiii per
person per day, more than double what we need, yet still struggle to feed
everyone?
The obvious answer is global inequality. Hundreds of millions don’t get
enough to eat, but billions get too much. Around four in 10 adults in the
world are overweight. For most of human history the biggest battle was to
get enough food to eat. Now, the hungry are a minority. The fact that
obesity rates have increased so quickly across the world is actually a signal
of how new and rare this situation is: evolving in a world of scarcity, we’ve
been programmed to make the most of any food we can get our hands on.

So, yes, part of the answer is that globally we eat more than we need. Still,
we’re not eating 5,000 calories per day. We’re probably eating around half
of that. The bigger question is how we can possibly lose half of the food we
produce before it even reaches our plates. That is a woefully inefficient
system.

The reason is that we feed livestock and cars, not people. The world
produces 3 billion tonnes of cereals every year. Less than half of this goes
towards human food; 41% is fed to livestock, and 11% is used for industrial
uses, like biofuels. That global allocation is surprising, but when we look at
specific countries the balance is jaw-dropping.

Poor countries use nearly all of their cereals for human food. In Chad,
Malawi, Rwanda, India, for example, the number is more than 90%. When
you can only just produce enough for everyone, you can’t afford to put it
into cars, or feed it to other animals. Diverting food away from humans is a
luxury. Many richer countries take this luxury to the extreme. The amount
of maize that the US puts into cars for biofuels is 50% more than the entire
African continent produces.iv This is not unique to the US: across the world,
feeding crops directly to humans is becoming the minority position. The US
is quite unique in just how much is allocated to biofuels. For most other
countries it is animal feed that dominates, with our cereals going to hungry
chickens, cattle and pigs.

Only half of the world’s cereals goes directly to human food
Poorer countries use nearly all of their cereals for direct human food. Richer countries divert more
and more towards animal feed and industrial uses, such as biofuels.

It’s not just cereals. This is also true of other crops. As seen in the last
chapter, around three-quarters of the world’s soy is processed into feed and
goes into the mouths of chickens, pigs and cows.v
Meaty dilemma: an inefficient way of making tasty food
When we feed animals, some of the calories go towards building lean tissue
and fat that we can eat later. But the majority disappears. How can this be?
Where do these calories go?
We want animals to gain weight because we get more meat in return.

But even if they didn’t gain weight, we’d still need to feed them to keep
them alive. Those calories are burned in normal day-to-day activities:
roaming around, pecking, mooing, keeping all of their organs functioning.

It’s no different from humans. In a very crude and cruel sense, the calories
we feed animals just to keep them alive are a ‘waste’. How much ‘waste’
depends on the animal. The bigger the animal, the more food we need to
feed it to keep it alive. Again, it’s no different from humans. Arnold
Schwarzenegger needs to eat a lot more food than I do to maintain his
weight. That’s simply because I am a smaller person. Even if we copied
each other’s daily routine and did all of the same activities, he would
probably burn through at least 50% more calories.

This simple relationship is useful: smaller animals are more calorieefficient. Fish and chickens tend to be the most efficient, then pigs, then
sheep, then cows.vi Unfortunately this means the opposite for animal
welfare: you’d need to kill more of them to get the same amount of meat.

How you balance that moral quandry is up to you. Measuring ‘calorie
efficiency’ tells us what percentage of the calories we feed an animal is
converted into ‘eatable’ products for humans. These figures are quite
shocking.

For beef, it’s just 3%.16, 17, vii This means that for every 100 calories we
feed a cow, we get just 3 calories of meat back in return; 97 calories are
effectively wasted. For lamb, it’s around 4%. Better than cows, but still
crushingly bad. Pork is almost 10%. For chicken, it’s 13%. Even for the
most efficient of animals, the vast majority – more than 80% – of calories
are wasted. That fact is quite hard to stomach. Can you imagine buying a
loaf of bread, cutting a slice, and throwing the rest – more than 90% of it –
in the bin? When it comes to calories, that’s pretty much what we’re doing
with meat.

So, the calorie equation doesn’t look great for meat. But what about
protein? Here, livestock are also pretty inefficient converters of protein. For
pork, lamb and beef, more than 90% of the protein they eat from animal
feed is lost. Put 100 grams of protein in, and you get just 10 grams back.

Chicken is better, but we still only get 20% of the protein back in the form
of meat.

Most calories are ‘wasted’ when we feed livestock for meat
Only a small percentage of the calories we feed animals are converted into meat.

Bigger animals ‘waste’ more calories.

Where meat and dairy products are good is that they are what we call a
‘complete’ protein source. They might lose a lot of the protein we feed them
but what they do produce is higher quality, with a full spectrum of the
essential amino acids we need for good health. Cereals have some but not
all of these amino acids. If you were to eat only cereals, you would be
protein-deficient.18 This is not the case with all plant-based products. Pulses
such as peas, beans and soy have a very good amino acid profile. If
someone has a mix of cereals and pulses in their diet, they can easily meet
their protein requirements.

Meat and dairy products are also a great source of micronutrients –
things like calcium and iron. We can get these from a plant-based diet too,
by picking the right combination of foods. The exception to this is vitamin
B12, which is only found in animal products. This is the one nutrient that
vegans should be supplementing their diet with. So, technically we don’t
need meat and dairy for a nutritious diet. It’s possible to meet these
requirements with a well-planned and diverse plant-based one. But this is
not feasible for everyone. I could achieve this quite easily because I have a
large supermarket two streets away, with every food imaginable there. Most
importantly, I am privileged enough to be able to spend as much as I need
to on a wide range of foods. I can buy supplements if I need them. And,
after studying this for so long, I know what foods I need to make sure I’m
covering all my nutritional bases.

Most people in the world don’t have it so easy. In poorer countries, more
than two-thirds of people’s calories come from staple foods such as cereals
and tuber crops. In Bangladesh, for example, nearly 80% of calories come
from these foods. The majority rely on rice and wheat. For comparison, in
the UK, we get just one-third from cereals and root crops. The rest come
from a range of sources: fruits, vegetables, pulses, meats and dairy. Having
access to different foods, and being able to afford them, is a privilege.

Meat has played an essential role in human diets for millennia. It’s
wasteful but nutritious, not to mention tasty. However, if we’re to build a
food system that feeds everyone without ruining the planet, we need to
rethink our relationship with meat.

Food: the heart of the world’s sustainability problems
Look at any of the world’s environmental problems and food lies close to
the centre. It really is at the nexus of sustainability. As seen in Chapter 3,
the food system is responsible for one-quarter of the world’s greenhouse gas
emissions. But even if we were to take climate change out of the picture, we
would need to fix our food system to tackle our other environmental
problems.

Worried about pressures on freshwater supplies? Agriculture is
responsible for around 70% of global freshwater withdrawals. In some
tropical countries, more than 90% is used for farming.19 Worried about
deforestation? As we have seen, take agriculture out of the picture and the
problem almost disappears. Worried about biodiversity loss? Again, food
production is the biggest pressure on the world’s wildlife.20 It always has
been. From overhunting animals for food and claiming their habitats for
farmland, to killing off ecosystems with pesticides and fertilisers, the largest
threat to the world’s animals is human demand for food. Worried about
water pollution? You guessed it: farming comes out on top. When we put
nutrients in our soils and crops, most of them run off the land and into
rivers, lakes and the ocean. These nutrients throw ecosystems into havoc:
species such as algae take advantage and bloom everywhere. Fish and other
animals are starved of oxygen, and our waters turn into zones dead of life.

Zoom out and we can see the scale of the impact that farming has had on
reshaping our planet. Today, half of the world’s ice- and desert-free land is
used for agriculture. Much more land is used for farming than the world has
in the form of forests. Three-quarters of this is used for raising livestock –
either land for grazing or for growing crops to feed it. What’s staggering is
how imbalanced this is when it comes to the food we finally eat. Meat and
dairy give us just 18% of our calories, and 37% of our protein. We put a lot
of resources into livestock, but the returns are not great.

Half of the world’s habitable land is used for agriculture
Agriculture is the largest driver of deforestation and habitat loss. Three-quarters of agricultural land
is used for livestock.

If we created a global map of the different land uses – grouping each of
them together – land for raising animals would take up the whole of North,
Central and South America combined, from the top of Alaska down to the
tip of Rio Grande in Argentina.

Many of the environmental problems in farming relate to two things:
how much land we use, and how we manage inputs such as water and
fertilisers. The solutions we need to feed everyone in a sustainable way
come back to trying to reduce the amount of land we use for farming as
much as possible. We should give other wildlife as much land back as we
can. Globally we are making progress on this, often because of the
intensification of agriculture: using inputs such as fertilisers to get higher
yields. There, too, we are making progress – a fact that comes as a surprise
to many.

The world may have already passed peak agricultural land
With more people to feed, and people moving to diets that need more land
(the more meat we eat, the more land we need), we might assume that our
demand for farmland is never-ending. Globally it will simply rise until the
population stops growing. That would be very bad news.

Thankfully it is not true. A few years ago a number of researchers
predicted that we might be close to peak agricultural land.21 I have to admit,
when I first heard this I brushed it off as nonsense. Surely it wasn’t
possible. Okay, crop yields were increasing and might just keep up with a
growing population, but our appetite for meat was also growing quickly. It
seemed implausible that we were becoming so efficient that we were
countering that too.

I started digging into the data and crunched the numbers. The leading
data source – the UN’s FAO – suggests that we passed the peak around the
year 2000. Other studies have built on this work, finding the same: the
world has already passed the peak.22 What makes me hesitant to declare a
‘definitive’ peak is that while the data tells us that global pasture land has
peaked croplands have not. If croplands keep expanding, it’s possible that
this victory could be undone.

At the very least, the world is near the peak of agricultural land. And yet
we continue to produce more and more food each year. There has been a
global decoupling of agricultural land from food production.viii That is a
momentous moment in our environmental history. The world’s wildlife has
been waiting thousands of years for us to stop expanding. There is finally
the opportunity to make this happen.

The world may have passed peak agricultural land
Global pasture land has peaked, but croplands have not. Obviously, agricultural land use has not
peaked everywhere in the world.

This is definitely not happening everywhere. In many richer countries
agricultural land use is falling. In other countries croplands and pastures are
still expanding, often at the cost of forests. The decline is managing to more
than offset the expansion. The end result globally is a decline. It is a strong
sign that we can produce more food from less land. If we take these lessons
and apply them everywhere then we can achieve this everywhere. It shows
that the future of food production does not need to follow the destructive
path that it did in the past.

The world will soon pass peak fertiliser
Using less land is all well and good. But one of the reasons we can produce
so much more from a hectare of land is that we can use inputs such as
nutrients, pesticides and irrigation to raise crop yields. Many people are
concerned that we are just substituting one unsustainable practice for
another, ending up in a rat race for fertilisers.

In fact, the amount of fertiliser the world uses each year has barely
changed in the last decade. Fertiliser consumption grew rapidly in the 50
years before then, more than quadrupling. But this has now stalled. We
might just be at the tipping point where fertiliser use starts to decline.

The world may be approaching ‘peak fertiliser’
Improved efficiency of fertiliser use means many countries are producing more food from less
fertiliser.

With more people to feed, how can this be? Fertiliser use is still increasing
in many poorer countries in the world. This is a good thing – we saw earlier
just how impactful the innovation of Fritz Haber and Carl Bosch has been.

But fertiliser use has plateaued or is falling in many rich countries. In
the US, fertiliser use hasn’t increased since the mid-1970s. Meanwhile,
food production has increased by 75%. France now uses about half as much
fertiliser as it did in the 1980s. The same is true in the UK and the
Netherlands. Even in the most rapidly growing economies, fertiliser use is
reaching its peak. China has passed it. By 2010, it was using around 25
times more fertiliser than 50 years earlier. That steep upwards line looked
concerning. But China’s fertiliser use peaked in 2015, and it has fallen since
then.

These reductions didn’t happen because countries were cutting back on
food or going organic and cutting out synthetic fertilisers completely. It’s
because we were becoming more effective at using them. One of the
world’s biggest and most impressive studies shows this very clearly.

23 In a
trial that spanned a decade, researchers worked with 21 million smallholder
farmers across China. They wanted to see if they could help farmers to
increase crop yields while reducing the environmental impacts of farming.

They were successful. From 2005 to 2015, average yields of maize, rice and
wheat increased by around 11%. At the same time, nitrogen fertiliser use
decreased by around one-sixth. They were literally producing more from
less.

With fertiliser use, then, we see a consistent pattern. First, in the poorest
countries, farmers use very little fertiliser. They can’t afford it. This is bad
for them because they get poor yields and earn little money. It’s also bad for
the planet because they need to use more farmland. As they get a little
richer, fertiliser use starts to rise. Crop yields improve. But, eventually, the
focus shifts towards using these inputs more efficiently. Fertiliser use
doesn’t fall to zero, but farmers learn to use just the right amount to give
crops the nutrients they need.

How to feed everyone without destroying the planet
How can we feed an extra 2 billion people this century without destroying
the planet?
One thing that should be obvious by now is that we can’t go backwards.

It’s tempting to think we should return to a way of producing food that
seems more rooted, more grounded, in how things used to be. These
methods can work at a small scale. But they don’t feed billions. The maths
just doesn’t check out.

I’ve crunched the numbers on how much land we would need to support
our current population of 8 billion people using different foraging and
farming regimes. Remember: the amount of habitable land on Earth – that’s
all our ice- and desert-free land – is around 100 million km2
, and we
currently use half of it – 50 million km2
 – for farming.

To support 8 billion through hunting and foraging we would need 8,000
to 800,000 million km2 of viable land. That’s 100 to 10,000 times the
amount of land we have on Earth. That’s also ignoring the inconvenient
reality that we’d wipe out all mammals along the way.

What about pastoralism? Small communities that rely on livestock? That
is not much better than the most productive foraging societies. We’d need
around 3,000 to 8,000 million km2
. Or 10 Earths.

How about a return to early, organic methods of farming? Could we all
have our own little plot of land, roll up our sleeves and get back to how
farming used to be? For shifting agriculture – the slash-and-burn style –
we’d need between 80 and 800 million km2
. Getting closer, but we still
don’t have nearly enough land to live like that. For more traditional farming
in one place we’d need between 8 and 80 million km2 which – at least
towards the lower end – is much more realistic. But this would only work if
everyone ate a plant-based diet so we could feed them efficiently on
croplands. And we’d probably have to cut down many of our forests along
the way.

With modern farming we could feed 8 billion people on much less land.

Possibly as little as 4 to 8 million km2
if we achieve very productive
farming across the world and move to plant-based diets (which are very big
ifs).

So, it’s just not feasible for us to go backward. There’s just not enough
room for 8 billion of us to do so.

How to build a more sustainable food system
I panic when people ask the dreaded question ‘So, Hannah, what do you
do?’ I know that within a minute I’ll be knee-deep in a heated debate about
what everyone in the world should be eating. People love to discuss it.

Everyone has an opinion about it. How and what we eat is deeply personal.

Diets often become a strong part of our identity. It becomes tribal. The rules
are binary. A vegan is someone who doesn’t eat animal products. If you do,
well, you’re not a vegan. You’re out of the tribe. To stay in a proper
ketogenic state you have to keep carbohydrate intake very low. Exceed that,
and you’re knocked out of this state. Organic and GMO-free are both binary
labels. It’s certified as organic or it’s not. It’s labelled as GMO-free or it’s
not. Preaching and shaming are common. I don’t want to tell people what to
eat. It’s none of my business. At the same time, I do want to give clear and
straightforward answers to the basic questions of how we can eat more
sustainably. I want to give people the information they need to make an
informed decision, then leave them to do so based on what they value. If
they don’t care about the carbon footprint of their diet, that’s fine by me.

What I find painful is when people really do care about eating sustainably,
but they’re making choices based on poor information, putting effort into all
the wrong places. They’re trying hard but not making things any better. In
fact, sometimes they’re making things worse.

Here I want to give my top recommendations for how we build a more
sustainable food system. Whether you take this advice is up to you.

Sometimes these recommendations will conflict with other values you have,
and that’s okay. It’s for you to balance your own priorities.

(1) Improve crop yields across the world
We’re now in a unique position. We’ve broken that deadlock with nature:
we can now get more food from less land.24
But there is an exception. Most countries across sub-Saharan Africa
have lagged behind. Crop yields haven’t improved much, and are
stubbornly low. The average cereal yield across Africa is half that of India
and one-fifth of the yields in the US. This is not only bad for the planet, but
for people too. More than half of the workforce across sub-Saharan Africa
are farmers, and earn very little money in return. Many live on the
equivalent of less than a few dollars per day.

25
Crop yields across sub-Saharan Africa are lagging behind
Cereal yields are measured in tonnes per hectare.

Africa will need to grow a lot more food in the coming decades. In the next
30 years, it is expected to add another billion to its population, and then
another billion in the 30 years after that. Researchers estimate that the
amount of land it needs for crops could almost triple by 2050 if yields do
not improve.

Improving crop yields – especially across sub-Saharan Africa – needs to
be part of the plan. If the region achieves this – if it manages to close its
‘yield gaps’ of what is biologically and technologically feasible – then it can
feed itself without losing any forest or natural habitat at all. The good news
is that we know how to do this.

The technologies and investments that have already worked for so many
countries – from fertilisers to improved seed varieties to irrigation – will
become even more important with climate change. Farmers will need better
control over the management of nutrients and water as temperatures rise
and droughts become more common and more intense.

Just as Norman Borlaug engineered incredibly productive wheat crops in
Mexico, India, Pakistan, Brazil (the list goes on), we can also develop new
varieties of crops that are more resistant to drought and can withstand
higher temperatures. Many of these innovations also mean that we can have
crops that need fewer fertilisers and pesticides. Crops that need fewer
chemical inputs, are more resistant to drought, and get higher yields –
what’s not to like? It sounds like a win-win for people and planet. Strangely,
many environmentalists are strongly opposed to cross-breeding and genetic
modification of crops even though they have been incredibly important for
protecting ecosystems and habitats across the world. We need to overcome
this opposition. If we want to feed 10 billion people without cutting down
more forest, the environmental movement needs to cautiously embrace
rather than shun the advances that will help us grow more from less.

(2) Eat less meat, especially beef and lamb
You’ve already seen this recommendation.

Chapter 3 looked at some of the climate impacts of different foods. The
carbon footprint of meat – especially beef and lamb – really stood out. But
it’s not just about climate change. Because food plays such a big role across
many environmental issues, this single change has many positive spillovers.

Whether it’s greenhouse gas emissions, land use, water use, or water
pollution,ix the hierarchy is nearly always the same: beef and lamb are the
worst, followed by dairy, pork, chicken, then plant-based foods such as
tofu, peas, beans and cereals. This is true whether we compare them in
kilograms, calories or protein. The differences here are not small. It’s not
like we’re splitting hairs over using 100 metres squared of farmland rather
than 99. It’s the difference between using 100 metres squared or 1. Literally
100 times the difference.

So, once again the biggest thing we can do is to eat less meat and dairy.

If we want to really change things at scale we need lots of people to get on
board. We would cut emissions, land use and water use by much more if
half the population went meat-free two days a week than we would from
increasing veganism by a few per cent.

Most people aren’t going to change if they’re offered an all-or-nothing
alternative. One of the worst ways to get someone to reduce their meat
consumption is to tell them to go vegan. It just doesn’t work. We need to
make it simple and enjoyable for people to cut back a bit. That might be
Meatless Mondays or meat-free lunches. Often people dip their toes into the
water of a more plant-based diet and find it’s easier than expected.

But it’s not just how much meat and dairy we eat that matters. It’s also
what types. We can have a massive impact by simply switching one type of
meat for another. If you’re a big beef eater then replacing some of your
weekly intake with chicken or fish is the biggest thing you can do. In fact,
that change makes much more of a difference than a chicken eater going
vegetarian.

What foods have the largest environmental impact?
Meat and dairy – especially beef and lamb – have a much higher environmental impact then plantbased protein sources. Foods are compared per 100 grams of protein.

We can see this very clearly when it comes to agricultural land use. The
world uses around 4 billion hectares of land to grow food.x Researchers
mapped out scenarios of how this would change if everyone in the world
adopted different diets. Still, it gives us an interesting look at what our
global land use could look like. Simply cutting out beef and lamb (but still
keeping dairy cows) would nearly halve our need for global farmland. We’d
save 2 billion hectares, which is an area twice the size of the United States.

That is, by far, where the biggest saving comes from. And it doesn’t mean
that we all need to go vegan.

If we were to cut out dairy too, we’d halve this land use again to just
over 1 billion hectares. Three USA-sized farms saved. But from there, the
reductions are marginal. Sure, the vegan diet does minimise it the most: if
everyone ate a vegan diet we’d reduce the amount of land we use for
farming by 75%. An area the size of North America, plus Brazil. But the
savings compared to a diet with some chicken, or some fish and eggs are
not that big.

This research also squashes another big concern I hear: ‘We can’t all go
vegan – we don’t have enough land to grow crops!’ As I’ve already shown,
if everyone went vegan we would need less cropland than we use today
because we’d save all the land used to grow crops fed to livestock. Less
than half of the world’s cereals are fed directly to humans. The rest goes to
livestock or biofuels. The same is true for soy. We could simply repurpose
that food, or repurpose that land to grow different crops.

This all sounds very simple in principle but getting people to change
behaviours is difficult. I don’t think that enough people will make this
change based on the ethical pull alone. If we’re to change how people eat
across the world we’re going to need some new, tasty, meat-like products.

Shifting to plant-based diets could reduce agricultural land use by 75%
Global agricultural land use is given for cropland and pasture for grazing livestock assuming
everyone in the world adopted a given diet. This is based on reference diets that meet calorie and
protein nutritional requirements.

(3) Invest in meat substitutes: building burgers in the lab
When I went vegetarian for the first time, my family’s carbon footprint got
bigger. The reason wasn’t me but my brother: he started on a fitness kick at
exactly the same time. He was in the gym six times a week, and, as per the
conventional fitness advice, he doubled his meat intake overnight. Meat and
broccoli for every meal. While I cut back on meat he offset my good
intentions, and then some.

He’d never have eaten soy-based burgers and Quorn sausages instead.

He said they tasted nothing like meat. The meat-substitute products on the
market were really sparse at the time. We would try to sneak them into
family meals to see if he’d notice. Chicken fajitas became Quorn chickenlike fajitas. Spaghetti bolognese became spaghetti bolognese with soy-based
mince. He was never fooled.

The day I knew the world was on to something – that we were really
making progress – is when, some years later, he ate a plant-based meal and
didn’t notice. His wife sneaked one of the ‘plant-based meats’ into a chilli
con ‘carne’ and he didn’t blink an eye. In fact, he couldn’t believe it wasn’t
meat. If anything, he said it was the best chilli he’d ever had. If my brother
can be won over, almost anyone can.

Meat-substitute products are one of the fastest-growing food sectors.

Interestingly, it’s mostly meat eaters that eat them. Ninety-eight per cent of
US consumers who bought plant-based meats were also buying meat
products.26 That’s a great sign: we want plant-based meats to be something
everyone is open to trying. They should never be a niche product for the
vegans and vegetarians of the world.

To really eat into the meat market they need to achieve four things: be
tasty, accessible, easy to work into standard meals, and cheap. If we fail on
any of these, they will stay on the sidelines forever.

Most people love meat, so the theory behind meat-substitute products is
simple: let’s try to recreate the experience of meat without the
environmental impacts and animal welfare concerns. In just a few years, the
world has come a long way. Imitation burgers and sausages used to taste
like cardboard. But brands such as Impossible Foods and Beyond Meat –
the biggest meat-free companies in the US – are changing the game.

They’re investing heavily in making burgers that taste and feel just like the
real deal. This strategy lies at the heart of their branding.

A claim by Impossible Foods makes this abundantly clear: ‘Before
Impossible Foods, there was meat and there were plants. Back in 2011, we
started with a simple question: “What makes meat taste like meat?” Then
we figured out how to make it with plants.’ The secret to its success is the
molecule heme. ‘Heme is what makes meat taste like meat. It’s an essential
molecule found in every living plant and animal – most abundantly in
animals – and something we’ve been eating and craving since the dawn of
humanity.’
With their ‘bleeding plant-based burger’ I think Impossible have
succeeded in creating an almost perfect impersonator. A couple of years ago
our team was based in San Francisco for three months. There were only a
few restaurants in the world where you could get the Impossible Burger,
and we were staying right next to one. The first bite I took was like a time
machine. I don’t find it difficult to be vegetarian – I’m rarely tempted to eat
meat – but that was a hard-hitting reminder of what a meaty burger tastes
like. It was incredible. I was devastated when we had to leave and return to
the UK, where it wasn’t available.xi But more products have flooded the
market since then, all battling to get closer and closer to the real deal.

Many have questioned whether these products are actually much better
for the environment. The answer is yes. They’re much better than beef.

27, 28
Emissions from Quorn products are 35 to 50 times lower than beef. Switch
your beefburger for a Beyond Meat or Impossible Burger and you’ll cut
emissions by around 96%. This is comparing these products to the global
average footprint for beef. Substitutes still have a footprint around 10 times
smaller than beef from the US or Europe. And even the footprint of the
world’s lowest-carbon beef is still five times bigger than the Beyond Meat
or Impossible Burger, and 10 times bigger than Quorn.

Most also have a lower carbon footprint than pork and chicken, although
sometimes not by much. What’s different about these foods is that there’s
lots of room to improve: a big chunk of their carbon footprint comes from
the electricity needed to produce them. As the world moves towards a lowcarbon energy grid, the footprint of these foods will get better too. That’s
not the case with meats: we’re quickly reaching our limits on how
efficiently we can produce animals.

If we’re to be successful in moving meat from the field to the lab at a
global level, it will have to become much cheaper. People in poorer
countries simply can’t afford these products yet. If we can make them
cheaper than meat, it could really change the game for global nutrition. We
could feed the world a protein-rich, nutritious diet while reducing our
environmental impacts at the same time. Every time you buy a new
substitute product, you’re not just lowering your own carbon footprint,
you’re helping to pull down the price for the rest of the world too.

Most meat substitutes have a much lower carbon footprint than meat
Carbon footprints are shown per 100 grams of protein for each product. This is based on life-cycle
analyses, which include emissions on the farm, land-use change, raw materials, food processing,
transport and packaging.

(4) Build a hybrid burger
While many would be happy to tuck into a plant-based Impossible Burger,
others will want to stick with beefburgers. Well, maybe they can have their
beef but save some too.

One option is to blend beef with chicken, soy or other low-carbon
protein sources, to build the hybrid burger. It would still taste like beef. It
would have the texture of a normal beefburger. I mean, it still would be
beef. Interestingly, in blind taste tests people tend to prefer a blended burger
over a 100% beef or 100% meat alternative version.29, 30 But when you
unblind these tests and tell people that they’re eating a ‘blended’ burger,
they tend to be less keen. If we can overcome this mental block, hybrids
could make a massive difference.

Let’s crunch the numbers on how much of a difference: by my
calculations, if both McDonald’s and Burger King made all their burgers a
50:50 blend of beef and soy, it would save 50 million tonnes of greenhouse
gases each year.

xii That’s equal to the emissions of Portugal. It would also
free up an area of land bigger than Ireland and save 3 million cows from
being slaughtered for meat each year.

That’s just two companies. Imagine if we did this on a much larger
scale. We could save countries’ worth of emissions, countries’ worth of
land, and millions of animals each year. The real selling point is that
consumers wouldn’t have to change their eating habits at all. They might
barely notice the difference. Better yet, they might find hybrid burgers even
tastier.

(5) Substitute dairy with plant-based alternatives
In the typical diet in the EU, dairy accounts for just over one-quarter of the
carbon footprint, sometimes as much as one-third.31
Many of us are looking to plant-based alternatives. In the UK, surveys
suggest one-quarter of adults now drink some non-dairy milks,32 and it’s
even more popular in younger demographics, with one-third of 16- to 23-
year-olds choosing them. There are now multiple options. But which ‘milk’
is best? This is one of the most common questions I get asked.

The short answer is: any of them. Take your pick. All of the plant-based
alternatives have lower environmental impacts than cow’s milk. Cow’s milk
generates around three times as much greenhouse gas emissions, uses
around 10 times as much land, up to 20 times as much fresh water, and
creates much higher levels of eutrophication (the pollution of waters with
excess nutrients).33
Choosing which of the vegan milks is best for you really depends on the
impact you care most about. Almond milk has lower greenhouse gas
emissions and uses less land than soy, for example, but requires more water.

There’s no clear winner on every metric. Just pick the one you enjoy the
most.

Which type of milk is best for the environment?
Environmental impacts are shown per litre of milk. No plant-based milk wins on all metrics, but all
have a much smaller impact on the environment than cow’s milk.

I should caveat this by saying that plant-based milks don’t have the same
nutritional profile as dairy. Dairy milk tends to be higher in calories and
protein. It also contains micronutrients, such as vitamin B12, that plantbased milks don’t have. But plant-based milks are now often fortified with
vitamins D and B12. The replacement of dairy with plant-based milks
shouldn’t be a concern for those with a diverse diet, and for those who do
not rely on milk as an important source of protein. It’s possible to meet
these requirements from other foods. However, for certain demographics –
especially young children, and those on lower incomes with poor dietary
diversity – this might be a bad switch.

(6) Waste less food
Around one-third of the world’s food goes to waste.34, 35 Here, by ‘waste’,
I’m not including all of the energy we lose when we feed crops to livestock
or put them in our cars. I’m talking about food that literally rots away,
without being used for anything.

That figure of one-third is how much food we waste based on the weight
of food. It’s not necessarily the amount we lose in terms of calories or
protein. On the basis of calories it is less – probably around 20%. The
reason for this difference is that the foods we waste most of are the heavy,
water-laden ones. The fruits, vegetables, sugar cane and tuber crops like
cassava. They get bruised and bashed easily, and rot quickly. These foods
are great for a diverse diet, and rich in nutrients, but have fewer calories
than cereals, grains and meats.

When we imagine food ‘waste’ we often picture rich people throwing
their leftovers in the bin. In many countries, this is the dominant kind. It’s
the food we throw away at home, in restaurants, or the stuff left on shelves
in supermarkets. It is, to some extent, deliberate. We are making a
deliberate choice not to eat it.

But globally, and certainly in poorer countries, most waste happens in
supply chains, and is referred to as ‘losses’. It’s usually unintentional, and
painful for farmers and food producers because it’s money they lose from
their pockets. This food is ‘lost’ in a number of ways. Farmers try to harvest
with improper tools and much of the crop is left behind in the field; foods
are collected in old material sacks that leak everywhere; crops get infested
with pests and diseases; they’re left to rot in the sun; and there is often no
refrigeration to keep them fresh in transport.

When I was talking to one of my previous bosses – Mike Berners-Lee –
about food losses, he remarked that it was ‘just a Tupperware problem’.

That’s stuck with me ever since. He’s right. If the world had more
Tupperware it would lose a lot less food. In fact, there are studies to prove
it.36 Researchers in South Asia tested what difference it would make to
switch fabric sacks for cheap plastic crates. When farmers and distributors
transport their food in sacks, you can imagine how bruised and battered
their tomatoes and mangoes are by the time they get to the market. As much
as one-fifth of food transported this way has to be thrown away. When they
used plastic crates instead, these losses were reduced by up to 87%; rather
than losing one-fifth, they’d lose as little as 3%.

That’s not the only change we need to make in supply chains. We also
need to increase refrigeration from farm to market, and while food is at the
market. Wrapping produce in materials like plastic (you’re shuddering, I
know) can increase shelf life and protect from pests and disease. Foods also
need appropriate storage locations so they’re not left out in the sun. These
seem like simple changes, but they would make a massive difference.

Food waste in households, restaurants and shops is a different issue. In
principle it should be straightforward: just buy what you need and make
sure you eat it. But human behaviour is hard to change. There are some
things that can help. Opt for the ‘uglier’ fruits and vegetables in
supermarkets which get left behind like orphans. Don’t fall for offers like
‘buy one, get one free’ or ‘three for the price of two’, unless you really will
eat them. Don’t live by ‘best before’ dates. Many supermarkets are now
scrubbing these as people often confuse ‘best before’ with ‘use by’ and
assume that this is its funeral date. In fact, it’s exactly as it describes:
probably tastiest and freshest before that date, but still fine afterwards. We
need to find better ways of distributing unused food from supermarkets and
restaurants. There’s no way it should be dumped in landfills when it could
be going to perfectly good homes, especially to those who are struggling.

The environmental benefits of reducing food waste and losses are
massive, and aren’t limited to the environmental costs of the food rotting in
the landfill. Sure, that emits some greenhouse gases but it’s only a tiny
fraction of its impact. The bigger problem is the waste of all the land, water
and greenhouse gas emissions in producing the food in the first place.

(7) Don’t rely on indoor farming
I’m an enthusiast for new technology. So you’d think I’d be a zealot for any
innovation that would let us grow food using much less land. That’s what
indoor, vertical farming promises. Unfortunately, it’s a technology I don’t
think will deliver.

The concept of vertical farming is quite simple. Rather than using
energy from the sun to grow crops, we can use indoor LED lights instead.

Rather than using soils, we can add nutrients and seeds to water trays –
called ‘hydroponics’. The magic lies in the fact that these trays can be
stacked on top of each other. Vertical farms are a bit like skyscrapers.

Megacities struggled to house so many people without sprawling outwards.

The solution was to build upwards. Vertical farms could let us grow 10, 20,
maybe even 100 times as much food per hectare than a normal outdoor
farm.37
The use of water and fertilisers is considerably less.38 All the conditions
– temperature, humidity and light settings – can be controlled and crops are
no longer at the mercy of the latest pest outbreak or extreme weather event.

We can produce all our food in the middle of cities, right where we need it.

If that all sounds a bit too good to be true, it’s because it is. The problem
with vertical farming is that it needs a lot of energy. The sun is replaced
with electric lights which need to be pretty powerful to mimic the fireball in
the sky. I wanted to understand just how much electricity we’d need in
order to produce some of our food from vertical farms. I looked at lettuce –
one of the most popular indoor crops. If the US were to produce all its
lettuce from vertical farms, the electricity demand would be equal to around
2% of the US’s total electricity use. If 2% sounds small to you, consider
that lettuce provides each person with around 5 calories per day. We’d be
increasing the US’s electricity use by 2% to meet 0.2% of its calorie needs.

Vertical farming is only feasible – and even then, barely feasible – for a
few crops. Fruits and vegetables are expensive to grow but also profitable
for farmers. The higher costs of vertical farming might just be supported by
crops like lettuce, mushrooms and tomatoes allowing some producers to
break even or make a small profit. But we can’t produce any of our staple
crops using vertical farms. Maize, wheat, rice, cassava and soybeans are
where the world gets most of its calories from. These crops are so cheap
that it becomes woefully expensive to try to grow them indoors. One study
estimates that it would cost $18 to produce a loaf of bread from wheat
grown in an indoor farm. And that’s just to pay for the lighting. The
efficiency of these LED lights will improve, but even when we imagine
very generous improvements in lighting, the cost of making cereals will be
at least six times higher than we currently sell them for.

Another nail in the coffin is that a lot of the environmental benefits
disappear when we consider the electricity we need to power vertical farms.

Since our electricity grids aren’t yet zero-carbon, we’ll be emitting some
CO2
to produce that energy. In some cases, we’ll be emitting a lot of CO2
.

We could argue that soon we’ll be able to power these farms from solar
panels, and they’ll be almost zero-carbon. But we’ll still need the land for
the panels. Once we include the land use of the electricity source, the land
savings from vertical farms can disappear entirely. In some cases, they’ll
actually need more land than a normal field.

I’d love this technology to prove me wrong, but as things stand, indoor
vertical farms might work for a few speciality crops but they’re never going
to feed the world.

Things to stress less about
Eating local – the myth of eco-friendly food
Some years ago I was invited back to my old university to receive an award
for science communication. It was one of these fancy functions where
everyone stands around, sipping wine, making small talk, and doing the
rounds of the room. In case it isn’t already obvious: these types of events
are my worst nightmare.

At the dinner, I was seated next to one of my old lecturers. It was strange
to be seen as peers rather than teacher-and-student. As our meals appeared,
the conversation naturally turned towards food. I had ordered the vegetarian
option. My lecturer had ordered the lamb. ‘I know meat isn’t great for the
environment, so I don’t eat chicken and pork. I eat lamb though, because
it’s locally sourced and so it has a low-carbon footprint.’ I thought she must
be joking. She wasn’t. I couldn’t believe it: how could a lecturer on
environmental topics really believe this – that meats have a low-carbon
footprint simply because they’re locally sourced?
If I was in that position today, I might push or protest a little. But back
then I was too shy. I smiled, stayed quiet, and ate the rest of my veggie
roast.

But I did walk away from that dinner primed to answer the question
once and for all: does eating locally really reduce your carbon footprint?
Was it me or them that had it wrong? Over the next year I found scientific
paper after scientific paper all pointing to the same conclusion: what we eat
matters much more for our carbon footprint than how far it has travelled to
reach us.

I published these findings – with all of the data – in an article, and
somehow gained the reputation of being the ‘anti-local food girl’. I’m not
anti-local at all. There are many reasons why people might choose to eat
locally; maybe they want to support farmers in their community or see
where their food is made. Those are totally valid reasons. What’s not a valid
reason is eating locally to have a low-carbon footprint. This is especially
true if you’re selectively choosing high-carbon foods over low-carbon ones,
just because they’re closer to home. Yet eating locally is a recommendation
we hear often, even from prominent sources such as the United Nations.

In 2021, Ipsos surveyed 21,000 adults across 30 countries about their
knowledge and opinions on climate change. One of the questions was:
‘Which of these two actions do you think would most reduce an
individual’s greenhouse gas emissions?’
a. Eating a diet that is mostly locally produced, including locally
produced meat and dairy products.

b. Eating a vegetarian diet, even if some of the fruit and
vegetables have been imported from other countries.

In every country – with the exception of India which has a more plantbased cuisine – people thought locally produced meat was better for the
climate than a meat-free diet with some imported foods. Across the sample,
57% thought a locally produced meaty diet was better, 20% thought the
vegetarian diet was, with the remaining 23% picking neither option.

The rationale for eating local makes sense; transporting food emits
greenhouse gases, so the further it has to travel, the more gases are emitted.

Seems right, and it’s true. But we have to put the amount of CO2 emitted
during food transport into perspective. The transport part of the food chain
only contributes around 5% to all of the greenhouse gas emissions from
food. Most of our food’s emissions come from land-use change and
emissions on the farm: the methane-burping cows; the emissions from
fertilisers and manure; the release of carbon from the soils.

How can transport be so insignificant? I think many of us imagine that
when we eat food from across the world – bananas from Guatemala,
soybeans from Brazil, avocados from Peru or cocoa beans from Ghana – it
is flown to us. In reality, almost none of our food is flown. Flying is really
expensive – companies won’t do it if they don’t have to. Instead, most
international food trade comes by boat, and shipping is actually a pretty
low-carbon way to travel. Transporting food by boat emits more than 50
times less CO2
 than transporting it by plane.

Nearly all of the 5% of food emissions that come from transport is from
the roads – the regional or local-level delivery of foods. Shipping of foods
is just 0.2%, and aviation even less, at 0.02%.39
Transport accounts for a small amount of food emissions
Transport accounts for just 5% of food system emissions. Most of these emissions come from
domestic transport on roads, rather than international shipping or aviation.

A common pushback against moving to a more plant-based diet is that the
most popularised ‘vegan’ foods are often produced overseas. Avocados, soy,
bananas. Many argue that these products are much worse for the
environment than meat produced ‘at home’. This is not true because these
products are nearly always shipped.

But this doesn’t apply when foods are air-freighted. How do we know
which foods came by plane? Annoyingly, there is no easy way to tell. I’ve
been advocating for a long time for foods that have been air-freighted to
have a small plane symbol on the packet. This is not hard to do, but would
make our lives so much easier. Without an air-freight label, there are some
general rules we can use. Companies will only choose flying if they need to
get the food to us quickly. This means foods that have a very short shelf life
and would perish within a few days of harvesting, mostly fruits and
vegetables that begin to rot very quickly: items such as asparagus, green
beans and berries. Fruits and vegetables like bananas, avocados and oranges
don’t fall into this category. So avoid foods that have a very short shelf life
and have travelled a long way (many labels have the country of ‘origin’
which helps with this).

What you eat matters much more than where it has come from
Transport and packaging emissions are usually a small part of the carbon footprint of our food.

Eating a more plant-based diet is more climate-friendly than trying to eat more locally. Emissions are
measured in kilograms of carbon dioxide-equivalents per kilogram of food.xiii
Another caveat is that it’s not that it doesn’t matter where food is
produced, it’s that the distance travelled is not important. Where food is
produced can matter a lot – across the world there are very different
farming practices, climates and conditions for planting crops and raising
livestock. Even for a single type of food there can be large differences in its
carbon footprint depending on how and where it’s grown.

This means that eating locally can actually be worse for the
environment, especially when we opt to grow food where it’s not supposed
to be grown. The UK is never going to be the place to grow cocoa beans or
bananas. We could create a tropical environment in a greenhouse, but that
would need lots of energy – far more than is needed to ship these foods
from Africa or South America, where they grow brilliantly. There are many
examples where importing food often has a lower footprint. Importing
Spanish lettuce to the UK during winter months reduces emissions three- to
eight-fold.40 Tomatoes produced in greenhouses in Sweden use 10 times as
much energy as importing tomatoes from Southern Europe when they are in
season.41
When we stop and think about it, it’s absurd that ‘eating locally’ could
be useful as a rule for everyone in the world. For Brazilians, eating local
beef might mean eating beef responsible for deforestation in the Amazon. A
better rule is to eat foods that are grown where the conditions are optimal.

That means you should buy tropical foods from tropical countries, cereals
from countries that get very high yields, and meats where pasture lands are
productive and forest doesn’t need to be chopped down for pastures to
expand. Depending on where in the world you live, that might or might not
be local to you. The point is, it’s a consideration that doesn’t really matter.

Eating organic – it is not always better for the environment
This one is a hard pill to swallow. When we think about the food labels that
best signal environmental responsibility, ‘organic’ immediately comes to
mind.

But in fact it’s not obvious that organic farming is better for the
environment than ‘conventional’ farming.xiv Organic farming tends to
promote better biodiversity – for bugs, in particular. If we were to compare
one hectare of organic croplands and one hectare of conventional croplands,
we’d probably find healthier ecosystems on the organic farm. But its big
Achilles heel is that organic farming tends to give us lower crop yields,
which (yes, you know where I’m going) means we need to use more land.

That then introduces a trade-off and creates a divide in opinion of how best
to preserve biodiversity: should we farm intensively over a smaller area, or
should we farm organically, impacting biodiversity over a much larger
area.42 The jury is still out.

What’s better for the climate though: organic farming or conventional?
Turns out, there’s no clear winner. One meta-analysis brought the results
together from 164 published studies and 742 agricultural systems to
compare their environmental impacts. On greenhouse gas emissions, it was
a mixed bag. In some studies, organic won; in others, conventional farming
did.

The same meta-analysis showed the unanimous result that organic
farming was worse for land use, and also found that organic farming was
worse for the pollution of rivers and lakes. We often worry about the
damage that putting synthetic fertilisers on our crops does to the
surrounding ecosystems, but it’s wrong to imagine that this doesn’t happen
in organic farming. Organic farmers still put nutrients on their crops – often
in the form of manure. This means that, unfortunately, a lot of excess
nutrients from manure are simply washed away into rivers and lakes where
they cause algal blooms and other imbalances in our ecosystems.

There’s certainly a place for organic farming – in some local settings it
might be better than the alternative – but it doesn’t work on a global scale.

And it’s certainly not the case that it is the green panacea it’s often
portrayed to be.

As I write this, it’s creating havoc for farmers across Sri Lanka. In 2021
the Sri Lankan government suddenly banned the import of fertilisers into
the country, wanting the country to move towards an organic farming
system. It has been a disaster. Food production across the country has
plummeted and prices have rocketed – the cost of vegetables increased
more than five-fold. Sellers said they’ve never seen times so bad. Most
struggle to find vegetables, and when they do, they can’t afford them. Many
farmers are expecting a harvest of just half of what they’re used to. The
whole experiment has been a failure, and the Sri Lankan government is
quickly trying to roll it back.

This snap decision – that has had devastating impacts for so many – has
given us a short-lived window into what the world might look like if we
went organic. Let me be clear: there is nothing inherently wrong with
organic farming. In many contexts, with good soils and ample nutrients, it
can work well. In some situations it is the best solution. But it cannot be a
blanket solution and it is not going to fix our food system.

People often assume that organic food is inherently healthier than nonorganic food. A key concern for consumers is their exposure to pesticides
when eating non-organic food, and it’s true that organic food tends to record
less synthetic pesticides. In a study across three investigations in the United
States, organic foods had around one-third of the pesticide residues of
conventionally grown produce.43 This shouldn’t surprise us. But the
important question is whether we should be worried about these levels of
pesticide residues. The World Health Organization has established ‘safe’
daily intake levels, where exposure has no negative effects on human
health. Governments and food governance bodies then have to stick to these
levels. And, in many countries, they do.

A study in the US investigated the 10 most common pesticide residues
across 12 food groups. They found that all foods had pesticide levels well
below the limits. The majority (75%) of foods were less than 0.01% of the
limit. This means residue levels were a million times lower than the
threshold that would have observable effects on our health. There are
similar examples from a range of countries.44, 45 We shouldn’t assume that
this is the case everywhere, though. There will be countries where food is
not handled appropriately after it has been harvested, which makes it hard
to be sure that pesticide residues aren’t over the WHO limits. As more and
more farmers get access to pesticides – particularly in lower-income
countries – we need to make sure that regulation and monitoring are put in
place at the same time.

In conclusion, in places with good food governance bodies, non-organic
food is perfectly safe. And there is little evidence to suggest that organic
food is healthier. And if you want my personal recommendation: I never
optimise for buying organic food. I don’t seek it out. I don’t avoid it either. I
am agnostic. Much like the ‘eating local’ story: I know that what I eat
matters much more than whether it’s organic or not. This is the case for its
environmental and nutritional impact. I focus much more on what’s in the
wrapper than whether there’s an approved label on it.

Plastic packaging – its impact is overhyped
I get it: there’s no need for our food to be wrapped in five layers of plastic.

Companies overdo it, often adding extra bits of packaging so that they can
make products look pretty, or show their branding off. But a move to zero
packaging would be a disaster. We’d end up with even more food waste,
which would be worse for the environment.

Once again, what you choose to eat and making sure that it actually gets
eaten matters much more than what it’s wrapped in. The carbon footprint of
the plastic packaging is tiny compared to the footprint of the food wrapped
inside it. Just 4% of food’s emissions come from packaging.

Chapter 7 will look at plastics and their impact on the environment in
more detail. For now, my recommendation is to ditch the excess packaging
when you can. Bananas don’t need to be wrapped in plastic – they already
have a skin. But for many foods the plastic is there for a reason: it keeps our
food safe and fresh, and it stops us from throwing it in the bin, which makes
a much bigger difference.

If we do all of this, what could the world look like?
The year is 2060. Everyone has – remarkably – read this book, and put
these recommendations into action. What does the world look like?
There are 10 billion of us. So we didn’t get wiped out – that’s a good
start. Impressive progress in agricultural technologies and access to better
seed varieties mean that crop yields have continued to increase across the
world.

We have also made progress on slowing climate change, but, as
expected, the world is still warmer. Thankfully these innovations in crops
have allowed us to develop varieties that are resilient to warmer
temperatures and periodic droughts. Even in tough times, farmers still get a
decent harvest.

Countries across sub-Saharan Africa don’t simply grow enough to feed
themselves; they are also large exporters to the rest of the world. Rich
countries have rolled back their aggressive and stifling trade policies, and
rely on them for their cocoa, coffee and tropical fruits. High returns on
agriculture mean that not everyone in the family needs to work on the farm
now. Kids instead go to school, then university, and become teachers or
start businesses in the city. The farmers work less and get paid considerably
more per hour. Since they have managed to increase food production
through higher yields, their beautiful forests are still standing.

Everyone in the world has a sufficient and nutritious diet, not just in
terms of calories, but also protein and essential micronutrients. We eat a
diverse range of foods. Some people still eat animal products, but the world
as a whole eats much less than it did in the 2020s. Diets are much more
plant-based; we have a wide variety of grains, fruits, vegetables and pulses.

We’ve figured out how to make perfect analogues of dairy from plant-based
products. They taste exactly the same.

The amount of land the world dedicates to farming is just a fraction of
what it was in the 2020s. Take an aerial shot and we can see forests
regrowing where they once used to be. Wild grasslands are making a
comeback. Ecosystems are springing back to life.

This might sound like a magical, overoptimistic vision of the future. But
take any one component on its own, and there’s no obvious reason why it
can’t be done. Sure, it might not be simple or straightforward. But it is
doable. We can have this future if we want to.

Footnotes
i Food is not just about calories. Calories are a measure of energy and so they maintain our body
weight, give us energy and stop us feeling physical hunger. But health is about much more than that –
we need proteins, fats and micronutrients such as vitamins and minerals. We need a diverse diet, not
just one that hits a calorie target. You might be sceptical that the world produces enough of all of
these other nutrients. Thankfully we do. I know this because I crunched all the numbers on it for my
PhD. In fact, one of the key motivations for my PhD was to move beyond calories to take a more
holistic look at our food system. The conclusion was that we can feed everyone a complete, nutritious
diet if we want to.

ii He does mention that this would probably be unfeasible politically, and seems disappointed (almost
annoyed) by that fact.

iii For brevity, when I say ‘calories’ I mean ‘kilocalories’.

iv In 2019, the USA allocated 121 million tonnes of maize to industrial uses (nearly all of which is
biofuels). The entire African continent produced 82 million tonnes. Brazil produced a similar amount.

v The one caveat to this figure – that three-quarters of soy is fed to livestock – is that this is based on
mass. How the 350 million tonnes of soy we produce every year is distributed. When we break this
down based on economic value – how many dollars we make from selling these products – soybean
oils also play a big role. Animal feed and soybean oils are often co-products of the same process: we
take soybeans, extract the oil, and the protein-rich solids are fed to animals. Soybean oil is used as a
cooking oil, and as an ingredient in a range of processed foods such as snacks, confectionary, baked
goods, sauces and dressings.

There is something of a chicken-and-egg debate when it comes to
working out which of these products is the ‘driver’ of soy production. Are
we greedy for soybean oil, and simply use the solids left behind for animal
feed? Or are our animals greedy for protein, and we have to do something
with the oil? As usual, it’s probably both. In terms of economic value
between oils and animal feed, there’s a roughly 50–50 split. Perhaps there is
no clear driver, and the two work perfectly together in tandem. What’s also
true is that if we weren’t producing this animal feed from soy, we would
have to produce it from somewhere else. Globally we eat a lot of meat, and
we need something to feed the animals.

vi Despite being a little smaller than pigs, sheep tend to be slightly ‘less efficient’ than pigs because
they move more, have lower-quality feed, and use energy in producing co-products such as wool.

vii The efficiency of meat and dairy production can vary depending on things such as the quality of
feed, feed scheduling and the use of supplements. Here I’m giving global average figures of
efficiency for each meat, but they can vary across the world.

viii In the chart I’ve shown this in terms of food production in monetary terms. This is adjusted for
inflation. This is not just true in dollar terms: when we look at it in physical units of tonnes (the total
stuff that we produce), this is still true.

ix Eutrophication occurs when nutrients run off farmland into water systems such as rivers, estuaries,
lakes, or into the ocean. These nutrients can come from synthetic fertilisers, or organic inputs such as
manure. The excess nutrients in water systems then disrupt the ecosystems there. You often see large
‘algal blooms’ where algae flourish and take over the ecosystem, starving the other life of oxygen.

x That’s 40 million km2 – so a bit smaller than the 50 million km2 that I referenced earlier in the
book. That’s because here we’re only looking at the agricultural land used to produce food products.

That doesn’t include the land used to produce biofuels, textiles or other non-food crops.

xi At the time of writing it is still, sadly, not available in the UK.

xii This includes not only the emissions of producing the products, but also the carbon opportunity
costs of the land that we would free up. Releasing this land from livestock production would allow it
to revegetate and suck carbon out of the atmosphere.

xiii You might notice that the total numbers here are slightly different to the carbon footprint of foods
shown earlier in the book. This is because one is given as the mean, and the other the median. For
some foods these values can be quite different. Ideally, I’d be able to show the breakdown across the
supply chain using exactly the same metric as shown earlier. Unfortunately, this data is not available
in the underlying scientific literature. While the precise values might differ, the overall rankings and
takeaways are the same.

xiv By ‘conventional’ here I mean non-organic farming with some synthetic inputs. Some people
protest to the fact that the addition of synthetic inputs is seen as the ‘conventional’ way of farming
and not the other way round. But they have become the terms that most people use to distinguish
them.

6
Biodiversity Loss
Protecting the world’s wildlife
‘Two generations of humans have killed off more than half the world’s
wildlife populations’
– Washington Post, 20181
Versions of this headline pop up every two years when the World Wildlife
Fund publishes its big report on the state of the world’s wildlife. All of them
misinterpret the numbers. But that doesn’t stop them going viral.

It’s not surprising, and I have no right to mock. The metrics we use to
measure biodiversity are often tricky to grapple with, and many of us find
ourselves tied up in terms that we’ve misinterpreted, including me. Several
years ago I was interviewed on US National Public Radio about some of the
world’s most important statistics. I wanted to highlight the worrying decline
in wildlife, so I picked the headline numbers from the World Wildlife
Fund’s Living Planet Index (LPI). I can’t remember exactly what I said –
and it’s too painful for me to go back and listen – but I panicked. I said
something along the lines of ‘the world’s animal populations have declined
by 68% since 1970’. This isn’t true – that’s not what that metric shows. It’s
embarrassing – given that part of my job is trying to correct public
miscommunications of data – that I stumbled so badly.

I can’t take back my mistake, but I can try to make sure we get this
reporting right in future. Why are these headlines wrong, and what does the
Living Planet Index really show? Well, it tries to measure the change in
species abundance – how many individuals there are – across more than
30,000 animal populations. A ‘population’ is defined as a species within a
geographical area. So, despite being the same species, the African elephant
in South Africa and the African elephant in Tanzania are counted as
different populations. The Living Planet Index measures the average
change in the size of these populations. To show how easily this metric can
be misinterpreted, let’s run through a quick scenario.

Take the real-life example of two populations of the black rhino: one in
Tanzania and one in Botswana. In 1980 there were 3,795 rhinos in
Tanzania, and only 30 in Botswana. Over the next few decades intense
poaching in Tanzania plunged its population to critically endangered status:
by 2017 there were only 160 rhinos left. Things in Botswana actually
improved over that time: its 30 rhinos increased to 50. The Tanzanian rhinos
obviously did not fare well: they lost 96% of their population. In Botswana,
their numbers increased 67%.

If we calculate the average change of these two populations, we get a
value of -15%, which means the black rhinos saw an average decline of
15%. For simplicity here, I’m using the ‘arithmetic mean’. In the LPI,
researchers use the ‘geometric mean’, which is slightly different but has the
same problem of averaging across many populations and being sensitive to
outliers. Headlines might report that ‘we’ve lost 15% of black rhinos’, but
that’s wrong. In 1980, the total number of the animals was 3,825. We then
lost 3,615 of them. This means we lost 95% of the rhinos! The LPI is a very
different measure from the number or percentage of individual animals lost.

This highlights an even greater danger when reporting the LPI. By
averaging these two populations we’re left clueless about the status of either
of them. The black rhino in Tanzania has lost 96% of its population and has
become critically endangered. On the other hand, something is going very
right in Botswana. It might mean we don’t prioritise the Tanzanian black
rhino when we really need to. And we might lose out on an important lesson
from Botswana on how to increase numbers in critically endangered
populations.

So, what the Living Planet Index actually tells us is that by 2018, on
average these numbers have declined by 69% since 1970. There is no doubt
that many animals are seeing a worrying and accelerated decline. But dig a
little deeper and we find that something is going right for some animals too.

When we look at the direction of change we find a very mixed picture.

Almost half of the animal populations were increasing, and half were
decreasing.2 Forty-seven per cent of mammal populations increased, 43%
decreased and 10% didn’t change at all. Forty-one per cent of birds
increased, 52% decreased and 7% didn’t change at all. Just as many
populations have increased in size as have decreased. To get such a large
average decline across all populations, those that are declining must be
doing so much faster or at a much bigger magnitude than those that are
increasing.

These results don’t tell us that we shouldn’t worry about the state of
global wildlife. There is no doubt that we’re destroying biodiversity at
record rates – many species are speeding towards extinction. But to solve
this problem we need to make a big deal about the ones that are struggling
so badly.

3 To tell the real story on biodiversity, we have to be conscious of
how the headlines are communicated.

As we’ll see later, losing 69% of the world’s species within decades
would mean we were just inches away from mass extinction. Thankfully
we’re still far from that point, and we have more than enough time to turn
things round.

The northern white rhino is about to go extinct. Najin and her daughter,
Fatu, are the only two left. Sudan, the last remaining male, died in 2018.

The fall of this beautiful animal is a tragic one. Go back to 1960 and we’d
find more than 2,000 of them, most living in Sudan and the Democratic
Republic of the Congo. Since then, their numbers have plunged from
intense poaching.

We have not lost 69% of wildlife, but many populations are struggling
The 2022 Living Planet Index reported a 69% average decline in wildlife populations since 1970.

Only some wildlife is struggling: around half of populations were increasing, and half were
declining.

As the last two rhinos are female, the prospects for reproduction look
slim. But this hasn’t stopped scientists and conservationists from pouring
time and money into saving them. Najin and Fatu live in Ol Pejeta
Conservancy, a protected wildlife area in Kenya. They’re watched by armed
guards all day, every day. Their horns have been sawn off to deter poachers.

In labs across the world, scientists are trying to develop reproductive
treatments – stem cells, hybrid embryos, embryo implantations – to bring
these rhinos back from the brink. It’s an international effort with low odds
of success.

Why are so many people dedicated to saving this single species? It
doesn’t really make sense. It’s expensive to protect only two individuals,
money and time that could be used in a range of other ways. Not least in
trying to restore populations of the southern white rhino – its cousin species
that is still going strong, but under threat. It’s not just the scientists and
conservationists who have become invested in this project. Many of us have
been drawn into the story.

This touches on the bigger question of why we care about biodiversity at
all. The scientist in me wants to make a practical argument about why I care
about the rhinos. Humans rely on balanced ecosystems. We need
biodiversity to survive. That’s mostly true, but not always. There are some
species where this functional value is obvious. For others, it’s less clear-cut.

Ecosystems are complex: the needs and dependencies between species are
intricate. We are notoriously bad at understanding them. There are countless
tales throughout history of us meddling with ecosystems and making a
mess. As the ecologist and economist Garrett Hardin coined in the First
Law of Ecology: ‘You can never merely do one thing.’ If you don’t consider
second-order effects (the effects of the effects) then you’re asking for
trouble.

So, for many of the species where the functional value is not obvious,
the value might instead be hidden via an intricate web of prey, predator and
ecological connections. We don’t see it until things go wrong. This is why
understanding which species we ‘need’ and which we don’t is not clear-cut.

What makes this even more difficult is that different measures of
biodiversity tell us to ‘protect’ different species and parts of the world.4 We
should always be humble about this when we are tempted to go meddling.

But there are still cases where the importance – or non-importance – of a
species is obvious. The northern white rhino is a good example of a ‘nonimportant’species. Najin and Fatu are not essential to sustaining life that we
rely on. By keeping them in a guarded enclosure they’re actually cut off
from wild ecosystems. If they disappeared, there would be no ecological
collapse. We’d be perfectly fine. To put it bluntly: we don’t need them. If
Najin and Fatu died tomorrow, nothing would break except our hearts.

So, there’s more to our attachment than the functional argument.

Wildlife is beautiful and makes us happy. We find joy in nature: looking for
bumblebees or butterflies in the garden, searching for squirrels in a forest,
or fish on an ocean dip. Even when we don’t see wildlife for ourselves (I’ve
never seen a rhino), it’s enough to know that it’s out there somewhere.

In his book Do We Need Pandas? The uncomfortable truth about
biodiversity, the ecologist Ken Thompson argues – as is probably obvious
from the title – that we give disproportionate attention to the species that
provide the least functional value (the pandas) and we ignore the species
that really do matter for our survival (the worms and bacteria).5 For a long
time I tried to push back against this disconnect, but finally accepted that
it’s okay to be motivated by either or both at the same time. If something,
anything, drives us to take positive action we should harness it. For some
people it will be about the ecological contribution to human survival. For
others, it will be celebrating the beauty of the life around us, or standing up
for the rights of other species.

For many, like me, it will be some combination. A combination that
doesn’t always make logical sense. In the foreword to Thompson’s book,
Tony Kendle captures my scientist/human dilemma beautifully:
This lack of comfort with subjectivity betrays an issue that cuts to the
heart of the conservation challenge and the role of science.

Sometimes we fight hardest to protect things because they move us,
not because of objective valuation of their functional importance…
Bacteria keep us alive more than bears do, but the bears help us to
have lives worth living.

How we got to now
We might love big animals more than bacteria and worms, but that hasn’t
stopped us from hunting them. The most visible and profound impact that
humans have had on the world’s wildlife lies in the transformation of our
own kingdom: the mammals.

The question of when humans migrated out of Africa, and first laid roots
across the world’s continents, is one that has been hotly debated and
contested. We now have many archaeological clues about these timings. But
there is another way to trace the journey of humans across the planet:
looking at when mammals went extinct. Wherever we see large mammals
dying out, we find our ancestors’ footsteps not far ahead.

Not long after humans reached Australia, species of giant kangaroo were
killed off. When we reached North America, the American mastodon went
extinct. Our arrival in South America was the end of the ground sloths. This
wave of mammal extinctions stretched across the globe from around 52,000
to 9,000 BC in an event called the Quaternary Megafauna Extinction.6
‘Megafauna’ are big mammals – those weighing over 44 kilograms, which
span everything from sheep to mammoths. At least 178 of the world’s
largest mammal species died out.

The extinction of large mammals follows the footsteps of human migration
The Quaternary Megafauna Extinction killed off more than 178 of the world’s largest mammal
species from 52,000 to 9,000 BC. These extinctions closely mapped human migrations across the
world’s continents.

Some have argued that it was a changing climate that killed these
animals off. But there is now compelling evidence to suggest that our
ancestors also played a crucial role in their downfall.

The final trail of evidence in this murder mystery comes from the fossil
record. Look at the size of mammals over human history and we see one
clear trend: they’ve got smaller.

7 The evidence for this decline is found in
many records from across the world.

In the Levantine – the Eastern Mediterranean – researchers have
reconstructed the mass of mammals going back more than a million years
and found that the mean mass of hunted mammals decreased by more than
98%.8 One and a half million years ago, our Homo erectus ancestors were
roaming the Earth with mammals that weighed several tonnes. There were
the ‘straight-tusked elephants’ (which weighed between 11 and 15 tonnes),
the southern mammoth, and incredibly large hippos. Species by species,
these majestic animals began to disappear. Nearly all the mammals that
went extinct were big. If the climate alone was to blame, it wouldn’t make
much sense that it was only the biggest mammals that suffered. Big
mammals do have lower reproductive rates which make them more
vulnerable, but we’d expect smaller mammals to be partly affected too. The
climate doesn’t discriminate, but humans do.

It’s likely that tens of thousands of years ago, our ancestors played a
heavy role in killing off hundreds of the world’s largest mammals. They
possibly did this through overhunting; but fire and other pressures on
natural habitats possibly played a role too.

There were never more than 5 million people alive at any given time
during this period. Nearly 2,000 times less than live on Earth today. A
global population half that of my home city – London – drove hundreds of
the largest mammals to extinction. That is hard to imagine. It goes against
the common environmental narrative we see today: that ecological damage
is the result of uncontrollable population growth. If a mere 5 million could
transform the whole mammal kingdom, this is obviously not true.

Hunting has driven the largest mammals to extinction
Fossil samples from the Levantine region show us that mammals have become smaller and smaller
through time.

The reshaping of the world’s mammals didn’t stop there. Before the onset
of agriculture around 10,000 years ago, the biggest threat to animals was us
hunting them directly. Once farming kicked off, it was the destruction of
their habitats. Slowly but surely our farmlands expanded. It took a lot of
land to grow even a small amount of food. As seen in Chapter 4, this came
at a huge environmental cost. Vast swathes of forests were cut down.

Grasslands were taken over. Whole ecosystems were completely
transformed. The homes and corridors of many great species were first
shrunk, then eliminated completely.

This series of events was like a left jab followed by a right uppercut. It
annihilated the mammal kingdom. There has been an 85% decline in wild
mammal biomass on land since the rise of humans.9 –11 Biomass is,
basically, the amount of ‘stuff’ that we are made up of. Each animal is
measured in tonnes of carbon, the fundamental building block of life. For
context, one tonne of carbon is equal to around 100 humans or two
elephants.

Researchers estimate that 100,000 years ago terrestrial wild mammals
weighed in at around 20 million tonnes of carbon. The Quaternary
Megafauna Extinction killed off one-quarter of this biomass, reducing wild
mammals to 15 million tonnes. By the year 1900, as agriculture expanded
across the world, this biomass was cut by another 5 million tonnes. Wild
mammals had been reduced by half, even before the onset of the 20th
century and its rapid population growth and global industrialisation.

The rate of decline over the last 100 years has been even faster. Wild
mammal biomass is now down to 3 million tonnes of carbon. Just 15% of
what roamed the planet 100,000 years ago.

Humans have been driving wild mammals into decline for a long time
Estimates of the total biomass of wild mammals on land. Wild mammal biomass has declined by
85% since the rise of humans.

But it’s not just this massive decline in wild mammals that has changed.

It’s also what has been added in its place. The whole balance of the world’s
mammals has been tipped, with humans and our livestock taking over. We
can see this when we tally up the biomass of humans and our cows, pigs,
goats, sheep and other farm mammals.i
By 1900, wild mammals made up just 17% of total mammal biomass.

Humans made up 23%, and our livestock, a whopping 60%. This imbalance
is even more dramatic today. Wild mammals make up a tiny 2%, humans
35%, and our livestock 63%.

Even if we add in marine life – mostly whales, which pack a lot of
carbon – it brings wild mammals up to just 4% of the total pie. The
mammal kingdom today is dominated by humans. The 8 billion of us weigh
quite a bit. Almost 10 times more than wild mammals. But it’s the animals
we raise to eat that really change the picture. Cows alone weigh almost 10
times as much as all wild mammals combined. The biomass of all the
world’s wild mammals is about the same as our sheep.

Most mammals are now humans and their livestock
Mammals are compared based on their biomass, in the year 2015. Wild mammals are just 4% of total
mammals.

Wild mammals have been crowded out by humans and our livestock
The world’s mammals are compared in terms of their biomass. This is measured in tonnes of carbon.

While the diversity of the mammal kingdom has decreased, its total size
has expanded a lot. Ten thousand years ago, all the world’s terrestrial
mammals – including us and our livestock – weighed in at an estimated 20
million tonnes. This is now around nine times larger. Humans have
increased the size of the mammal kingdom almost 10-fold.

Here we’re focusing on mammals, so wild birds or poultry aren’t
included. But for birds, the story is the same: we have twice as much
chicken biomass as wild birds.

Humans make up a tiny fraction of all life on Earth: just 0.01% of it.ii
But we have been the ones that have reshaped it beyond recognition. As the
environmentalist, Stewart Brand, put it: ‘We are as gods, we might as well
get good at it.’
Where we are today
How many species do we share our planet with? It’s such a fundamental
question for understanding the world around us, but it’s one that continues
to escape the world’s taxonomists.

The ecologist Robert May summed it up nicely in a paper published in
the journal Science:
If some alien version of the Starship Enterprise visited Earth, what
might be the visitors’ first question? I think it would be: ‘How many
distinct life forms – species – does your planet have?’
Embarrassingly, our best-guess answer would be in the range of 5 to
10 million eukaryotes (never mind the viruses and bacteria), but we
could defend numbers exceeding 100 million, or as low as 3
million.12
One of the most widely cited estimates is around 8.7 million species on
Earth today: 2.2 million in the ocean, and 6.5 million on land.13, iii
Researchers tend to agree on the most well-studied taxonomic groups – the
mammals, the birds and the reptiles. Where they disagree is in counting all
the tiny and inaccessible life forms we can’t see: the insects, fungi and other
microbial species.

The honest answer to ‘how many species are there?’ is that we don’t
really know. But recent estimates lie somewhere in the range of around 5 to
10 million.

We know very little about most of those 10 million species. The IUCN
Red List tracks the number of described species and updates this figure
annually. In 2020 it listed 2.12 million species. That’s a lot of species with
missing entries.

Life on Earth
Humans account for just 0.01% of life on Earth, as measured by biomass. But our impact is much,
much bigger.

Humans make up just 0.01% of Earth’s life
In one study, researchers looked at how biomass is distributed across all the
organisms on Earth. It made clear that Earth is a planet of plants. Or, more
specifically (and despite our rapid rates of deforestation), a planet of trees.

They dominate life on Earth, accounting for more than 82% of biomass.

Surprisingly, in second place is the life we cannot see: tiny bacteria make
up 13%. And while nearly all our focus is on the animal kingdom, it
accounts for only 0.4%.

When we zoom into the animal kingdom we see it is dominated by
insects and fish. These are the animals we rarely see because they are
nestled in trees or soils, or inhabit the unknown waters of the ocean.

Humans make up a truly tiny fraction: just 0.01% of the total, and 2.5% of
animals.

The Insect Apocalypse
‘The Insect Apocalypse Is Here’ was a headline in the New York Times that
took the world by storm.14 The term has stuck ever since. We now take it as
a given that the insects are on their way out. But – as you might expect by
now – it’s not quite as simple as that.

Rachel Carson’s 1962 book, Silent Spring, was one of the inspirations
that pulled me into the field of biodiversity. She was a pioneer of her time,
one of the first to warn about the demise of ecosystems from our
indiscriminate spraying of the insecticide DDT. Carson was a trailblazer,
putting science and integrity before popularity. So, scientists have been
worried about this issue for a long time. But it’s only really in the last five
years that terms such as insectaggedon have become part of scientists’
vocabulary. The world really got talking in 2017 when a study in Germany
reported that flying insect biomass had declined by more than 75% in just
27 years.15 These results were shocking. If 75% had gone in less than 30
years, they might vanish completely within a decade. And if all insects were
disappearing at this rate, perhaps the world would soon be insect-less.

As Edward O. Wilson put it: ‘Insects are “the little things that run the
world”.’16 We know that insects form one of the bedrocks of healthy
ecosystems. Some of them – such as bees and butterflies – are important for
food production. I used to think that our food system was entirely
dependent on the world’s pollinators; that without them we would starve.

But this is not true. Around three-quarters of our crops depend on
pollinators to some extent, but only one-third of the total food we produce
does.17 –19 This is because many of our largest producing crops – staples
such as wheat, maize and rice – are not dependent on them at all. These
staple crops are pollinated by the wind. Very few crops are completely
dependent on pollinators. Most would see a drop in their yields if the bees
disappeared, but they wouldn’t collapse completely.

Taking all this into account, studies suggest that crop production would
decline by around 5% in higher income countries and 8% in low to middle
incomes if pollinator insects vanished. I don’t say that to undermine the
importance of insects. They are crucial. They decompose organic matter to
make nutrients available to plants. They keep our soils healthy. They lie
near the base of the food chain, allowing the ecosystems that are built on
top of them to thrive. They play a key role in the diversity of our crops, and
they are essential to some foods: Brazil nuts, fruits including kiwis and
melons, and cocoa beans would not grow without them. A world without
pollinators would mean a world without chocolate. That’s not a world I
want to live in. So, sure, we might be able to get enough calories without
them, but our diets would lack diversity and farmers across the world would
struggle to make a living.

How worried, then, should we be about the state of the world’s insects?
We should be concerned, but things are not quite as bad as many believe.

We don’t have a clear answer on what’s happening to the world’s insects
because they’re so hard to measure. Counting ants is much more difficult
than counting elephants. We struggle to work out how many insects we
have today; imagine the challenge of trying to estimate how many there
were decades ago. With other animals we can get great clues from skeletal
remains or historical records. But no one was really counting earthworms in
the 19th century, and they didn’t leave much in the way of ecological
footprints.

That’s why we often cling to the findings of a single study, like the one
that hit the headlines from Germany. We take the trend of one insect species
in one single location and extrapolate it to the rest of the world. These
studies are informative, but we should be careful about extrapolating too
much. The findings from a single species of beetle at a site in Cheltenham
does not tell us how insects are doing across the world.

When we look at a wider range of studies, the picture is more complex.

The largest meta-analysis on insect populations to date comes from the
scientist Roel van Klink and his colleagues, published in Science.

20 They
brought together the results of 165 studies, spread over 1,676 different sites,
and which took place between 1925 and 2018. The studies varied in length
– but the average was 20 years.

They found a very mixed picture, and there was no consistent pattern.

Some insect populations really were plummeting. Others were doing just
fine. In fact, some were flourishing. By aggregating the results, the
researchers found that the average trend for insects on land was downward.

Populations were falling by an average of 0.9% per year. The decline was
most steep in North America, where sites were averaging a decline of 2%
per year.

The opposite was true for freshwater insects – they were increasing, at
an average rate of 1.1% per year. This increase is consistent with other
studies. A large analysis from the UK showed the bounce-back of many
insect species over the last few decades;21 one from the Netherlands found
the same.22
This seems almost unbelievable. How can freshwater insect populations
be increasing? Well, water quality has improved. The US implemented its
Clean Water Act in the 1970s, and water pollution fell significantly.

Pollution regulations have been very successful in the EU too. This is good
news: effective environmental policies can turn things around. Importantly,
these regulations didn’t ban chemical inputs completely. The US and the
EU didn’t stop using fertilisers or pesticides; they put policies in place to
use them more efficiently and carefully. It doesn’t have to be all or nothing,
despite what many environmentalists argue for.

Studies from South America, Africa and Asia have found that the
downward trend for insects on land is just as bad – if not worse – in the
tropics.23 This shouldn’t surprise us; this is where deforestation rates are
highest, agriculture is expanding, and natural habitats are disappearing most
rapidly. It’s also where the richest sites of biodiversity are. There’s even
more to lose.

My point is not that the world’s insects are flourishing. In many places
they’re not: they’re in a steep decline. But it’s not true that this is happening
everywhere, and to every species.24, 25
There’s still a lot that we can do to protect the insects that are in serious
trouble. The tricky part is that there is no single reason why they’re
struggling. As one paper puts it, human-driven insect decline is ‘death by a
thousand cuts’.26 Insects are facing many pressures, from climate change to
habitat loss, from pesticides to the introduction of new species, which
means there’s not one thing we can just ‘fix’. In some cases, it’s probably
going to force some trade-offs.

The automatic response of many when they hear about the ‘Insect
Apocalypse’ is ‘Ban fertilisers and pesticides completely’. I get this, but it
would be a terrible decision. In the last chapter we saw how vital nutrients
have been. They are essential for feeding the world, but also reduce the
amount of land we need for farming by increasing yields. That’s land that
would have cost us forests, grasslands and natural habitats. Turning a
thriving ecosystem into a farm is one of the worst things you could do for
insect biodiversity.

I hate to admit it, but I think the loss of some insects is inevitable. But
by minimising the amount of farmland and by using fertilisers and
pesticides more cautiously and efficiently, we can reduce these impacts.

There are many solutions in the realm of biotechnology that help us use
agrichemical inputs sensibly: we can engineer crops that are naturally more
resistant to pests and disease so we need fewer pesticides; we can make
more productive crops so that we need less land to grow our food; we can
use scanning technologies to pinpoint exactly where we need to add
fertilisers, and where we’re wasting our resources.

Are we heading for a Sixth Mass Extinction?
Watching the populations of our most cherished animals dwindle is painful.

Year by year we find fewer nests in the trees, fewer footprints in the soil
and smaller herds in satellite images. As tragic as a population decline is,
it’s a realm away from the complete loss of a species. When we are
watching a species in decline – when we have a downward sloping chart –
we can cling to the hope that we will reach the trough and numbers will
climb again. Indeed, this has happened many times. The African elephant,
the Asian elephant and the blue whale were all on course for a wipeout. But
we pulled on the handbrake just in time, and populations have started to
recover.

Over the last decade the number of African elephants in Namibia has
doubled.27, 28 In Burkina Faso they’ve increased by 50%. In Zambia, South
Africa, Angola, Ethiopia, Malawi and several other countries, populations
are on the up. After enduring a steep decline there were just 15,000 Asian
elephants left in India by 1980. Their numbers have now risen to almost
30,000.

Whether a trend is sloping up or sloping down, there is no reason to
believe that it has to continue that way. We nearly always have the
opportunity to turn things around. But when that line hits zero – as it does
in an extinction event – our hopes of a turnaround vanish. It’s done. It’s
finished. That loss hits differently. Yet it’s one that the planet has
experienced many times over.

Ninety-nine per cent of the 4 billion species that have ever lived on
Earth are now gone.29 Extinctions have been a natural part of the planet’s
evolutionary history.

30 Without them, we wouldn’t be here today. Species
go extinct, and new species arise. This is evolution-in-action.

The fact that extinction events are a ‘natural’ part of the planet’s history
provides the perfect cover for those that want to deny that humans are
destroying the world’s ecosystems. If extinctions happen all the time, who’s
to say that it’s humans causing them? And if they’re a natural part of the
evolutionary process, why fret?
The problem is not that many of the world’s beautiful species are going
extinct. The problem is that they’re going extinct much more quickly than
we would expect. So fast, in fact, that many think we’re heading for a mass
extinction event. The Sixth Mass Extinction.

The media headlines make for grim reading: ‘We can’t stop our planet’s
next mass extinction event, researchers say’ (CTA News); ‘End of the world
warning as Earth enters “sixth mass extinction event”’ (Daily Express).

Google ‘Sixth Mass Extinction’ and you’ll find thousands more. None of
them instil much hope. But is there any truth to these claims? Are we really
heading for – or are we already in – another mass extinction event?
We first need to understand what we mean by a ‘mass extinction’. A
mass extinction event is when 75% of all species go extinct in a relatively
short period of time.iv Here, when I say ‘short’, I mean something in the
realm of 2 million years. A crazily long period of time for us humans to
grapple with, but a blink of an eye in the planet’s 4.5-billion-year history.

Why is the speed of these extinction events important? Well, it’s how we
differentiate these dramatic changes from the extinctions that we know
occur steadily and naturally over time, at what is known as the ‘background
rate’. At this rate, 10% of species are lost every million years; 30% every 10
million years; and 65% every 100 million years.31
We can identify periods of history when extinctions were happening
much faster than this background rate. These are mass extinctions. Earth
has experienced five of them so far.

32
‘Big Five’ Mass Extinctions in Earth’s History
A mass extinction is defined by the loss of at least 75% of species within a short period of time
(geologically, this is around 2 million years).

In all of these events at least 75% of the world’s species went extinct. In the
third of the Big Five – the End Permian event 250 million years ago – as
many as 96% of species were wiped out.

What caused such dramatic shifts? For most of the world’s species to go
extinct, the balance of the planet needs to be pushed to the extreme. A
driving force of change needs to be strong and persistent. Most of these
events were triggered by large swings in the Earth’s climate, or changes in
the chemistry of the atmosphere and oceans.

The first of the Big Five – 444 million years ago – saw big swings
between glacial and interglacial periods. This caused severe changes in sea
level and reshaped the world’s land masses beyond recognition. At the same
time, tectonic plates were shifting – pushing together to form the
Appalachian Mountains, causing rock weathering, sucking carbon dioxide
out of the air, and changing the chemistry of the oceans that had been a
stable home for many species. The Earth cooled, becoming far too cold for
most of the planet’s wildlife.

The third extinction event – 250 million years ago – happened when the
planet turned into an acidic soup. Intense volcanic activity in Siberia caused
the planet to warm and threw sulphur (in the form of H2S) into the
atmosphere. The oceans became acidic baths, acid rained down across the
world’s landscapes and the chemistry of the planet was transformed. Most
of its wildlife didn’t stand a chance.

Finally, the most recent extinction: the famous one that killed off the
dinosaurs. An asteroid struck Yucatán in Mexico. As the asteroid entered the
atmosphere there was probably an intense but short spark of infrared
radiation – producing heat so strong that some organisms would have been
immediately cooked through.33 When the asteroid struck the ground, the
impact would have kicked large amounts of dust and sulphur into the
atmosphere, blocking out sunlight and generating sulphur-laden air. Lands
would have frozen over, the rain and oceans would have been saturated with
acid, and plants would have died off with barely a glimpse of sunlight.

These events were marked by dramatic changes to the existing air, ocean
and land systems. Animals and plants were thrown into a world they did not
recognise and were not adapted to. Most of them could not adapt. But some
of them could and did. What’s perhaps more surprising than the fact that
most were killed off is that some survived. Not only did life survive, it
bounced back. Between each of the spikes there was a period of recovery
where life not only persisted, but thrived. The killing off of some species
made way for new ones to emerge.

So, to the key question: are we on course for a Sixth Mass Extinction? Are
we already in the midst of it?
To even try to answer this, we need to focus on the two criteria that
define a mass extinction: 75% of species, and a period of around 2 million
years.

Since 1500 around 1.4% of mammals have gone extinct.34 Look at other
types of animals that are well studied, and it’s similar: 1.3% of birds, 0.6%
of amphibians, 0.2% of reptiles and 0.2% of bony fishes. That’s a lot of
animals. It’s not close to 75% of the world’s species, but the speed at which
these extinctions have happened raises alarm bells.

Even if we were to take the fact that 1% of species have gone extinct
since around 1500 – just 500 years ago – we can already see that the rates
are high. A simple back-of-the-envelope calculation would tell us that if it
took 500 years for 1% to go extinct, it would take just 37,500 years for 75%
to go extinct – assuming species will continue to go extinct at the same
speed.

We can also compare the recent extinction rates to the background rate.

The research is quite clear that vertebrates – mammals, birds, amphibians –
have been going extinct 100 to 1,000 times faster than we would expect.35
In fact, researchers think this might be an underestimate because some
species have been understudied – some might have gone extinct before we
even knew they existed.36 It gets worse. When we compare modern rates of
extinction with the rates during the ‘Big Five’, we see that we’re even
outpacing them.

That all paints a bleak picture. When people then ask ‘Are we heading
for a Sixth Mass Extinction?’ the answer seems like it should be ‘yes’.

But it’s not too late. The bleakness of this picture depends on the
assumption that species continue to go extinct as quickly as they have over
the last few centuries. That is a massive assumption. One that is wrong.

This mass extinction event is unlike any of the others because there is a
handbrake. We are the handbrake. Earth’s previous events were driven by
major geological or climatic changes: an asteroid, a massive volcano and
clashes of tectonic plates. Once those atmospheric and ocean chain
reactions got set in motion, there was no stopping them. This time the
driving force is us. And we have the option to stop, to turn things around. If
we make the right decisions today then we can slow – possibly even reverse
– this damage. In some places, we already are.

Wildlife is making a comeback across some regions
The European bison is the continent’s largest herbivore. Archaeological
evidence suggests that the bison was widespread and abundant, stretching
from France to Ukraine, down to the tip of the Black Sea.37 The earliest
fossils date back to the Early Holocene period – around 9,000 BC.

Bison populations steadily declined over millennia, but experienced the
most dramatic fall over the last 500 years. Deforestation and hunting of this
iconic mammal nearly drove it to extinction. They had gone extinct in
Hungary by the 16th century, in Ukraine by the 18th, and by the early 20th
century they had gone completely extinct in the wild, with only tens of
individuals kept in captivity. The bison was on the brink of extinction. But
it has made an impressive comeback in the last 50 years. By the end of
2021, there were almost 10,000 of them. Across the world, we find
examples of successful conservation programmes that have restored animal
populations. A coalition of conservation organisations – including the
Zoological Society of London, BirdLife International and Rewilding
Europe – periodically publish reports on how animal populations in Europe
are changing. In their latest report they looked at the change in populations
of 24 mammal species and one reptile species – the loggerhead turtle – that
have been making a comeback.38
Eurasian badger populations achieved an average increase of 100% – a
doubling. Eurasian otters tripled, on average. Red deer increased by 331%.

The Eurasian beaver has made the most remarkable recovery. It’s estimated
to have increased 167-fold, on average. There were likely only a few
thousand beavers left in Europe in the first half of the 20th century. Today
there are more than 1.2 million.

How has Europe achieved all this? In short, it has stopped many of the
activities that were killing mammals off in the first place. Agricultural land
use has declined across Europe over the last 50 years. This has allowed
natural habitats to return. Another essential development has been countries
bringing in effective protection policies such as complete bans on hunting
or hunting quotas, designated areas with legal protections, patrols to catch
poachers, and compensation schemes for the reproduction of certain
species. Finally, some animals – such as the European bison and beaver –
made their comeback through breeding and reintroduction programmes.

Wildlife is making a comeback in Europe
Shown is the average relative change in the abundance (the number of individuals) of studied animal
populations in Europe. For example, the numbers for Eurasian beavers show the average relative
change in the abundance of beavers between 1960 and 2016 across 98 studied populations.

Europe is no outlier. The American bison has become a national icon of the
US. Before the Europeans colonised the American continent there were
more than 30 million bison. The 19th was a rapid and vicious century of
extermination. By the 1880s, there were just a few hundred bison left.

Protected parks managed to keep the last remaining individuals safe from
hunting, and better laws against hunting mean they have made a comeback
over the last century. Today there are around half a million bison across
North America, a 1,000-fold increase from their lowest point.

Many of the success stories come from rich countries. But we shouldn’t
fall into the trap of assuming that a country has to be rich to protect its
wildlife. There are success stories from countries across the income
distribution.

By the 1960s there were only around 40 Indian rhinos left in the world.

They had gone extinct in Pakistan, and the remaining few were spread
across India and Nepal. Since then, their numbers have increased 100-fold.

There are now almost 4,000 of them. Sub-Saharan Africa is home to one of
the world’s greatest conservation success stories. Southern white rhinos
were once plentiful across the continent. But intense poaching by the
Europeans and killings in the conversion of land for agriculture meant that
by the late 19th century this beautiful animal was close to extinction. By
1900, there were only 20 left. All were in the Hluhluwe–iMfolozi Park in
South Africa – now a nature reserve. Over the course of the 20th century,
extreme protection of these species – particularly in African nature reserves
– led to a significant and rapid increase in populations to more than 21,000.

There are now 1,000 times as many southern white rhinos as there were a
century ago.

The idea that animals across the world are going extinct and we are
powerless to change it is just not true.

Why do we lose biodiversity?
If we want to save the world’s wildlife we need to know why it’s
disappearing in the first place. Ask people what the biggest threats to
wildlife are, and many will answer something like ‘climate change’ or
‘plastics’. We are used to the images of a starving polar bear, a burning
koala, or a bird with its beak trapped in the plastic rings from a six-pack.

Sure, these are a threat to some wildlife. But the biggest is often
forgotten: how we feed ourselves. It has always been this way. While new
threats have emerged, the biggest threats today are the same as the ones in
the past. Overhunting and agriculture have been responsible for 75% of all
plant, amphibian, reptile, bird and mammal extinctions since 1500. In fact,
as we’ve seen, this goes back even further – our direct competition with
mammals drove hundreds of the largest ones to extinction. Not much has
changed.

Deforestation, hunting, fishing and farming are all direct threats to our
wildlife. They put thousands of species at risk of extinction. Many species
face more than one threat. The good news is that the solutions are crosscutting: eating less meat would reduce the amount of land we use for
farming, climate change and biodiversity loss. Stopping deforestation will
reduce habitat loss and greenhouse gas emissions.

What are driving the world’s species to extinction?
The share of assessed species that are threatened with extinction by a specific driver of biodiversity
loss. This is based on a study of 8,688 species that are near-threatened or threatened with extinction
on the IUCN Red List. Around 80% of assessed species are at risk from more than one threat.

How do we prevent a Sixth Mass Extinction?
Biodiversity loss is the trickiest environmental problem that I cover in this
book, though I still think we can change things.

At the heart of all of the other environmental challenges is the driving
force of making life better for humans. There is a very real and tangible
need for us to solve them if we want to live long and healthy lives. We want
to tackle air pollution because it affects our health; we want to tackle
climate change so our cities don’t drown; we got our act together on ozone
because we were worried about skin cancer. There is a selfishness to our
drive to fix these things. By that, I mean at a species level – as humans.

Collectively, there is a selfish reason to improve the environment around us.

Our flourishing depends on it.

Biodiversity is not quite the same. Again, I am not arguing that humans
do not depend on healthy ecosystems to survive. We do. From the food we
eat and the fresh water we drink to the regulation of the climate: we are
dependent on the balance of species around us. The obvious problem is that
we often don’t know what these species are (remember Hardin’s ‘you can
never merely do one thing’).

To add to that, people still view other animals as very separate from
them. They miss the true co-dependencies. They seem less important than
cutting air pollution or tackling climate change. We see biodiversity loss
more as a charitable cause than as a core element of how we move forward.

I don’t think we’ll put as much direct effort into solving biodiversity loss
as our other environmental problems. But what makes me optimistic is that
we will reduce it indirectly by tackling all of the other problems. A
wonderful by-product of slowing climate change, fixing our food systems,
stopping deforestation, ending plastic pollution and protecting our oceans is
that we stop piling pressure on the species around us.

Protect our most biodiverse sites from exploitation
The one solution that doesn’t overlap with the other problems in this book
is protecting biodiversity using so-called protected areas. These are,
essentially, areas of land that we try to reduce human use of, leaving it for
natural habitats to thrive. They’re there to try to restore ecosystems in our
absence.

How far this ‘protection’ goes varies a lot. There are seven categories,
ranging from strict nature reserves, where everything but the lightest human
use is illegal, to areas where the ‘sustainable’ use of natural resources such
as logging or fishing is allowed.

In 2021, around 16% of the world’s land was in a ‘protected area’.39
These are areas of land that are classified as spots of scientific protection.

That means the world met the UN’s 2020 target for the amount of land that
is protected. In December 2022, at COP15 – the biodiversity equivalent of
the Paris Climate Agreement – countries signed a deal to make sure this
increased to 30% by 2030 (they call it ‘30 by 30’).40
Some conservation groups want to take this further – fighting for a ‘50
by 50’ target: protecting half of the world’s land by 2050.41 This campaign
is aptly named ‘Nature needs half’. This isn’t a niche vision – Edward O.

Wilson wrote an entire book on the concept, titled Half-Earth: Our Planet’s
Fight for Life.

42 As he put it: ‘only by setting aside half the planet in
reserve, or more, can we save the living part of the environment and
achieve the stabilisation required for our own survival’.

But not everyone agrees with this approach. Naming an area of land as
‘protected’ is one thing, but ensuring that laws are implemented and
monitored, and repercussions assessed, is quite another. A thornier topic is
how we view our relationship with wildlife: as part of a combined
ecosystem where we all coexist, or separate systems where we have our
‘zones’ and other species have theirs. Human communities have always
lived alongside animals. Rural and indigenous populations still do, with
many playing an active role in conservation efforts.43 Indigenous lands
occupy over a quarter of the world’s land surface, and overlap with around
40% of all terrestrial protected areas and ecologically intact landscapes
today.

44 Expanding our protected areas from 16% to 50% will increase that
even more.

Well-managed protected areas can make a real difference. They can
make sure we don’t disrupt ecosystems with farming, extraction of
materials or other destructive activities. But which areas we protect, and
how these regulations are set, is an issue we need to take great care over.

Things to stress more about, not less
For most of the crises I’ve explored there are clear examples of things
people should stress less about. But this isn’t the case with biodiversity:
many people don’t think about it at all. Or if they do, they’ll sponsor a
panda or a polar bear. That’s fine: I’ve nothing against donating to
conservation charities.

But they do this, and are often oblivious to the things that they should
really stress more about. You will recognise this list: they are the solutions
in every other chapter of this book. We need to:
 Increase crop yields to reduce farming land
 Bring deforestation to an end
 Eat less meat, and reduce our need for livestock
 Improve our efficiency of, but don’t eliminate, chemical inputs such
as fertilisers and pesticides
 Slow global climate change
 Stop plastic leaking into our oceans
If we do all of these things, the world’s ecosystems can thrive again. Not
instead of us, but alongside. Our long-drawn battle with nature will finally
come to an end. Just as with every other problem, time is of the essence.

Every time we delay, we risk losing another species forever.

Footnotes
i Whenever I share these numbers, there’s always someone who asks why I haven’t included
chickens. They are then embarrassed when I reveal that chickens are birds, not mammals.

ii When measured across all life forms – including plants, fungi, bacteria and animals – and presented
in terms of biomass.

iii This figure is for multi-celled organisms. It doesn’t include single-celled organisms, a group called
‘prokaryotes’. Prokaryotes include bacteria and viruses.

iv We can actually see a 75% reduction in species in two ways: high extinction rates, or very low
speciation rates. If speciation – the creation of new species – slows down a lot, the extinction rate
does not need to be as high as we would expect in order to deplete species numbers by 75%. These
events are sometimes called ‘mass depletions’ but treated in the same way as mass extinctions.

7
Ocean Plastics
Drowning in waste
‘By 2050, there will be more plastic than fish in the world’s oceans, study
says’
– Washington Post, 20161
You might have heard this statistic repeated as fact. It went viral after it was
published in a report by the Ellen MacArthur Foundation in 2016.2 But is it
really true? To test this claim we need to know two things: how much fish
there is in the ocean, and how much plastic there will be in 2050.

Let’s start with the fish. How many fish are in the ocean? We don’t
know. They are notoriously hard to count. Instead, researchers use satellites
to estimate how much phytoplankton – microscopic algae – there is. These
plankton show as bright shades of green and blue in the ocean, which we
can see from space. Algae is near the bottom of the food chain so
researchers can then estimate how much ocean life they support.

In 2008, from studies using this satellite imagery, the researcher Simon
Jennings estimated there were 899 million tonnes of fish in the ocean.3 This
is the number the Ellen MacArthur Foundation uses.

Except there’s a problem. Simon Jennings no longer backs this number.

Several years later he revisited the study and concluded that phytoplankton
support much more ocean life than previously thought. His latest estimates
are that there are between 2 and 10 billion tonnes of marine life in the
oceans. That’s 2 to 10 times higher than he originally claimed. It’s also not
possible to say exactly how much of this marine life is fish.

The reality is that we don’t know how many fish there are, but it’s
probably much more than the Ellen MacArthur Foundation believes.

What about the plastic? Again, the numbers don’t stand up to scrutiny. A
2015 study estimated how much global plastic might be produced – and
leak into the ocean – in 2025.4 The Foundation then simply extrapolated
this growth in ocean plastics out to 2050. This is a bad assumption. The lead
author of the original study, Jenna Jambeck, told the BBC that ‘she would
not feel confident projecting her work forward beyond 2025 to 2050’.5
The problem is that the Foundation assumes that things will continue to
get worse and worse, for decades. It assumes we will do nothing to stop
plastic pollution, which is not true: in 2050 we will not have the same
amounts of plastic flowing into the ocean.

Neither of the original sources – for fish or plastic – supports the
numbers the foundation produced. It’s a questionable claim. But while I like
to dig into the numbers to fact-check them, the comparison is beside the
point. It’s an arbitrary number. Why does the specific ratio of fish to plastic
matter? Any plastic in the ocean is bad; how it compares to fish is
meaningless. It would be a problem if it was a half, a quarter, a tenth of the
weight of fish.

Plastic waste is a problem across the world’s oceans, there’s no need to
exaggerate it.

It’s hard to find a spot on Earth that’s free from human influence. Even
Earth’s highest summit – the peak of Mount Everest – is littered with trash.

The one place you might think you could maybe find a pristine spot is far
out in the ocean. Sure, around the coastlines and in fishing zones, our mark
is everywhere. But in the middle?
Imagine, then, Captain Charles Moore’s shock when he found himself
sailing through the world’s largest accumulation of plastic. Moore was
made for the ocean – he was a surfer and sailor – and in 1997 he was on his
way home to California after the Transpac sailing race, a course stretching
from Los Angeles to Hawaii. As he would later recall:6
As I gazed from the deck at the surface of what ought to have been a
pristine ocean, I was confronted, as far as the eye could see, with the
sight of plastic. It seemed unbelievable, but I never found a clear
spot. In the week it took to cross the subtropical high, no matter what
time of day I looked, plastic debris was floating everywhere: bottles,
bottle caps, wrappers, fragments.

He was the first person to report this giant plastic soup. Moore coined many
terms for the debris – a ‘swirling sewer’, a ‘superhighway of trash’ – but it
was the term from one of his colleagues that stuck: the ‘Great Pacific
Garbage Patch’.

The ‘Great Pacific Garbage Patch’ – GPGP for short – is located
halfway between Hawaii and California. The ocean currents form a gyre –
the Pacific Vortex – where floating debris accumulates and is sucked
towards the centre. Most of it is plastic. Some is more than 50 years old, a
hydrocarbon time capsule for anyone stumbling across it.

The patch stretches around 1.6 million square kilometres.7 An area three
times the size of France. And that’s just the dense part in the centre, not the
dispersed plastic around the edges. It’s one of the clearest visuals of the
extent of our imprint on the environment.

That’s the dark side of plastic: the waste that ends up in whale stomachs
and strangles turtles. But, as much as it pains me to admit, plastic also has a
good side, one that doesn’t get the recognition it deserves.

I started writing this book during the Covid-19 pandemic. It seems odd
to say that writing about climate change, air pollution and deforestation has
been an escape, but it’s true. While I’m an environmental scientist by
training, recently my role has been very different. I’ve become a data
scientist in epidemiology – a job I didn’t quite know I was signing up for.

Since the early days of the pandemic my team at Our World in Data have
been collecting, visualising and sharing the global data on the evolution of
the pandemic, updating every day, for every country, for as many metrics as
possible. We quickly became the pandemic go-to for politicians, journalists,
researchers and the general public. Even Donald Trump would pull out
crumpled printouts of our charts to hold up to the camera on Fox News.

People underpin all of these coronavirus metrics. Patients suffering,
loved ones mourning, heroic doctors, nurses, volunteers and scientists
saving lives with treatments and vaccines. But plastic underpins them all
too. It’s there in the masks we wear to stop the virus spreading, the tests we
do to check if we’ve been infected, the vials our vaccines are delivered in,
and the oxygen tubes that keep those in hospital breathing. It’s impossible
to imagine how we would have tackled the pandemic without it.

Plastic really is a wonder material. It’s sterile, waterproof, versatile and
cheap. Plastic is derived from the Greek plastikos, meaning ‘capable of
being shaped or moulded’, and it lives up to its name, in that we can make
almost anything out of it. We complain that it has become so ubiquitous in
our lives, but this is a testament to the fact that it is such a useful material.

While it has its environmental flaws, it also has some green credentials.

As we’ve seen, if we were to get rid of plastic tomorrow, the world would
waste more food. That food waste has a massive environmental cost: all of
the farmland used to make it, the water used to irrigate the soil, the
greenhouse gases emitted for food that would not even reach our mouths.

Or take the use of plastics in transport. Transport – whether in the air, on
the water or on the ground – involves moving heavy things from one place
to another. That’s why it’s an energy guzzler and a big contributor to
climate change. Plastics play a key role in making vehicles lighter. Without
them, we’d use even heavier materials and that would emit even more
greenhouse gases.

From food waste to medicine, transport to safety equipment, plastic has
become a staple in our lives. Of course, it hasn’t always been this way.

Plastic is different from the other problems in this book. The rest all have a
long history. Plastic’s history is a short one.

How we got to now
In 1907, the Belgian chemist Leo Baekeland created the world’s first fully
synthetic plastic, Bakelite (named after himself).8 He subsequently would
become the ‘Father of the plastics industry’. Baekeland was different from
many of the pioneers covered in this book. Crutzen, Molina and Rowland
wanted to heal the ozone layer. Haber, Bosch and Borlaug wanted to feed
the world. Baekeland was honest and clear: he worked on synthetic
materials because he wanted to make money. As he put it, he wanted to
work on problems that had ‘the best chance for the quickest possible
results’.9 The other scientists in this book often had little chance of any
positive results, let alone quick ones.

Before Bakelite, the world had shellac, a resin formed from female lac
bugs. The lac would be scraped from the trunks of trees in India and
Thailand, and heated to form liquid shellac. This material was then used in
various ways: as wood varnish to strengthen products, moulded into
ornaments and picture frames, as protective casing, and even for
gramophone records before the transition to vinyl. Leo Baekeland saw the
price of shellac rising – a clear sign that this type of material was in high
demand, and the forest bugs couldn’t keep up. He wondered if it would be
possible to replicate this process in a lab. Could he mimic the work of lac
bugs and create resins from scratch?
He started experimenting. He was convinced that the reaction of two
organic compounds – phenol and formaldehyde – was going to give him
what he wanted. He tried these reactions at a range of temperatures,
pressures and ratios of the two compounds. His first ‘success’ was a nonstarter. He produced a product he called ‘Novolak’. It was almost there, but
didn’t quite have the amazing properties that he was looking for.

Finally, after more trials and tinkering he landed on it: Bakelite. It was
exactly what he had been searching for. Bakelite, ‘the Material of 1,000
Uses’ as some scientists now refer to it. Baekeland filed his patent for
Bakelite in 1907, and it was granted on 7 December 1909. The birthday of
plastics as we know them.

Bakelite was perfect for many of the industries that were emerging at the
time, particularly the electronics and transport industries. The fact that it
was resistant to electricity, fire and heat meant it could be used for wires,
protective casings and appliances, while also becoming the material of
choice for a range of high-end items.

Compared to today, the world was using very little plastic. It was still a
relatively exclusive product, limited to the United States and Europe. Even
as late as 1950 the world was producing just 2 million tonnes of plastic a
year.

10 But as its popularity grew and the industry developed, a range of
other prototypes came on the market. Plastics with different properties –
some that could be flexible, and others that could be made more cheaply. It
quickly moved from niche to mainstream.

Plastic production exploded. By the millennium the world was
producing 200 million tonnes each year. By 2010, it was 300 million
tonnes. And by 2019 it was 460 million tonnes.11
Where we are today
The magical properties of plastics that make them so brilliant are also their
Achilles heel. Plastic is so sturdy and durable that if we add up the total
cumulative amount of plastic that we’ve generated since 1950 it amounts to
more than 10 billion tonnes. More than a tonne for every person that is alive
today. Most of that plastic is still hanging around in some form.

How much plastic do we use and what do we use it for?
How much plastic waste do you produce in a year? Take a quick guess.

The average Brit produces around 77 kilograms. That’s the weight of an
average man. The average American produces around 124 kilograms. That
seems like a lot until we put it into perspective on a daily basis. In the UK
that would break down to around 200 grams per day. Still a lot, but not
unfeasible to get your head around.

While plastic has become a staple for many of us, this is not the case
everywhere. Some people in the world have very little interaction with it, if
any. In India, the average works out at just four kilograms per year. The
average American produces the same amount of plastic waste in less than
hour as the average Indian does in a day.

The patterns of waste across the world are pretty consistent. Richer
countries tend to produce more waste per person, and countries with lots of
towns and cities do too. Island states such as Barbados and the Seychelles
produce a lot of plastic waste because they are built around urban centres.

This makes sense: if you live in the middle of nowhere and have few
transport links to towns, cities or distribution hubs, how would plastic ever
get to you? This probably explains why countries such as India, Kenya and
Bangladesh have such a low average per person. Around 60–70% of their
populations live in rural areas, compared to less than 20% in the UK and
US.12
Packaging is the world’s biggest use of plastic, unsurprisingly: say the
word ‘plastic’ and people picture a plastic bottle or food wrapper. Forty-four
per cent of the world’s plastic goes towards packaging. The rest goes to
buildings, textiles, transport and other consumer appliances. And when we
look at plastic waste, not plastic use, packaging becomes even more
dominant. This is because the ‘lifetime’ of packaging is very short, typically
half a year. We use it once or twice (if it’s recycled) then its life is over. This
is different from uses like construction: the plastics we use to build and
retrofit our houses and offices can be there for more than three decades. In
cars, for around 13 years. In electronics, around eight years.

The solution might seem obvious. If we want to stop plastic pollution,
rich countries should stop using single-use plastic packaging if it can’t be
recycled. Otherwise, we should recycle as much as we can. Unfortunately,
it’s not quite as simple as that.

The ‘con’ of endless recycling: where does our plastic end up?
What matters for plastic pollution is where it ends up. If we were to say that
the plastic problem was simply about how much we use then we’d be
saying that the plastic sports bottle I’ve used for the past five years is just as
bad as the piece of plastic that gets swallowed by a whale in the middle of
the Pacific. These are not the same, and if we want to tackle plastic
pollution we cannot treat all cases as equal.

First, we care about how much plastic ends up as waste, then we care
about where this waste goes. Some plastics are used for a very long time:
years or even decades. Of the 8 billion tonnes the world has produced since
2015, a little less than a third is still in use. For the rest of it, assuming it
doesn’t end up as litter, there are three possible fates: it can go straight to
landfill, it can be recycled, or it can be incinerated (a process where it’s
burned and, hopefully, turned into energy).i
 Most plastic goes to landfills.

Even for the plastic that is recycled, it’s rare that it gets reincarnated
more than once or twice. We think of recycling as the holy grail of
environmental action. The label that something is ‘recycled’ is a signal that
it’s eco-friendly. Sure, it’s good to give things a second life. It’s certainly
better than burning more oil from scratch to make a new version. But we
can’t just recycle plastic over and over – at least when it comes to
mechanical recycling, the type most countries rely on. When people recycle
a plastic bottle they imagine it becomes another plastic bottle. It doesn’t. It
gets degraded and is used for something lower quality. Most plastics can
only be recycled once or twice, then they’re sent to landfill. Recycling
doesn’t eliminate waste, it just delays the process a little. A good thing, but
not the panacea we might think.

Chemical recycling does offer us the opportunity to recycle plastics
endlessly. In chemical recycling, plastics are broken right down into their
basic molecular parts.13 This is a very pure process that stops plastics
getting contaminated or degraded. The problem is that it’s incredibly
expensive.14 Much more expensive than simply producing more plastic
from scratch. That’s why companies and countries don’t do it. If we could
make chemical recycling much, much cheaper then we might be able to
close the loop on making new plastics. That is currently way off, but maybe
its time will come.

So, even if everyone in the world recycled their plastic (mechanically),
we would still have waste. If we wanted to eliminate waste our only option
would be to cut out plastic completely. Some might argue that this is what
we should be going for, but that would be a mistake. For sure, there are
ways that we can cut back. We can and should reduce consumption, but for
a range of uses – from medical supplies to food protection – it plays too
important a role in our lives.

The good news is that, while we can’t realistically eliminate waste
completely, we can eliminate plastic pollution. The biggest problem with
plastic is how we dispose of it. When we don’t manage waste properly, it
turns into a pollutant. It leaks into the natural environment where it plays
havoc with wildlife.

What this means is that we won’t fix the problem simply by using less.

We could halve the amount of plastic we’re using globally – a tall order –
and we’d still have millions of tonnes of the stuff leaking into our rivers and
oceans every year. Until we learn to manage our plastics after we’ve used
them, this problem will not stop. So what do we need to do to fix it?
Here our focus is on plastic that pollutes our rivers, and then our oceans.

Plastics gather on dry land too, damaging the wildlife that swallows or gets
caught up in it. But flowing water is where most of our plastic waste ends
up eventually. It makes its way out into our oceans where it accumulates.

This is where the big problem is. In any case, most of the solutions we’ll
look at try to stop the pollution at its source, before it escapes onto land or
into the sea.

How much plastic ends up in the ocean?
When Charles Moore was sailing across the Pacific he was navigating
through streams of plastic that had gathered there from across the world.

Some came from marine sources – fishing nets, lines and rods – but he was
also sailing through waste that had been swept up from the land.

The organisation Gapminder ran a survey asking people ‘What share of
all plastic waste in the world ends up in the oceans?’15
A. Less than 6%
B. Around 36%
C. More than 66%
Eighty-six per cent of people thought that the answer was B or C. The
correct answer, as you’ve probably guessed by now, is A: less than 6%. In
fact, it’s probably quite a bit less than 6%. Around 1 million tonnes ends up
in the ocean every year.

The world produces around 460 million tonnes of plastic each year, and
350 million tonnes of it becomes waste. For this waste to enter the ocean, it
needs to be dumped in a way that means it’s not contained. When plastic is
put into sealed landfills, it’s unlikely to escape. It also needs to be fairly
close to the coast to get carried out to the ocean from rivers. Our best
estimate is that 1 million tonnes enters the ocean each year. That’s 0.3% of
our plastic waste.ii
I don’t say all of this to undermine the scale of the plastic problem. A
million tonnes is still a huge amount. Imagine dumping a million tonnes of
plastic bottles into the sea, year after year. But we need to understand the
problem – the scale of it, and where it comes from – to tackle it. Stopping 1
million tonnes of mismanaged waste reaching rivers is a very different
problem from tackling tens or even hundreds of millions of tonnes. Many
people might be more optimistic about our ability to tackle plastic pollution
if they knew that only a few per cent of it ends up there. If you believe that
more than two-thirds, or even one-third, of our plastics are dumped in the
ocean, it can easily feel like your efforts to fix it are hopeless. Thankfully
that’s not the case.

Only a small fraction of the world’s plastic ends up in the ocean
Around 0.3% of the world’s plastic waste ends up in the ocean.

Where does the plastic in our ocean come from?
The popular Netflix documentary Seaspiracy sparked controversy when it
pinned the world’s plastic problem on the fishing industry. Many of the
points in the documentary were factually wrong – we’ll look at some of its
other wild claims in the next chapter. But it did get one number right. Well,
mostly right, with some caveats.

It claimed that more than half of the plastic in the Great Pacific Garbage
Patch came from marine sources – from abandoned fishing lines and
discarded nets. This is true: the most recent high-quality study we have
estimates that around 80% of the plastic in the Patch comes from fishing
industries, with the remaining 20% coming from land.16
, 
iii
But while this is true of the Great Pacific Garbage Patch, it’s not true of
the oceans as a whole. Some of the plastics that come from rivers make it
all the way out into the open ocean, but most of it stays around our coasts.

The GPGP sits in a part of the Pacific with lots of industrial fishing activity,
so it sucks up a disproportionate amount of ghost fishing materials.

We don’t know exactly how much of the plastics across all our oceans
come from land, and how much comes from the sea. Our best estimate is
that most – around 80% – comes from land, with the rest coming from
marine sources.

Where is this plastic coming from? We might imagine that the countries
that emit the most plastic are those that use the most plastic – the world’s
richest countries. But that’s not the metric we’re most interested in. We
want to know where plastic is polluting the ocean. That’s not about how
much plastic we use, but where it goes once we’re done with it.

If you live in the UK, or a similar rich country, unless you deliberately
litter your plastic in a river or on the beach, your plastic is probably not
going to end up in the ocean.iv Our plastic ends up in a landfill, in the
recycling or burned safely for energy. All of this happens without us
thinking about it: we put our rubbish in the bin – hopefully the recycling
one – and it gets handled. It’s true that many high-income countries also
ship at least some of their plastic waste abroad – we’ll look at the numbers
on this later – but, overall, the amount that’s shipped to poorer countries is
quite small and doesn’t make a bit of difference to the amount that’s leaking
into the oceans. Maybe a few per cent, at most.

Good waste-management systems in rich countries mean that the
quantity of waste that is mismanaged, and at risk of leaking into the oceans,
is small. This isn’t the case everywhere. Waste management is boring and
unglamorous, but also pretty expensive. When cities are expanding rapidly,
as they are across many middle-income countries, it takes a lot of
investment to keep the number of bins and recycling centres in sync with
the pace of the growing megacities.

In some countries there is no regular pickup service to take waste to
landfill or recycling. If waste does make it to a management site, it is stored
in open landfills, where it can leak into the surrounding environment. A
global map of total plastic use per person would highlight Europe and North
America. But the map of mismanaged plastic per person is the opposite.

The rich countries are in the dark, while South America, Africa and Asia are
brightly lit. The mismanaged plastic waste per person in Malaysia was 50
times higher than in the UK – 25 kilograms compared to just 500 grams per
year.

17 As seen earlier, not all of this mismanaged waste ends up in the
ocean, but it makes it much more likely.

Let’s look at where plastic is entering the ocean. Boyan Slat is one of my
favourite environmentalists. In fact, he might object to being called an
environmentalist, because the Dutch entrepreneur is a doer, not a talker. He
doesn’t just study problems, he tries to fix them. His obsession with fixing
the plastic problem started when he was just 16 years old. When he went
scuba diving and found more plastic than fish, he knew something had to be
done. He started a degree in aerospace engineering, but like all the best
entrepreneur stories, he dropped out to start his own venture.

First, Boyan and his team developed high-resolution models of where
plastics were entering the world’s rivers, and how they got from there into
the ocean. Academics tend to do this stuff out of curiosity, or for fun. But
this study had practical consequences for Boyan and his team. They were
grappling with engineering solutions not only to haul plastic out of the
ocean, but to stop it getting in there in the first place. To do this, they
needed to know where it was coming from, and how much plastic they
would have to stop in its tracks.

They estimated that in 2015 the world spewed around a million tonnes
of plastic into the ocean. One-third of the 100,000 river outlets they
modelled were dumping plastic into the sea. That flags an important point
in itself. We might assume that most rivers are gathering plastic and adding
to the problem. It’s the opposite. The majority of rivers are contributing
very little. That is also good news for Boyan Slat and his team: they have
‘just’ one-third of the world’s rivers to tackle, rather than all of them. In
fact, the problem is even more concentrated than that. Although tens of
thousands of rivers are emitting some plastic into the ocean, most of it is
concentrated in a much smaller number. Eighty per cent of the ocean
plastics came from the 1,656 rivers that emitted the most.v Eighty-one per
cent of the plastic being emitted into the ocean comes from Asia. That
number seems very high, but previous studies have estimated a similar
amount.18
This is a staggering share, but it makes sense. Asia is home to 60% of
the world’s population. Many of these populations are dense and situated
close to major rivers. The continent is also home to some of the world’s
fastest-growing economies, countries like China, India, Malaysia, the
Philippines and Bangladesh that have been breaking through from poverty
to booming economies. When countries transition from low to middle
income, consumers start to produce and use more plastic. They close in on
the consumption habits of the rich. The problem is that the waste
infrastructure to handle all this lags behind.

Looking at the other continents, around 8% of plastics come from
African rivers, 5% from South America, 5% from North America. Europe
and Oceania combined contribute less than 1%. It’s hard to accept these
figures. It tells a story that we don’t really want to hear. As a European, I
want to think that we can play a big role in fixing this problem by cutting
back on our plastic wrappers, ditching our single-use shopping bags, and
recycling our used milk cartons. Sadly, this isn’t true. If everyone in Europe
stopped using plastics tomorrow the world’s oceans would hardly notice the
difference.

While our river plastics might not have much of an impact on the
world’s oceans as a whole, they still matter a lot for Europe’s coastlines
where they tend to gather and stay.

Nearly all of the plastic around European coastlines has come from
European rivers. The same is true in other regions. So our global oceans
might not notice much of a difference if Europe cut out all of its plastics,
but European coastlines definitely would. This is especially true of the
Mediterranean Sea. It’s a closed basin, and almost all of its plastic has come
from the countries around it.

If Europe wants pollution-free shorelines then it’s almost entirely in our
control to achieve that.

Are rich countries dumping their plastic overseas?
Now it’s time to come to the knotty question about whether rich countries
are just ‘dealing’ with their waste by shipping it elsewhere. It’s a question I
get asked often. It’s similar to the question of whether these countries are
reducing their carbon emissions by offshoring them elsewhere. If it was true
for waste, it might actually be good news. The solution to global plastic
pollution would be simple: just ban countries from exporting their waste.

Unfortunately, it’s not that straightforward. The waste that rich countries
are shipping overseas is a small slice of the pie. Cutting it out might stop a
few per cent – maybe up to 5% – of it from leaking into our oceans. A
contribution for sure, but not a silver bullet.

The UK has played a dirty hand when it comes to plastic waste. It’s
common for countries to buy recycled plastic from others. The UK, then,
was supposed to be selling clean, recyclable waste that other countries
could reuse in the manufacturing of other stuff. But scandal after scandal
has hit the headlines about countries sending it back because our packages
were full of contaminated samples that couldn’t be recycled. We were, quite
literally, dumping our waste overseas.

The UK is not the only one. Other countries have been equally bad
trading partners. Some recipient countries decided they’d had enough. In
2017, China said it wouldn’t import any more plastic waste, and banned
it.19 It had been the world’s largest importer, which meant there was then a
lot of plastic that needed to go somewhere. It went to neighbouring
countries in Asia, like Vietnam, Malaysia and Thailand. But they too had
soon had enough. In 2021, Malaysia sent more than 300 containers of
contaminated waste back to where it came from, and finally banned plastic
imports. Turkey also recently told the UK it would stop taking its plastic.

These dodgy dealings make it sound like the global trade of plastic
waste is a huge issue. But to understand how big, we need to look at the
data.

Every year, around 5 million tonnes of plastic waste is traded across the
world.20 That certainly sounds like a big number. At least until we put it
into the context of the amount of plastic waste that we generate: around 350
million tonnes. This means that around 2% of global plastic waste is
traded.vi The other 98% is handled domestically.

Still, if those 5 million tonnes are at high risk of leaking into the ocean,
maybe banning plastic trade would solve the problem. To see if this is
viable, we need to look at where the waste is being sent from and where it’s
going. In 2018 the top five exporters of plastic were the US, Germany,
Japan, the UK and France.

How much of their plastic waste do rich countries trade? Let’s take the
example of the UK. In 2010, it generated an estimated 4.93 million tonnes
of plastic waste. It exported 838,000 tonnes, which is about 17%. That’s a
substantial fraction – nearly one-fifth of it. The UK is one of the largest
exporters. For context, the US exported about 5% of its plastic waste in
2010, France exported 11% and the Netherlands exported 14%. Most rich
countries are net exporters of plastic waste.

Where does this plastic waste go? This is where things get surprising. A
few years ago, Asia was the biggest importer of plastic, by far: 70% to 80%
of it ended up there. But when those countries got tired of the rich world
dumping their waste on them, this share fell rapidly. Now Europe is the
biggest importer of plastic waste.21 It imports more than half of the world’s
traded waste. While European countries are the biggest exporters, nearly
three-quarters of it goes to other countries in Europe. Some of the biggest
exporting countries are also the biggest importers. Germany exports plastic
to its European neighbours such as the Netherlands, Turkey, Poland, Austria
and the Czech Republic. But it also receives a lot – different types of plastic
– in return.

Asia used to import nearly all of the world’s traded plastic waste, but not any more
Each region’s share of the world’s imports of plastic waste.

The dramatic decline in Asian imports shows us how quickly regulations
can change things. China, Malaysia and several other countries banned
plastic imports and the balance of plastic trade was turned upside down.

This shift is good news. As seen earlier, Europe emits very little plastic into
the oceans. Because it is now the biggest importer of plastic waste, this
means that most of the world’s traded plastic is at low risk of ending up in
the sea.

This brings us to the crucial question: how much do rich countries
contribute to plastic pollution through their exported waste?
In 2020, low- to middle-income countries – where plastic waste was at a
‘higher risk’ of entering the ocean – imported around 1.6 million tonnes of
plastic waste from rich countries. Here ‘rich countries’ include all countries
in Europe and North America, plus Japan, Hong Kong and OECD countries
from other regions. How much of this plastic ends up in the ocean?
We don’t know for sure – the probability that mismanaged waste ends
up in the ocean varies a lot by country – but we can think about a worstand best-case scenario. I’ve done some back-of-the-envelope calculations,
and estimate that rich countries would contribute between 1.6% (in the best
case) and 10% (in the worst case) of ocean plastics through shipping waste
overseas. The most likely figure probably falls somewhere in between.

Would a ban on plastic trade reduce the amount of plastic ending up in
the ocean? Probably a bit. Would it fix the problem? Unfortunately not.

Only a small fraction of the world’s plastic waste is traded, and most of that
waste ends up in countries that leak very little plastic into the oceans.

Still, there are other reasons to get strict on traded waste. It’s outrageous
that wealthy countries treat others as a dumping ground. For that reason
alone, we should act on it. But if we’re looking for a quick fix to the ocean
plastic problem, or hoping that rich countries can fix this problem alone,
this won’t cut it.

What are the impacts of plastic pollution?
Every day there is a new headline about where plastic traces have been
found. In our sewage systems, our food, our blood, even Antarctica.22 –25
This sounds scary. But how worried should we be?
Let’s start with ourselves. Most of us don’t deliberately swallow big
chunks of plastic, so it’s the smaller pieces – the particles that are so small
we’re not even aware of them – that are the concern. We can ingest them
through the water we drink, the fish or meat we eat, and we can inhale and
swallow them through the air.

26
What happens to them when they enter the human body? We don’t
know, but it’s possible they don’t hang around for very long.27, 28 One piece
of evidence we have for this comes from fish: studies suggest that
microplastic particles don’t stay around for long after they had been
ingested. They pass through quickly. Most of the evidence – or maybe the
lack of evidence – suggests that the plastic particles themselves are not a
big concern for human health.

There is also a question about whether they become a vehicle for other
pollutants. Plastic particles are sticky: other molecules cling to them easily.

This means they might allow compounds such as polychlorinated biphenyl
to get into our bodies. Industries also use additives in their plastics. I’ve yet
to see any concrete evidence of this having an effect on human health, but
it’s too early to be sure. At the moment, I am not very worried about the
impacts of plastics on human health, but I admit that the evidence is not
clear enough to have a strong opinion either way. This is something I could
easily change my mind on.

More worrying for me is the damage that plastic causes to wildlife.

There are decades of research documenting this.29 Animals can be exposed
in a number of ways. First, they can become entangled in plastics. Cases of
entanglement have been documented for more than 340 different species,
including most turtles, seals and whales.30 The most common forms of
entanglement come from ropes and fishing gear, which is why we need to
get much stricter on the fishing industry. Second is the ingestion of plastics,
either directly through the water that animals swallow or by eating
organisms that have already ingested plastic. This is also prevalent;
ingestion has been recorded in more than 230 different species.31 It can
have various impacts on the health of animals. An important one is that it
reduces their stomach capacity and their drive to eat. They mistake a
stomach full of plastic for one that is well nourished. Finally there are
collisions or abrasions. Sharp pieces of plastic can cut fish or marine
animals. And fishing gear can damage coral reefs.

Plastic also has the potential to upset the balance of whole ecosystems.

Floating plastics can act as a life raft for different species, carrying them
from their normal home to another ocean environment, which can find itself
with a completely new ‘invasive’ species to deal with.32
The public would probably guess that plastic is one of the biggest threats
to marine life. It’s certainly on the list but it’s not at the top. In the next
chapter, we’ll see that fish face much more urgent problems. Still, the
pollution of our coastlines and oceans with plastic is, undoubtedly, a bad
thing for wildlife. It’s a negative impact that we can stamp out. Let’s do
something about it.

How do we stop plastic pollution in our oceans?
Of all the environmental problems in this book, stopping plastic pollution is
the simplest. We know how to do it. We don’t need to wait for new
innovations or technological breakthroughs. With some basic investments,
the world could solve this problem tomorrow.

To be clear, here I’m talking about plastic pollution: stopping plastic
from leaking into our rivers and oceans where it harms wildlife. We don’t
want to eliminate plastic use completely. We should keep it for essential
uses. For the rest, we can find alternatives or cut back.

Rich countries shouldn’t be off the hook
It would be easy to lay the responsibility of ending plastic pollution at the
door of the low- to middle-income countries, where most of it is entering
the ocean.

But rich countries shouldn’t be let off the hook so easily. They
contribute to the plastic pollution problem in several ways. They should
immediately stop sending plastics abroad, unless they commit to investing
in good management practices in the country they’re sending their waste to.

Even though ending plastic trade will not solve the pollution problem,
it’s a win that we could achieve very quickly. Not to mention, one of basic
principle: poor countries are not a dumping ground for the rich.

The contribution of rich countries doesn’t stop with traded waste. We
also happily buy plastic products from poorer countries. Or export our own
plastic-covered products there, knowing that they don’t have the
infrastructure to deal with the waste afterwards. Plastic pollution is a
complex global problem, and to tackle it properly we need an integrated set
of solutions. Countries – from rich to poor – can all play a role in fixing it.

Invest in more waste management
The biggest solution to ending plastic pollution is not a glamorous one. It’s
not a Tesla electric vehicle or a nuclear fusion breakthrough. It’s the grimy
but necessary investment in waste management. If every country had the
waste-management systems that rich countries have, almost no plastic
would end up in the ocean.

Countries need landfills that actually seal on top, so rubbish doesn’t
escape. They need good systems for collecting and storing the rubbish from
thousands of streets across megacities. They need recycling systems and
centres where plastics can be given another life.

There’s no way to dress up waste management. It’s just collecting
rubbish. It’s hard to make the case for investing in bins and landfills when
countries have so many other priorities to grapple with. That’s why we’ve
ended up in this position in the first place. Living standards have increased
quickly. People have moved to cities where they use many more
consumables. They can now afford to use lots of plastic. That’s a good
thing; it’s a sign that people are getting richer and can enjoy a better life.

But waste management has remained low on the priority list.

The issue of waste is similar to that of air pollution in this sense.

Eventually, people reach a stage of development where their priorities tip.

In the early stages, people are willing to accept waste. It’s not nice, but it’s a
trade-off they’ll accept in return for having the benefits those materials
bring. Then, further down the line, people realise they want waste-free
rivers and shorelines. They expect local councils to have a plan to collect
and manage the city’s waste. When that transition happens, plastic stops
leaking into the ocean. It’s as simple as that.

Low- to middle-income countries can accelerate this transition by
investing in waste management now. Rich countries can support them by
financing this effort. If they’re not willing to invest in waste management,
then they’re making their position clear: they want to look like they’re
doing something but choosing the easy way out.

Should we recycle our plastic waste?
Ask anyone what they’re doing to ‘save the planet’ and they’ll nearly
always answer ‘I recycle’. Recycling is the universal brand of a
conscientious environmentalist. As seen in Chapter 3, people often think it
has a massive impact on their carbon footprint. In reality, it’s pretty tiny.

Why is it not quite as impactful as we imagine? Well, recycling doesn’t
magically happen on its own. It takes energy, and that energy comes at
some cost. This is often a bit less than the energy it takes to make new
plastic, so we are still saving something by recycling, but not as much as we
would hope or expect. Our expectations of recycling are also too high. We
think that our water bottle becomes another water bottle, and this
reincarnation process happens over and over. It delays plastic going to the
dump but doesn’t stop it. Lastly, making stuff from plastic – especially
single-use plastic – is just so efficient that it makes recycling old stuff much
less attractive. Compared to other materials it’s often a low-carbon way to
make stuff.

I don’t mean to be too down on recycling. I still tell my friends to do it. I
still do it. But I don’t delude myself that this is what’s going to save the
planet. My advice to you, then, is to recycle. It’s a good thing to do. But if
it’s the only thing you do or one of the biggest things you do for the
environment, then you need to up your game.

Expect more cooperation and innovation from industry
One of the reasons that global recycling rates are so low is that it’s often not
that cost-effective for countries to do it. Our recycling collections often take
a mishmash of different types of plastic. Some can be recycled; some can’t.

Recycling streams get contaminated, and it’s expensive to clean up the
mess.

Industry – the ones that produce the plastics and the products that use
them – aren’t helping much. They throw plastic at us in large volumes,
mixing a bunch of different types. It’s then up to ‘us’ – and by that I mean
individuals, local communities and councils – to build the infrastructure and
systems to handle it. Governments need to put more pressure, and set
stronger regulations, on industrial producers. Industry needs to streamline
the plastics they use. They need to be recyclable. They need to invest in
chemical recycling solutions that help us close the loop on plastics. And, in
the meantime, they need to support local communities to build the
infrastructure they need to handle the waste they generate.

Strict policies on plastics in the fishing industry
We’ve seen that most of the plastic in the ocean comes from land. But in
certain parts of the ocean, most of the plastic comes from marine sources.

When Charles Moore sailed through the Great Pacific Garbage Patch he
probably saw many more fishing nets and ropes than plastic straws and
Coca-Cola bottles.

Solving this problem could be quite simple. The world’s oceans are not a
free-for-all – at least not legally. In most countries, commercial fishing
vessels need a permit. They often have quotas controlling how much fish
they are allowed to catch (more on this in the next chapter). We can monitor
their movements and sailing patterns using basic GPS technology. The
solution, then, is straightforward: someone checks how much equipment a
vessel has when it goes out to sea, and this is cross-checked with how much
it has on its return. If ropes, nets and lines have been lost or abandoned in
severe weather, or intentionally dumped overboard, fishermen get a hefty
fine, a temporary ban or their licence taken away from them. We’d need
some contingency for them accidentally losing small pieces of gear – if a
massive fish rips a line right out of their hands it seems harsh to punish
them for that.

Or we could use the ‘carrot’ approach. Fishermen could be incentivised
to bring plastic waste back to land. Not only their own, but any rubbish they
come across on their voyage.

The fishing industry relies on healthy marine ecosystems for a living. It
is crazy that we’re in a position where some treat the ocean like a rubbish
dump.

The Interceptor
So far so boring: trade policies, more landfills and recycling centres, and
someone who counts the number of nets on fishing vessels. Isn’t there
something a bit jazzier, a little more high tech, that we can nerd out on
here?
It’s clear that it will take several years at least to build the infrastructure
the world needs to stop plastic pollution in our oceans. We could just sit –
with our heads in our hands – watching all the plastic spewing out in the
meantime. Or we could put in a temporary bath plug to stop the flow. A
high-tech, shiny bath plug.

Let me introduce the Interceptor Original, a technology developed by
Boyan Slat’s Ocean Cleanup project. It’s a solar-powered technological
device – picture a small vessel with a long line of inflatable tubes around it
– that is deployed at the outlet of rivers.vii It can intercept the floating debris
that comes out of rivers, trapping any plastic before gathering and
processing it, and transporting it to a proper waste-management site. If you
can trap plastic at the beginning of its ocean journey – right at the entrance
– you catch it before it disperses. So far, the project has deployed eight
Interceptor Originals in Indonesia, Malaysia, Vietnam, the Dominican
Republic and Jamaica.

The Ocean Cleanup is just one project trying to turn this vision into a
reality. There are many others. Some use ‘river booms’ – long curved
barriers – that try to block and capture plastic. The Seabin Project – which
started in Australia but has branched out globally – deploys bin-like
structures that move with the tides and suck in any plastic floating around.

Baltimore’s Mr. Trash Wheel is a trendy machine with big comical eyes that
chomps on plastic river rubbish as it moves on through. It’s not unlike the
game Hungry Hippos. The Great Bubble Barrier, designed in the
Netherlands, works by laying a tube along the full width of the river, on the
riverbed. This tube then blows bubbles up towards the surface, creating a
barrier that blocks plastics from moving forward. They can’t move past the
barrier and are pushed up to the surface instead, where they can be scooped
up by a collection system.

It’s too early to say how effective and how scalable these solutions are,
but they seem worth a shot. Every day more plastics are escaping into our
rivers and oceans, breaking down into smaller and smaller fragments. These
will be even harder to remove from the environment in the future. We can
stand around in despair, waiting for someone else to turn the tap off. Or we
can do our best in the meantime: hold our hands out, ready to catch what
falls through the cracks.

Cleaning up our beaches and shorelines
Most of the world’s ocean plastic goes through cycles of getting stuck along
coastlines – maybe even buried in the sediment – then shaken loose again
into the waves. This process of burial and resurfacing of plastics can happen
many times over.

33 This is good news. Scooping plastic out of the middle of
the ocean is really difficult. But most of our plastic is not in the middle of
the ocean – it’s much closer to home, where we can reach it. Across the
world you’ll find people doing the thankless work of beach clean-ups.

Except it’s not thankless. If you live near a beach or coastline and can do
your bit to clean it up, you can have a direct impact on stopping plastic
from leaking into the ocean.

We have millions of tonnes of plastic already in the ocean. How
do we get it out?
Up to this point we’ve focused on what we can do to stop plastic going into
the ocean. But what are we doing with the plastic that’s already in there?
Should we just leave it, or can we get it out?
There’s good news and bad news here. First, the bad news: there’s
plastic in the ocean that we won’t be able to get out. We’ve all heard the
statistics on how long plastics hang around in the environment – decades, if
not centuries. This is partly true. Some compounds will take a long time to
degrade. But some plastics break down much faster, creating
microplastics.34 The problem with microplastics is that they are now pretty
much everywhere, and we can’t get rid of them.

However, I’m more optimistic about the larger pieces – the debris
Captain Charles Moore saw. I wasn’t always so optimistic – you can find
some of my scepticism in the internet archives. The internet is always there
to unearth your old, embarrassing opinions.

The YouTube channel Kurzgesagt publishes some of the best videos on
the internet. They explain science in an incredibly accessible way. The
narrator has one of the world’s most soothing voices, which plays over a
backdrop of beautifully crafted animations. Millions watch every video.

I’ve been lucky enough to work with Kurzgesagt on the scripts and research
for some of these videos.

A few years ago we did one on the plastic pollution problem. It was a
big hit. I did the research and wrote the script. I was asked if I’d participate
as an expert on the topic for an ‘Ask Me Anything’ (AMA) on Reddit
afterwards. These AMA sessions looked stressful, so I was reluctant. But
Kurzgesagt had two other experts on board to help me, including someone
from the UN’s environment programme. Fantastic: I would be in good
company.

As it turns out, I had no company. The other two experts didn’t show up.

It was one of the most frantic days of my life. Thousands of people arrived
online to ask questions and get involved in the discussion. All of the
questions were excellent: considered, nuanced, and asked with genuine
interest to learn. They deserved a good and thorough answer.

The original video was centred on how we stop plastic pollution going
into the ocean. That was the part of the problem I’d studied to death – I
knew the data like the back of my hand. I had barely thought about the
plastic that was already out there. I guess I had just assumed it was a lost
cause.

Inevitably, people started asking me about it. Dammit. I was supposed to
be the expert, and I had no idea. Embarrassingly, I turned to Google. ‘How
do we remove plastic from the ocean?’ I searched. The Ocean Cleanup
project was the first result.

I had a look. I must have taken five minutes at most, but every minute
spent was another question piling up in the backlog on Reddit. To be
honest, when I looked at the Ocean Cleanup project back then, I thought
their plan was nonsense. But I took the diplomatic approach: explained the
problem, pointed people to the project, and said that it was too early to tell.

‘Watch this space,’ I concluded, which was a perfect non-committal copout.

After finishing my marathon AMA session, I stopped thinking about
plastics for a while. But a year or two later I looped back round to see if
there were any updates. I took another look at the Ocean Cleanup project –
a proper deep dive this time – and saw it with fresh eyes. It’s not that I
suddenly saw it as some obvious, ideal solution. I still had a healthy dose of
scepticism. What had changed was my appreciation for people – often
incredibly smart people – really trying to do something. Just like Boyan
Slat. Rather than simply wringing his hands and complaining about it, he
set out to tackle the problem of the ocean being full of plastic. He was, by
the way, just 18 years old when he founded the project. So if you think
you’re too young to really make a difference, you’re mistaken.

There’s always space for lone entrepreneurs to take a problem and run
with it. But this is particularly true for these big, global problems like ocean
plastics. Who is responsible for the plastics floating around in the middle of
the Pacific? Which government gets the bill for that? No country owns the
open seas. It would be costly for any government to make it their mission to
solve it. That means no country does. If we want to change things, it’s up to
brave individuals and private companies.

Boyan Slat and his team have focused on cleaning up the plastic in the
big ocean garbage patches. They monitor and track where the high
concentrations of plastic end up. That’s the target zone. They then deploy
their clean-up devices (which are different from the Interceptor): floating
barriers – think of the long floating buoys you get at swimming pools –
which collect and trap the plastic in a large pen. Once the pen is full, the
plastic can be scooped up and taken on board a boat. It’s then transported
away for sorting and recycling.

The technology might not yet be perfect, but there are signs that it
works. With each attempt, you can see heaps of plastics being lifted out of
the ocean. One of the problems the project has is making sure it only
collects waste and not wildlife with it. The most recent numbers suggest
that around 0.1% of the mass they catch is ‘by-catch’ – wildlife that sadly
gets caught up in the barriers. This is small by ocean standards for fishingtype activities, but with improvements to the technology, the hope is that
this can be almost completely eliminated.

I still don’t know whether this technology will make a dent in the
amount of plastic already in the ocean. I hope it does. Not least to celebrate
the fact that a small group of individuals had the guts to tackle a problem
that most assumed was unsolvable.

Things to stress less about
Plastic straws really don’t matter
Paper and water don’t go together. Paper is made of a compound called
cellulose, which dissolves in water. Why anyone would think it’s a good
idea to make drinking straws out of paper is beyond me. They really are
useless. Yet ‘paper straws’ have become the sustainability badge for
restaurants and bars across the world.

I’m not an advocate for plastic straws. I don’t really care about them.

But I do care about ineffective policies, especially if they take the place of
ones that could really make a difference. Plastic straws are just not a big
deal in the scale of the world’s plastic pollution. Especially in rich
countries, the odds that your plastic straws will end up in the ocean are
pretty small. Even if they’re not recycled, they’re probably being sent to
landfill. We don’t know exactly how many plastic straws end up in the
ocean, but they’re probably around 0.02% of ocean plastics. If we want to
get strict on single-use plastic straws, fine. But it can’t be a government’s
leading policy for tackling plastic pollution.

Some people with disabilities do need a straw, and banning them would
have a significant impact. Most of us don’t need a straw, but know that it’s
not a big deal, and you don’t need to feel guilty about using one on special
occasions. My one request is that we quickly move past the paper straw
phase.

The occasional plastic carrier bag is fine
A single-use plastic bag: the sin of any environmentalist. Many of us know
the agonising pain of turning up at the supermarket, then realising you’ve
left your reusable shopping bags at home. The next 10 minutes is a comedy
show, seeing how many items you can stuff into your pockets, clutch in
your arms, and even grip between your teeth. You will not let the team
down by asking for a plastic bag.

I do the same. Even though I know better: the data shows us that the
occasional plastic carrier bag is not that big a deal. In fact, in many ways, a
single-use plastic bag is better than some alternatives. At least when it
comes to the carbon footprint, it’s much lower than the rest. You’d need to
use a paper bag several times, and a cotton one tens to hundreds of times to
‘break even’ with the plastic carrier.

35, 36 This is also true for other
environmental impacts such as water use, acidification, and the pollution of
water with nutrients such as nitrogen. This doesn’t mean you should switch
back to using single-use carrier bags: it just means you should make sure
you’re reusing the other types of bags a lot. If you’re buying a new organic
tote bag every second visit, you’re really making things worse. And as seen
in previous chapters, you should be focusing much more on what you put in
the bag than the bag itself. It will have a much bigger environmental
impact.

The problem with plastic bags, then, is that they can pollute our
waterways. But, like any other form of waste, only if we don’t manage it
properly. In rich countries, unless you’re littering near a river or coastline,
they’re probably not going to end up in the ocean. Even sending it to
landfill is not a big deal. This is a problem in low- to middle-income
countries where the use of plastic bags is on the rise but the infrastructure to
deal with the waste is not. That’s where tight rules on single-use plastic
bags, and the availability of alternatives, really make a difference.

So, be conscious of how much you’re using. Take a rucksack or a sturdy
bag and reuse it again and again. But you don’t need to stress out if you
reach the supermarket till and realise you’ve left it at home.

Landfills are often not as bad as they seem
I often feel guilty about sending things to landfill. It seems like a failure:
I’ve produced waste that won’t be recycled or used again. But one of the
solutions I’ve repeated over and over in this chapter is the need for more
and better landfills. That might make you shudder (it makes me flinch too),
but they’re not always as bad as they seem.

Landfills can be bad if they’re not managed properly, and plenty in the
world are not. Open dumps or surface landfills are not a good solution.

Plastic and other waste can blow away, pollution can leak out of the bottom,
and strong greenhouse gases are emitted into the atmosphere.

But a well-managed landfill, deep in the ground, can be a very effective
environmental solution. Many people think the world is running out of
space to host landfills, but this isn’t true. I did some calculations to see how
much space we would need to store all of the 9.5 billion tonnes of plastic
we’ve produced to date. That’s taking all the world’s plastic and burying it
underground.

Let’s imagine we have a buried landfill, around 30 metres underground.

This is the depth of many existing landfills – the Puente Hills landfill in Los
Angeles reaches a whopping 150 metres below the surface. Our landfill is
going to extend 10 metres deep. How big an area would this take up?
Around 1,800 square kilometres. That’s an area the size of London, which
might sound pretty huge but is just 0.001% of global land area. If this
landfill was closer to the surface, it might take up a bit more space. If it was
deeper or taller, you’d need less. But regardless of which dimensions you
choose, the amount of area is small: the size of a city or two. No one wants
a landfill in their backyard, but we have enough space so they don’t have to.

Most people think landfills are awful, but they could be effective storage
sites for carbon, reducing the impacts of waste on climate change. When
trash decomposes it emits CO2 and methane, an even stronger greenhouse
gas. This is obviously bad for the climate. Well-managed landfills can slow
or even halt this decomposition process by cutting off the oxygen supply.

This stops CO2 or methane from being emitted: the carbon stays in the
landfilled material instead. This applies to other products such as paper and
wood too. Think about it in terms of trees. When we burn wood or leave it
to decompose, it emits CO2
. If we bury it instead, this carbon is ‘locked in’
and we have taken some CO2 out of the atmosphere. This is called a
‘carbon sink’.

Some decomposition still happens in landfills, but mostly from organic
matter such as food waste and paper.

37 Well-managed landfills can capture
any methane that escapes so it’s not emitted into the atmosphere. Similarly,
any leaking of polluted water into surrounding ecosystems can be stopped
by landfills having secure linings underneath them. Not every landfill does
this securely, and these linings can degrade over decades. But this is a
fixable problem.

Landfills are not aesthetically pleasing; we need to be careful about
where we put them. And if they’re poorly managed they can be an
environmental travesty. But in the fight against plastic pollution good
landfills are an essential part of our toolkit. Let’s not let our stress and guilt
get in the way of using them.

Footnotes
i I say ‘hopefully’ here, because in some lower-income countries the plastic is simply burned and not
converted into energy.

ii There is some uncertainty on exactly how much plastic enters the oceans each year. Most studies
come out in the range of 1 to 8 million tonnes. That’s 0.3% to 2% of our plastic waste that enters the
ocean. The point is the same: a small fraction of our waste pollutes the ocean. Certainly much less
than the third or two-thirds that many people think.

iii Previous studies estimated that around 60% of plastic in the Great Pacific Garbage Patch came
from fishing activities. This was closer to the ‘more than half’ statistic that was quoted in Seaspiracy.

iv The exception to this is if there is an extreme event such as a hurricane or flood. We saw, for
example, that during the Tohoku earthquake and tsunami in Japan in 2011, large amounts of plastic
were swept out to sea.

v Previous studies had estimated that the concentration was even greater than this. One study
estimated that the largest five rivers were responsible for 80% of ocean plastics! Another estimated it
was the largest 162 rivers. These modelling studies were much lower-resolution than the recent
update. They assumed a too simplistic relationship that it was mainly just the size of the river and the
size of the population with poor waste management around it that determined plastic emissions. This
meant that they were completely dominated by the big rivers like the Yangtze, Xi and Huangpu rivers
in China, the Ganges in India, Cross in Nigeria and the Amazon in Brazil. As it turns out, the
dynamics of river plastics is a bit more complex than that.

vi One of the reasons that plastic trade is such a small percentage of the world’s waste is that
recycling rates across the world are so low. It is mostly recycled plastics that are traded. Therefore,
the upper limit on how much plastic will be traded, is the total amount of waste that is recycled.

vii There used to be just one ‘Interceptor’. But since then the charity has built a portfolio of different
technologies. Hence the Interceptor became the Interceptor Original.

8
Overfishing
Pillaging the oceans
‘We will see virtually empty oceans by 2048’
– Seaspiracy, 2021
In 2021, the Netflix documentary Seaspiracy took the world by storm. It
was one of the most-watched programmes of the year, and set the media
alight. I heard people around me repeat its headline claim over and over:
‘There will be no fish left by the middle of the century!’ We will have
pillaged our seas of every last fish, our nets and lines coming up with
nothing. There will be no life left on the sea floor. The beautiful corals that
once housed vast marine ecosystems will crumble, with no life to sustain
them. Earth is the blue planet, but its oceans will be barren.

Most marine scientists were torn. Finally, the dangers of overfishing and
the state of our oceans were getting the attention they deserved. And yet the
whole documentary was riddled with falsehoods.

Where did this claim come from? In 2006, Boris Worm and his coauthors published a paper in Science.

1 Worm, now a professor at Dalhousie
University in Canada, is one of the world’s most renowned marine
ecologists. His Science paper looked at the state of biodiversity in our
oceans. At the time, there was great concern about the state of the world’s
fish stocks. Bluefin tuna populations were in serious trouble, cod and
haddock were in decline, and many people were avoiding salmon based on
warnings from NGOs around the world.

The study didn’t paint a rosy picture. Yet the core results of the paper got
very little attention at all. The media, instead, homed in on a single statistic,
a number that appeared only once, in the conclusion:
Our data highlight the societal consequences of an ongoing erosion
of diversity that appears to be accelerating on a global scale. This
trend is of serious concern because it projects the global collapse of
all taxa currently fished by the mid-21st century (based on the
extrapolation of regression to 100% in the year 2048).

I can see why many would read this conclusion and be alarmed. I can also
see why a journalist, hungry for a dramatic story, would grab on to it. Sure
enough, the New York Times ran the story: ‘Study sees “Global Collapse” of
Fish Species’.2 Other media concluded that the world’s fish would be gone
by 2048. The coverage snowballed from there.

There are two key problems with the framing of this story. The first is
that when marine ecologists talk about a ‘global collapse’, they’re talking in
a different language from most of us. We might assume that a ‘collapse’
means there are no fish left. That a collapsed population is one that has
disappeared. That’s how the story seemed to jump from ‘global collapse by
2048’ to ‘empty oceans by 2048’. But this is not what scientists mean.

There are many definitions of ‘collapse’ in fisheries science. The one
that Boris Worm was using was when the amount of fish we catch falls to
10% of the highest recorded levels of catch in history. So if the maximum
amount of Atlantic bluefin tuna we have caught in any year was 1 million,
we would say it had ‘collapsed’ if our catch in any year fell below 100,000.

It’s quite weird that we would define this based on fish catch rather than the
number of actual fish that are left. But we didn’t have much data on the
abundance of fish in the ocean at the time of Worm’s paper. To understand
how well fish populations were doing, we’d measure how easy it was to
catch some. It’s easy to catch fish when there are loads of them around. It
gets harder and harder as their populations shrink.

When Boris Worm said that the trend pointed towards ‘global collapse
by the mid-21st century’, he didn’t mean there would be no fish left. Even if
his projection of a collapse did come true, the oceans wouldn’t be empty.

Obviously, this would still be a terrible position to be in, whether you care
about the fish or the people that catch them, but it wouldn’t mean an empty
ocean.

Now, the second big problem: how Worm got to a projection of global
collapse by the middle of the century. He estimated the state of the world’s
fish stocks based on what data was available (which wasn’t very much).

Despite the lack of data this was important work: scientists have to try to
understand where we are and where we’re headed based on the best data
they can get their hands on. He estimated that in 2003, almost 30% of the
world’s fish stocks were defined as ‘collapsed’. What he then did was
simply extend that trend line out until it reached 100%. He assumed that
fish stocks would just continue to collapse, one after another, until they all
had in 2048.

It’s a somewhat innocent extrapolation. For a scientist it’s an interesting
thought experiment: ‘If things carry on as they have in the past, when
would this reach 100%?’ I often do these calculations myself. They’re fun.

But this approach highlights a fundamental problem that we’ve seen over
and over in this book. It’s one that feeds into the doomsday mentality that
we’ve locked ourselves into. We extrapolate exploding population numbers
and panic that they will never stop growing. At least, until they crash. We
see rising CO2 emissions and assume that they’ll just keep rising.

Fertilisers, coal, pesticides, air pollution: we’ll just produce more and more.

If you’re sceptical that things can change, then this is a natural position to
fall into. But there’s no scientific basis for this assumption. In fact, for most
of our environmental problems, there are clear signs that it isn’t that way
any more. We can, and are, course-correcting.

So, there were two big red flags about how this study was picked up by
the media. First, ‘global collapse of fish’ does not mean an ‘ocean empty of
fish’. Second, just drawing a straight line until it reaches 100% is, well, not
that scientific. It’s hard to lay serious blame on the journalists at the time.

But there’s no excuse for getting this wrong today – more than 15 years
later. That’s because this controversy sparked a revolution of fisheries data.

This data shows us that we’ve veered far away from the pessimistic
scenario that first hit the headlines.

Many marine scientists were ecstatic that fish had made headlines in the
New York Times, Washington Post and on the BBC. But others were
struggling to make sense of it, even after they’d got to the bottom of the
misinterpretation that a ‘global collapse’ meant an ‘empty ocean’. These
gloomy prospects didn’t tally with what they were seeing on the ground –
or, rather, in the sea. Sure, some of the world’s fish stocks were doing
poorly. But others were not close to collapse. In fact, the sustainability of
some was improving. If anything, it looked like there would be more fish in
2048, not less. Shortly after Worm’s study appeared, Science published
several scientific rebuttals from other fisheries experts.

One of the study’s fiercest critics was Ray Hilborn, another giant in the
field, who was working as a fisheries scientist at the University of
Washington. He had been a researcher for decades, and had been winning
prizes for his academic work since the 1970s. He also had a slightly more
optimistic take on the prospects of the world’s fish.

In interviews, Hilborn called the work ‘incredibly sloppy’ and the
projections ‘mind-bogglingly stupid’. In the same month as Worm’s paper
came out, Hilborn responded with a paper in the journal Fisheries, titled
‘Faith-based Fisheries’.3
In it, he took a swing not only at the marine
science community but also at the world’s top scientific journals. They were
favouring front-page news over evidence-based science.

Worm and Hilborn saw the problem differently, perhaps because they
came at it from different world views. Boris Worm was a marine ecologist
and Ray Hilborn was a fisheries scientist. A simplistic view of marine
ecologists might be that they want ecosystems to turn back towards a
pristine state before humans came along. Fisheries scientists focus on how
we can maintain healthy ecosystems while catching as much fish as
possible.

They were both invited to talk it out live on US National Public Radio.

The hosts were probably hoping for a juicy, nerdy battle, but it turned out to
be more amicable than expected. Hilborn and Worm shared a lot of
common ground, and mutual respect for one another. So much so that they
continued to discuss it over email in the weeks that followed.

It became clear that the data set needed to really understand what was
going on hadn’t been built yet. They decided to team up and construct it. As
Boris Worm recalled: ‘Ray and I realized independently this [public
disagreement] was not going to make the science any better, because you
have the danger of being blind in one eye.’4 They applied for – and got – a
grant to assemble a group of twenty scientists. The mission was to gather
and aggregate data on fish abundance – the number of fish in the ocean
rather than the amount of fish being caught.

By 2009, they had the data they needed. Their co-authored study – titled
‘Rebuilding Global Fisheries’ – appeared in Science,
5 with the journal
introducing the paper as an end to the war over fish: ‘after a controversial
projection that wild-caught fish would disappear, top researchers buried the
hatchet to examine the status of fisheries – and what to do about it’.

What their results showed was that, on average, there was no decline in
these fish stocks. But they did find different results across different regions.

Some stocks were doing well, and were in fact increasing. Others were
struggling and were a cause for concern. This is why, on average, there was
no clear change; the good news was cancelling out the bad news. But one
thing was very clear: there was no indication of a ‘global collapse’ by midcentury. If you drew a new extrapolation based on these figures, it would
actually never reach 100%. Not even in the year 3000.

The oceans will not be ‘empty by 2048’
Following the publication of a paper in 2006, many headlines have made the claim that the ‘oceans
will be empty by 2048’. This chart shows where this claim came from, and more recent evidence that
refutes it.

This was a crucial update to our understanding of the world’s fisheries. But
‘not getting much better, not getting much worse’ is not quite as catchy as
‘global fish stocks will soon collapse’. Negative news sells. Positive news
can occasionally sell. Neutral news rarely does.

Science is full of head-to-head clashes, quarrelling academics, political
divisions, ideological barriers. It can be hard to set differences aside and
make progress together. Worm and Hilborn showed us how it’s done. When
the evidence wasn’t there to settle their differences, they worked together to
build it.

Unfortunately, not everyone updates their position when the evidence
changes. That’s why the ‘empty oceans by 2048’ falsehood was repeated in
2021 in Seaspiracy.

Of course, this does not mean that the state of the world’s fish is perfect
and that we have nothing to worry about. But I hope that – if you did
believe Seaspiracy – some of your worst concerns have been tamed a little.

Now that we’ve addressed the worst panic, we can take a deeper look at the
history of our treatment of the oceans, where we are today, and what we
need to do to make them healthy again.

How we got to now
The rise and fall of whaling
We might show our dominance today by overpowering some of the ocean’s
smaller creatures. But in the past, it was the big ones we went for. Weighing
in at over 150 tonnes, blue whales are the largest animal to have ever lived
on Earth. You might think their size would have protected them from
human exploitation. But, in fact, it made their fate even worse. As seen in
Chapter 6, humans have always been drawn to the big guys. Whales made
for an incredibly valuable source of oil, meat and blubber.

When we imagine early whaling perhaps we think of Herman Melville’s
1851 story of Moby-Dick. But our battle with whales goes back much
further. In the early 2000s, researchers were exploring Bangudae, a site in
South Korea, which dates back to 6000 BC.6 There they found many
breathtaking carvings of whales in the rocks. The whales are not alone in
these sketches; beside them are boats of men with harpoons. These
petroglyphs might be the first window we have into the beginning of
whaling.

Whale hunting dates back at least several thousand years. It became
increasingly popular across Europe during the medieval period – from
around AD 500 to 1600 – when elite Londoners, Scots and the Dutch would
carve whale bones into lamps and ornaments, and make a banquet out of the
precious meat.7, 8 But hunting tools were not very effective at the time. This
all changed in the 18th and 19th centuries, especially when whaling hit the
United States, where it became a key industry. Although the uses of whale
oil later diversified, Americans mainly used it for lighting.

Today it seems crazy to think that we would kill something so majestic
just to light a candle. But it’s a perfect illustration of how limited the
supplies of our ancestors were. They weren’t killing whales out of malice.

They were trying to find a source of energy, and as it turned out, whale oil
was one of the best they had.

Over the first half of the 19th century, US production of whale and
sperm oil continued to climb. In 1800 it was producing tens of thousands of
barrels a year. By the mid-1840s it was more than half a million. But like so
many trends we’ve seen so far: what goes up inevitably comes down. It hit
its peak in the 1840s and production fell just as fast as it increased. Plot the
trend of whale oil production in the US over the 19th century and we get an
almost perfect upside-down U.

What caused whale oil production to peak and then fall? Partly, fossil
fuels. Around this time, petroleum oil was discovered, and kerosene began
to replace whale oil in lighting because it was cheaper. Whale hunting
became increasingly unprofitable.9 As whaling began to die in the US, the
boom was just getting started in other parts of the world. Towards the end
of the 19th century, new technologies were being developed that could
catch whales in much larger numbers. Rather than the classic sail- or oarpowered boats that the Americans had been using, the Norwegians had
mechanised, steam-powered vessels with cannons and harpoons. This made
whaling much more efficient. Not only could we catch more, it also allowed
us to catch whale species that were too fast for our old technologies. When
large whales are killed they usually sink. In the 1880s a way was found to
stop this: pumping air into the dead whale to keep it afloat.

This was the start of the ‘modern’ whaling era, from the turn of the 20th
century, which didn’t only bring innovations on how to track and hunt
whales, but also advances on how we could use their oils, blubber and bone.

Whale oils were initially used for lighting as a fuel and machinery as
lubricant. Advances in cosmetics and food chemistry meant that its byproducts were soon used for soaps, textiles and even margarine. Ambergris
– a substance found in the intestine of sperm whales – was, and still is, used
to make perfume. You will find it in Chanel No.5, for example. Whales
made it into the fashion industry too. Instead of teeth, baleen whales have
long strips of keratin (a protein found in human nails and hair) which hang
from their mouths – these strips were used in everything from skirts and
women’s corsets, to umbrellas, parasols, fishing poles and crossbows.10
We were, suddenly, much better at hunting whales and had a growing
market. Year after year we killed more. From only a few thousand each year
to 10,000, then 20,000, until the 1960s, when we were killing 80,000. The
only brief period of reprieve was the Second World War, when humans
turned their hunting boats on each other. Once the fighting was over, whales
became the target again.

Whaling rose steeply over the first half of the century. But, remarkably,
it has become something of a conservation success story. It fell dramatically
in the 1970s then plunged to low levels in the 80s, 90s and the 00s. We hunt
very few whales today – and almost none for commercial reasons. How did
the world manage to turn things around? There were a number of factors at
play. By the 1960s, whale populations had become increasingly depleted;
this scarcity made it expensive to hunt them, because they were hard to find
and catch. Whale oil and bones were losing their competitive advantage.

There were now cheaper and more accessible alternatives for the cosmetic,
food and textile industries. Fossil fuels had started to replace whale oils.

Political action took this one step further. In 1946, noticing that whaling
was becoming unsustainable, a number of countries had formed the
International Whaling Commission (IWC). After many decades of failed
quota agreements, in 1987 the IWC agreed to a global moratorium. This
made commercial whaling illegal, with only a few exceptions.i
Human dominance in the 20th century still had a profound impact on
their numbers. Just before the start of the 20th century there were around
2.6 million whales in our oceans.11, 12 A century later, there were only
880,000 left. The number of whales fell by two-thirds, with some species
particularly badly affected. I’m sure you’ve guessed the pattern by now. The
largest whales were prime targets. The minke whale saw a fall of ‘just’
20%. The blue whale was almost plundered to extinction. Its populations
fell from 340,000 to just 5,000, a reduction of 98.5%.

Whaling is just a fraction of what it was in the past
The global number of whales hunted and killed per decade.

It will take a long time for whale populations to recover. But the world
acted just in time to allow them to do so. The story could have ended very
differently. Many species were hurtling towards extinction and we pulled on
the handbrake, just in time.

The history of fishing
The remains of one of the earliest modern humans show that he was a fish
eater. Bone fragments of the ‘Tianyuan man’ were found in the Tianyuan
Cave near Beijing, and suggest that he was alive around 40,000 years ago.

Isotope analysis shows that he ate plenty of freshwater fish.

We also know from cave paintings, discarded fish bones and makeshift
hooks that our history of fishing goes back tens of thousands of years. For
most of that time our tools were fairly limited. The tech innovators might
have had a hook and line, or a spear. Many just had simple baskets woven
from reeds. But this started to change in the 15th century, when the first
large fishing boats arrived on the scene in Europe. These boats would put
out long ‘gillnets’, which would form a wall or curtain of mesh to catch fish
in. These were much more effective at catching large amounts of fish,
including unwanted marine life too. Expeditions would often last weeks at a
time, and fishermen would come back with a healthy supply.

Large-scale fishing efforts escalated from there and expanded across the
world. Not only were nets and methods more sophisticated, but boats
became bigger and faster. They were later bolstered by an engine; fishermen
could set the net, move at speed to stop fish from escaping, and catch more
as they went.

A crash in fish stocks became the reality for many rich countries.

Looking at the catch of North Atlantic cod from Newfoundland and
Labrador in Eastern Canada, we can see that it started to ramp up from the
17th century. In the 18th we were catching around 100,000 tonnes a year.

By the 20th this was around 250,000 tonnes. It eventually peaked in 1968,
before a collapse in stocks led to a dramatic decline. Fisheries were forced
to close completely in the early 1990s.

Another innovation that opened up a whole new world of fishing was
steam trawlers, which appeared in the UK in the 1880s. Vessels could go
further offshore, they could stay out at sea for longer periods of time, and
they had better gear to reach deep into the ocean. Fish catch rose steeply
over the first half of the 20th century,
13 despite being interrupted by two
world wars.14
Bottom trawling spread across the world, but without tight monitoring of
fish populations, stocks started to decline. Bottom trawling in the UK – and
other rich countries – fell a lot in the late 20th and early 21st centuries.

As we’ll see, many countries have learned how to manage their fish
stocks much more sustainably. Endangered fish stocks have made a
comeback. But unmonitored and unregulated fishing techniques – where
large amounts of fish are caught indiscriminately – are increasing across
some parts of the world. We need to make sure they don’t follow the same
destructive path that many fisheries did in the past.

Where we are today
How much of the world’s fish are sustainably managed?
How unsustainable have our fishing habits really become? That sounds like
a simple question but racks up a whole lot of controversy. To answer it, we
need to agree on what ‘sustainable fishing’ actually means. Not everyone
does.

We can fight it out over technical details and numbers: how much fish
we catch, how many fish are left or whether populations are being depleted.

But this is often not where the real disagreement lies. It lies one step earlier,
with the ethical conflict of how we view fish. You can see already that we
don’t discuss fish in the same way that we discuss other wild animals. In the
biodiversity chapter, our goal was to protect them at all costs. Some view
fish in the same way, but most don’t: they think about them as animals to
catch. And when people view fish through different lenses, these debates
don’t get very far. They don’t even reach the stage where they can discuss
the numbers.

There are two main schools of thought when it comes to fish. One
school – often adopted by environmentalists, ecologists and animal welfare
advocates – views fish as animals in their own right. This is how we view
most other wild animals, like elephants or monkeys. Here, our goal is to
restore wild animal populations back to their pre-human levels. The same
would apply to fish: we should allow populations to increase back to their
historical levels, before we started fishing them. Here, sustainability would
mean catching very few fish, if any.

The other school views fish as a resource. Most of us eat fish, and
hundreds of millions rely on it for their income. We can’t let fish return to
their pre-fishing levels and catch lots of fish at the same time. So
‘sustainability’ according to this view means catching as much fish as
possible, year after year, without depleting fish populations any further.

This meets the classic Brundtland definition of sustainability: we catch as
much fish as possible to meet the needs of people alive today, but don’t take
so much that it would sacrifice catch for future generations.

Scientists can calculate this magical ‘sweet spot’: the exact point where
we can catch as much fish as possible without depleting their populations
below their most productive levels. It’s called the ‘maximum sustainable
yield’. If you get greedy and catch more than this, then you deplete fish
populations for future generations. If you catch too little, then you’re
sacrificing food and income for the current generation. This is what most
fisheries are aiming for: catching not too much, not too little, just right.

The tension between these schools of thought is obvious. The definition
of ‘sustainability’ is completely different. So, too, is the end goal. When a
fish stock is at its ‘maximum sustainable yield’ it’s around half of its
original, pre-fishing level.15 So, what is sustainable to the second school is
only half of what the first school considers sustainable. It’s a hard deadlock
to break. I can see both positions. We do tend to view fish differently from
wild animals on land, and that seems odd to me. At the same time, it seems
unrealistic that the world will stop fishing overnight. If people are going to
keep fishing we need to make sure we are monitoring and managing wild
fish stocks as best we can. That means catching fish in a way that doesn’t
overexploit stocks, and keeps them in a healthy balance. Which essentially
brings us to the second camp.

The UN’s Food and Agriculture Organization has a division dedicated to
fisheries research and reporting. Each year it produces estimates of how
sustainable the world’s fishing activities are.16 The 1980s and 90s were
scary times. In the early 1970s, close to 90% of the world’s fish stocks were
being managed sustainably. But from there, things went downhill rapidly.

Global demand for fish continued to increase. The number of fish stocks
that were pushed beyond their limits seemed to increase year after year.

You’d be forgiven for thinking that this trend would just continue to rise,
just as Boris Worm did at the beginning of this chapter.

By the early 2000s, around one-quarter of the world’s fish stocks were
overexploited. By 2008, this had climbed to one-third. But the increase has
slowed. Since then, the share of stocks that are exploited has stayed at
around one-third. That means two-thirds of global fish stocks are managed
sustainably.

ii
Of course, that’s not really worthy of celebration. We’re no longer on the
steep rise we saw in the 1980s and 90s, but we have, at least, slowed or
stalled this increase. We’ve done enough to buy some time to work out what
is going right, and apply it elsewhere.

One-third of the world’s fish stocks are overexploited
Fish stocks are overexploited when fish catch exceeds the maximum sustainable yield – the rate at
which fish populations can regenerate.

We now farm more fish than we catch
Something doesn’t quite add up here. We’ve managed to put a pause on the
number of fish populations that are being overexploited. But since 1990,
global seafood production has more than doubled. How did this happen?
Rather than catching more fish, we started to grow them. This is called ‘fish
farming’, or ‘aquaculture’, and we can think about it in a similar way to
raising cows, pigs and chickens on land. Rather than relying on populations
of wild fish (the equivalent on land would be relying on wild birds or deer),
we can breed our own. Farmers feed and breed fish under controlled
conditions – either in caged enclosures in the sea or rivers or in artificial
facilities on land – before killing them to sell.

Fish farming is a relatively new industry, one that has skyrocketed since
the 1990s. In 1990, the world was producing just 20 million tonnes of
seafood from fish farming. By the year 2000, this had doubled. By 2010 it
had doubled again. And today, we produce well over 100 million tonnes of
seafood from it. The world now produces more seafood from fish farming
than it does from wild catch in the ocean. Wild fish catch has barely
changed since 1990. Fish farming has made up for all of the extra demand.

If we had tried to meet it through wild catch alone, our oceans could be in a
terrible state.

The world now produces more seafood from fish farming than wild catch
Most of the growth in seafood production in recent decades has come from aquaculture. This is good
for the protection of wild fish stocks.

The saving grace of aquaculture is not too dissimilar from the transition
to crop and livestock farming. Imagine if we’d tried to feed a large and
growing population from wild mammals alone. They’d be gone in an instant
(and so would we). Our ability to grow our own food and produce our own
livestock allowed us to feed more people without putting much more
pressure on wild mammals. The same is true in the oceans.

Fish farming hasn’t always provided this safety net. In its infancy, it was
really inefficient. Many farmed fish are fed on other lower-quality wild fish.

Some need a lot of it. This is the ‘fish in: fish out’ ratio: how much fish you
need to get one fish back in return. As late as 1997, this ratio across the
world’s fish species was two.17, 18 That obviously makes no sense, and
means putting even more pressure on wild fish populations.

Thankfully, the process has become far more efficient since then. We’ve
become much better at farming and have developed plant-based feeds that
can be used instead. For many fish, the ratio is now 0.3. Some species do
even better. Some need no fish inputs at all. That means the total payback is
even higher than three. Around 11% of the 90 million tonnes of wild fish
that we catch each year is used as feed for aquaculture. Aquaculture then
gives us about 100 million tonnes of seafood. Not a bad deal. Unless, of
course, you are a fish. Just like our hierarchy of farm animals – from
smallest to largest – earlier in the book, the efficiency of fish means that we
kill a lot of them. Trillions every year. And welfare standards in fish farms
are often very poor.

I was worried that with the aquaculture boom, demand for wild fish for
farming would become unsustainable. This hasn’t happened. In fact, we use
fewer wild fish for feed than we did a few decades ago, and produce more
than five times as much from aquaculture.

Fish farming is an innovation that has saved many fish populations
across the world. But it’s not the only thing we’ve got right.

Many iconic fish species are now healthy and sustainably managed
When I was a kid, the big fish dilemma was whether to eat tuna. I kept
hearing that the world’s tuna was in deep trouble. I didn’t know why tuna
was the one fish that was being plundered more than the rest. I just assumed
it was because everyone loved it as much as I did.

I didn’t check back in on how the world’s tuna was doing until recently.

Terribly, no doubt, because tuna was as popular as ever. But, in fact, this
should have told me the opposite. It’s hard for a fish species to be popular –
and affordable – for decades if its populations are on the brink of collapse.

My lifetime has been one of the great tuna turnaround. In the 1930s
there were more than 8.5 million southern bluefin tuna. By the 1970s this
had halved to 4 million, and by the millennium this had fallen below 1
million. Stocks had fallen by almost 90%.iii Populations of the Atlantic
yellowfin tuna had also been slashed by 75%. But things are looking much
brighter in the 21st century. The steep decline of many tuna populations has
reversed. With better monitoring technologies, and stricter regulations on
where, when and how much fishermen can catch, countries can make sure
they’re managing their populations sustainably. Albacore tunas and
yellowfin tunas have both been moved from ‘Near threatened’ to ‘Least
concern’. The southern bluefin tunas have been moved from ‘Critically
endangered’ to ‘Endangered’. They’re obviously still in a bad state, but
things are moving in the right direction.

To most people, saying ‘wild tuna populations have been cut in half’
makes them gasp. But remember the ‘maximum sustainable yield’ – the
point where we can catch as much fish as possible without depleting their
populations – for most fish species is about 50% of their pre-fishing levels.

So, if we want a sustainable supply of seafood, we’d expect tuna
populations to be just half of what they were in the past.

Many tuna populations are now being managed responsibly; the world
still has a steady supply for food, but we’re not taking so much that
populations are falling. It’s not all good news though. Tunas in the Indian
Ocean are in a worrying state. We’re simply taking too much too quickly.

As we’ll see, the hope is that we can pull off another great turnaround
before stocks hit rock bottom.

Tuna populations are not the only ones to stage a comeback. Cod
populations fell off a cliff through the 1980s and 90s. Atlantic cod fell from
8 million tonnes in 1980 down to less than 3 million tonnes in 2000. But the
world got its act together. Within a decade, populations had more than
doubled again.

Tuna, cod, haddock and salmon from across Europe and North America
are closely monitored: we catch them at the ‘Goldilocks’ spot: catching as
much as possible but not so much that their populations shrink.

Fish stocks across Asia, Africa and South America
‘You can’t manage what you don’t measure’ is a quote often attributed to
the business management thinker, Peter Drucker. What is relevant in
business also applies to environmental conservation.

The bounce-back of iconic fish species across Europe and North
America was only possible because we monitored them closely.

Unfortunately, not every country invests in this level of monitoring. We
have large data gaps across many parts of Asia, Africa and South America.

Of course, a lack of data doesn’t necessarily mean things are going bad. The
fact that you don’t wear a fancy watch that monitors your sleep doesn’t
mean you’re not sleeping well. But in this case, the fact that countries are
not monitoring fish stocks closely probably means that they’re doing
poorly. That’s because it’s very difficult to keep fish stocks in balance
without this information. They need this data to know how much they can
fish, and when. They need it to set quotas to make sure there is a fair
distribution between fishermen.

Ignorance might be bliss in the short term, but not for long. There’s
actually a pretty selfish reason to monitor fish populations closely.

Countries need to if they want to have a profitable fishing industry in the
medium term. As we saw from examples in Canada and the UK, they will
have to work harder and harder to get a good catch. Fishing becomes less
profitable. Short-term greed will come back to bite and sink them later.

There are other clues that fish in these regions are not doing well. We
know fishing activity is very high. Bottom trawling is very common in
countries such as China and India. Maintaining such high rates of fishing
without monitoring it closely makes it unlikely that fish stocks are in a
healthy state. We might not have large-scale surveys to draw on, but we do
have a few smaller-scale studies from specific locations. All show a large
reduction in fish stocks.19
The first step towards healthy fish across many countries is to start
counting them. Until we do that, we are swimming in the dark.

The world’s corals are getting bleached to death
Deciding what you want to do with your life is hard. I knew the rough
trajectory of the path I wanted to take: I was passionate about science, and
had always wanted to be a writer, so science journalism seemed like the
right fit. But I had a choice to make: do a journalism and creative writing
degree while keeping my science passions burning on the sidelines; or do
the opposite, a science degree with some writing on the side. In the end, the
science won. At least that’s how I liked to rationalise my decision. In
reality, something else might have swung the decision. The university
programme I chose had a compulsory field trip to Jamaica. It’s tough when
you have to endure a scuba-diving trip to a tropical Caribbean island to pass
your degree.

In between the beach parties and trips to the rainforest, we were diving
in the waters of Discovery Bay on the north coast. We were there to do
ecological surveys and sampling of the coral reefs. It was my first ‘real-life’
experience of environmental change. It hit me hard. I had spent several
years reading papers, writing essays and looking at sections of corals under
the microscope. I still wasn’t prepared for the reality.

I had expected that diving among the coral reefs would be like
something from Pixar’s Finding Nemo. The corals we see in films are these
beautiful structures: pinks, reds, oranges and blues. They’re alive. They’re
surrounded by marine life and fish. Clownfish like Nemo and surgeonfish
like Dory duck in and out of the maze. I thought that’s what I’d see when I
dived into the water on that Jamaica trip.

The reality couldn’t have been more different. I plunged underneath the
surface and couldn’t find the coral. If I hadn’t known it was there I would
have missed it completely. It was just white rock and rubble. The reef was
covered in algae. And there were no fish. The most exciting thing we saw in
our sampling of the entire coastline was sea urchins. They were the only
sign of life.

That was one of the first up-close moments where the reality of what we
were doing to our planet hit me. I didn’t talk to my classmates about my
shock on that trip. I have no idea if they felt the same. I kept quiet out of
embarrassment. I had studied the theory to death. Why, then, had my
expectations of those dives been so unrealistic?
Coral reefs – which are a collection of individual corals – are some of
the most beautiful and diverse life forms on the planet. The fact that they
live in our oceans means that, like much of the planet’s marine life, only a
tiny fraction of people will see one up close. Yet they provide immense
value to communities across the world. More than 450 million people in
more than 100 countries live close to coral reefs and rely on them for their
livelihoods.20 They’re so valuable because they form the bedrock of diverse
ecosystems. Corals only cover 0.5% of the ocean floor, yet they support
almost 30% of the world’s marine fish species.

That’s why it’s so tragic that many of the world’s corals are dying. To
understand why they’re struggling, we need to understand a little bit about
what corals are and how they stay alive.

Corals are animals that belong to the phylum of cnidarians – a group of
more than 11,000 water-based animals. Most live in marine environments,
and most shallow-water corals are found in the tropics.iv They use the
calcium carbonate in ocean waters to build a hard exoskeleton. But the key
to their success is how they get their energy. Corals contain microscopic
algae called zooxanthellae that are part of a symbiotic relationship. The
algae photosynthesise for the corals, providing them with most of their
energy. They wouldn’t be able to survive without them. They can only do
this by living close to the surface where light is abundant.

Coral reefs face several threats – some natural, some from humans.

These threats – warming waters, ocean acidification, changes in ocean
chemistry and the dynamics of ecosystems – are nothing new. Corals have
experienced pressures to varying degrees throughout Earth’s history.

In the very distant past some of these pressures were extreme. Each of
the ‘Big Five’ mass extinctions (looked at in Chapter 6) involved huge
changes in the global climate and the chemistry of the world’s oceans.

These events were devastating for corals. After every one, there were no
living reefs for millions of years. Even in less extreme times, corals would
still experience stresses. They would be hit by storms and cyclones. They
would undergo bleaching events, particularly in warm El Niño years. And
they would see changes in the dynamics of their ecosystems. Corals are put
under massive strain, but they can usually recover in the years that follow.

What’s changed is that human pressures are increasing the frequency
and intensity of these events. We’re piling multiple threats on top of one
another. We’re overfishing at the same time as we’re pouring sewage and
fertilisers into coastal waters. To add insult to injury, we’re simultaneously
ramping up the thermostat.

My biggest concern for the world’s reefs is coral bleaching. Coral
bleaching happens when corals expel the algae they rely on to harvest
sunlight. This starves them of their energy source, and they can ultimately
die. They do this when they’re exposed to extreme warming. It’s called
‘bleaching’ because the corals lose most of their colour. They end up
looking like white rubble – a mere shadow of the beautiful life forms they
used to be.

In a world without humans and climate change, coral bleaching would
still happen. It often hits corals in El Niño years. El Niño is a normal
climatic cycle that happens every seven years or so, and leads to localised
warming in specific parts of the ocean. When bleaching events are spread
out, corals have time to recover. They just need some breathing space.

The problem is that, because of climate change, bleaching events are no
longer reserved for warm El Niño years. They’re happening every year,
even in the ‘cool’ La Niña phase. This means that corals have almost no
time to recover. They are also being hit with cyclones more often, or at a
higher intensity. And the pressure of overfishing and algal blooms only adds
to their distress. This is like an athlete in the gym training at a high
intensity, multiple times per day, with no sleep, hydration or food. It’s not
long before the body breaks down.

There is an abundance of evidence that coral reefs are being hit by more
frequent, and more severe, bleaching events. Satellite data allows us to
track changes in water temperatures around reefs, and the level of thermal
stress they are exposed to. The first study to do this at a global scale found
that the percentage of global reefs impacted by bleaching tripled between
1985 and 2012.21
In a more recent study, published in Science, Terry Hughes, the eminent
coral ecologist, and his colleagues tracked the frequency of coral bleaching
events across 100 pantropical locations from 1980 to 2016. This included
all of the key coral hotspots spanning 54 countries, from the West Pacific to
the Atlantic, the Indian Ocean to the Great Barrier Reef in Australasia.

They looked at the total number of bleaching events, as well as their
intensity. ‘Moderate’ bleaching events are those where less than 30% of the
corals are affected, ‘severe’ when 30% or more are. They found that there
had been an increase in the number of bleaching episodes across the 100
reefs. In the 1980s we might have expected a coral reef to be hit by a severe
bleaching event once every 27 years. By 2016, this had fallen to once every
six years.

These shorter recovery times mean it’s much more likely that a coral
reef will die off entirely. That’s the big concern as the ocean continues to
warm. We are pushing some of the world’s most diverse, complex and
beautiful ecosystems to their limits. And we continue to pile on the pressure
year after year.

The most obvious way to protect our coral reefs is to limit global climate
change. Many governments will prioritise other, cheaper, ways to promote
reef conservation. Don’t be fooled: the biggest threat to the world’s coral
reefs is a warming ocean. If countries are not reducing greenhouse gas
emissions, they are trying to pull the wool over your eyes.

The evidence is clear: to save the world’s coral reefs we need to stop
climate change.

How do we stop pillaging the oceans?
Eat less fish
The gut reaction to documentaries like Seaspiracy is to give up fish
completely. I have several friends who have made that decision. If you can
and want to stop eating fish, that’s a very legitimate choice. It lets you
bypass the dilemma of animal ethics. If you are going plant-based, it’s also
a good choice for the environment. But many don’t want to – or, in some
cases, can’t – give up fish completely. A more realistic future, at least in the
short term, is that people should just eat less of it.

This is not a blanket recommendation. In earlier chapters, when I
discussed eating less meat, I made the point that this was not suitable advice
for everyone in the world. For some, especially in poorer countries, meat is
one of the few protein- and micronutrient-rich foods available. With good
substitutes and a diverse diet, we can meet our nutritional needs. But
billions of people can’t afford a nutritionally complete diet, and need to
make the most of whatever is available.

The same is true of fish. Some communities rely on fish as an important
source of their nutrition. And they often don’t have protein-rich plant-based
substitutes lining the supermarket shelves, or omega-3 supplements in the
local pharmacy. Until these alternatives become affordable and accessible
across the world, I won’t recommend eating no or less meat or fish as a
sustainable solution for everyone. But many consumers in rich countries
could certainly eat less without noticing any difference.

Which fish should I eat?
Fish can be a climate-friendly protein source. Many of our favourite
seafood dishes have a lower carbon footprint than chicken – the most
climate-friendly kind of meat. Let’s say I’m convinced that many fish are a
climate-friendly protein source, and can avoid the ones that have a high
carbon footprint. No lobsters for me. But I don’t only care about the carbon
footprint. I’m also concerned about the impact on biodiversity – how our
food production affects other species. And, of course, its impact on fish
stocks. I want to pick a fish from a population that is not overfished. How
can I be sure?
Labelling is a good place to start, but be careful: it’s easy to be fooled. I
still remember the day I discovered the label ‘fresh’ on egg boxes did not
mean that the eggs were free-range. In fact, it often meant the opposite – it
was a ‘nice’ way of saying they came from caged chickens. Don’t fall for
the fish labels. On their own, messages like ‘all natural’, ‘sustainably
caught’, ‘sustainably harvested’, and ‘responsibly caught’ don’t tell you
much. They rarely have clear verification processes or independent
evaluations.

It’s better to look for fish with certification labels from organisations
like the Marine Stewardship Council (MSC) or the Aquaculture
Stewardship Council (ASC). These councils work with third parties to
monitor and check the sustainability of fish against a list of standards such
as the state of fish stocks, how management practices are implemented, and
impacts on other marine life. They do a reasonable job of sorting the
sustainable from the unsustainable. But even these are not perfect. Various
conservation groups have criticised them for occasionally turning a blind
eye or a lack of transparency. While most fish labelled as certified will be of
a high standard, some not-so-great stuff might fall through the cracks. That
points to one important solution: improve the traceability and certification
standards of these labels.

What can consumers do in the meantime? There are a number of seafood
guides that do a good job of giving recommendations. In the UK, the
Marine Conservation Society’s Good Fish Guide is my go-to.22 In the US,
the Monterey Bay Aquarium’s Seafood Watch is the best.23 Other countries
have their own guides. These rate specific fish populations from ‘best
choice’ to ‘avoid’, based on rigorous independent assessments. Most have
websites and apps where you can look up any type of fish you’re hungry
for, finding out where it was sourced and the method of catch. The problem
is that the consumer has to go looking for the information. You need to
know this before you step into the supermarket.

Stop overfishing by implementing strict fishing quotas
We need to know the size of a fish population, and how fast it reproduces.

Once we have the data we can work out how much we can sustainably
catch. If it reproduces slowly, we need to catch less to stay in balance. If it
reproduces very quickly then we can catch more. Bigger fish – and animals
in general – tend to take longer to grow to maturity and then reproduce.

That’s why there has been so much concern about tuna.

Once we know how much we can fish, we need to be strict about
monitoring and policing how much fishermen are catching. What makes
this difficult is that there is rarely just one boat of fishermen in each area of
the ocean. We need to work out how much we can catch in total, and find a
way of divvying up that quota for each group. It sounds difficult, but it can
be done.

One thing is clear: good management of fisheries can work. Populations
can recover, and people still get some catch. Each boat gets a strict quota;
its catch is counted when it comes back to land. Fines and penalties are
dished out for overfishing.

The use of strict fishing quotas is more common in richer countries, but
even in European countries, they can produce mixed results. When they’re
done correctly, they work. When scientists are ignored, or ambition is
lacking, they don’t. The European Union has a Common Fisheries Policy,
where it sets rules for how to sustainably manage its fish populations.

Countries agree, collectively, on how to share these responsibilities. The EU
has made a lot of progress. In 2007, when overfishing reached its peak,
78% of the region’s fish stocks were overfished.24 By 2020, just 30%
were.25
This was both a success and a failure. Clearly things are a lot better, but
in 2013 the EU agreed to end overfishing by 2020, so it missed this target
by a long way. Why? Countries set many of their fishing quotas above the
limits recommended by scientists. Some fish stocks improved a lot. Take
the example of the European plaice – a group of flatfish. In the decade from
the late 1980s to 1990s, the number of fish more than halved.26 The EU got
its act together in 2007, and the number of plaice has nearly tripled.

Meanwhile, populations of other species have gone in the opposite
direction: cod in the Baltic and Celtic seas were continually overfished.

This situation is a perfect reflection of the three-true-statements: things
are awful (30% are still overfished, and the EU missed its target); things are
much better (30% is much less than the 78% it used to be); things can be
improved. We know how to put good, sustainable policies in place. If we
can implement them across the board, an end to overfishing is well within
our reach.

Strict regulations on by-catch and discards
We’ve seen the videos and the pictures. Large industrial fishing vessels
drop a massive net and plough-like tool – called a trawl – onto the seabed
and the net scoops up everything and anything in its path – the fish they
want to catch, but also other fish, turtles, dolphins, rays and seals. They
flounder around, trying to escape, but with no success.

Next, we see the fishermen hauling their catch up into the boat. They’re
sorting through it. The tuna, salmon or cod get thrown into storage crates.

The rest gets thrown back into the water. If not dead already, most of it dies
pretty soon after. It’s painful to watch the animals struggle, but it’s also such
a waste. They are collateral damage. Even if you have no ethical dilemmas
with killing animals to eat, maiming and killing them without any useful
end seems really bad. No one wins when this happens.

The fish we catch unintentionally that get thrown back into the water are
called discards. Globally, around 10% of the animals we catch are
discarded.27, 28 It’s hard to get some perspective on whether 10% is a big or
a small number. Obviously, it could be lower. Ideally, it would be zero. But
10% is also much lower than it used to be. If we go back to the 1950s and
60s, 20% of the fish we caught were thrown back overboard. So, things
have got better. But we’re also now catching more fish. Thankfully, the total
amount is less than it used to be too. In the 1970s we were throwing around
14 million tonnes of fish away every year. We’ve since chopped that by a
third. How did we manage to reduce this number, and how can we get it as
close to zero as possible?
One reason is that the market value of fish has increased over time. In
the past, if a fisherman accidentally caught a different fish, they might think
they wouldn’t be able to sell it. Or, if they did, it wouldn’t be worth very
much. Instead, they just tossed it away. Now, fishermen are more
incentivised to bring any fish back to land because they know it will sell.

A more impressive move has been that some countries have
implemented a ban on discards at sea. This is sometimes called a ‘landing
obligation’, which means that fishermen must keep all their caught fish on
board and declare it as ‘landings’. This policy is implemented by the
European Union, and was a core part of its Common Fisheries Policy
reform in 2013. If fishermen have a quota or limit on how much fish they
can catch, they have to be much more careful about by-catch – these
unwanted fish will still count towards their quota for the day. These policies
have been very effective. If other countries can replicate them, we could
significantly reduce fish discards.

Finally, we can’t talk about discards without talking about the type of
fishing gear we use. You’re going to scoop up much more marine life with a
large mesh net than you are with a fishing rod. The large trawlers are the
worst. They scoop up everything in their path. Around one-fifth of the catch
from bottom trawlers are discarded. For particular types – such as shrimp
trawls – this can be as much as 50%.

One way to reduce these discards is to cut back or stop bottom trawling
entirely. Another way is to improve the gear we’re using. Over time, we’ve
engineered better equipment that is more selective – it only catches the fish
we want it to. Some well-managed trawl fisheries have got discard rates
down to less than 10%. We’ve done this in various ways: changing the size
and shape of the mesh and hook; adding ‘escape panels’ to trap nets; using
underwater lights and alarms.28 –30 These improvements have been really
effective. Some countries, such as Belize, are leading the way and have
banned the use of fishing gear that is not selective for specific fish.

Eliminating by-catch completely might be unrealistic. But the fact that
discards have been falling means we can still do something about it. If
every country was more like Belize, we could get pretty close to a world
free of abandoned fish.

Global fish discards have been falling
Discards are animals thrown back (alive or dead) into the sea after being caught during fishing
activities.

Marine protected areas might help a bit, but they’re no silver bullet
One of the ways that we can make sure that certain parts of our oceans are
not overexploited is to try to cut them off from human impacts entirely. On
land we have heritage sites and national parks which are strictly policed. We
have special sites of biodiversity that are closed off from disturbances.

Eight per cent of the world’s oceans are defined as ‘marine protected
areas’ (MPAs).31 These are areas of oceans – which include the water
column and sea floor – that have been reserved by law for protection. The
regulations that are in place for MPAs vary from place to place, but include
interventions such as no-fishing zones, restrictions on the type of gear that
can be used, bans or restrictions on activities such as mining, and
regulations on inputs to the ocean from rivers and industrial effluents.

As we saw in the biodiversity chapter, how effective MPAs are is not a
settled science. In a perfect world, we would ban the exploitation of a
particular part of the ocean, and that impact would disappear completely.

The reality is a bit messier. Rather than vanishing, these activities often
move to another – unprotected – part of the ocean. The total impact on our
oceans is no different. In fact, in some cases it can be worse, if we move it
somewhere with even poorer regulations or richer sites of biodiversity.

Simply increasing the amount of our ocean that is protected is no silver
bullet. It all depends on how well we manage our MPAs, and if the rules are
actually enforced. MPAs with weak restrictions and enforcement will make
little difference to the health of our oceans.32 In fact, labelling an area as
‘protected’ without implementing it properly might even be worse – the
illusion could make us complacent.

Despite the controversy about their effectiveness, the world has set bold
targets to scale up the amount of ocean that our MPAs cover. We’ve already
missed our first target of protecting 10% of the oceans by 2020 – in 2021,
just 8% were protected. The next target to aim for is 30% by 2037, then half
of the world’s ocean by 2044. If we’re to stand a chance of meeting these
targets we need to get a move on.

Marine protected areas are just one spanner in our toolbox. Scale them
up without the other solutions in this chapter and our grand targets won’t
help our oceans. They’ll just make the water murky so we don’t see the
damage.

Things to stress less about
The carbon footprint of fish: fish can be an environmentally friendly source
of protein – if we pick the right stuff
You don’t need to lose sleep over the climate impact of most fish. Pick the
right stuff, and we can eat fish and still have a pretty low-carbon footprint.

Producing fish does emit greenhouse gases – though not directly, like
with burping cows. When it comes to wild fish, we burn fuel in boats to
catch them; they need to be frozen or refrigerated to keep them fresh; we
transport and package them. For aquaculture, there is a climate cost to
producing the food we feed to fish, just like there is a climate cost to raising
chickens, pigs or cows in the same way.

As seen in Chapter 5, things like transport and packaging tend to have
small emissions. One large meta-analysis, published in Nature, looked at
the environmental impact of fish from thousands of fish farms and wild
fisheries.33 They found that most of the popular fish we eat – tuna, salmon,
cod, trout, herring – were the most climate-friendly types of meat. Fish are
not quite as good as plant-based protein sources, but they can still be a
fairly low-carbon choice. Most fish perform well on other environmental
metrics too. They’re nearly all better than chicken.

Be careful, though. There are a few delicacies where you could be hit
with a high footprint, as well as a hefty price tag. Seafood such as flounder
and lobster can have a very high footprint. If you want to eat seafood
sustainably, I would avoid them. Good choices would be farmed bivalves –
clams, oysters, cockles, mussels, scallops – and small wild fish such as
herrings and sardines.

Many fish species can be a low-carbon source of protein
Greenhouse gas emissions per kilogram. Chicken is the meat product with the lowest carbon
footprint. Many fish species have an even lower footprint.

Farmed fish, a solution that seems icky
Just when the world’s wild fish stocks were hurtling towards oblivion, fish
farming stepped in. Since the late 1980s, nearly all of the increase in fish
production has come from aquaculture.

Yet many of us still feel a bit unsettled about eating farmed fish. Perhaps
it comes back to the feeling that ‘natural’ is best. Eating wild-caught fish
seems much more instinctual than fish from an environment that has been
constructed by humans. But if the world wants to keep eating as much fish
as we do (or more), consumers need to get comfortable with it.

People worry about the amount of wild fish used as fish feed. Why use
fish as feed in the first place? Well, it gives farmed fish the nutrition they
would normally get in the open ocean, where larger carnivorous fish
typically feed on smaller fish, and they get a high-quality source of protein
and amino acids, plus essential omega-3 fatty acids.

Aquaculture production has decoupled from the use of wild fish for feed
In the past, a lot of wild fish was used as feed for fish farming. A move to plant-based feeds and more
efficient production means aquaculture production has increased a lot, while wild fish use has fallen.

The world is already moving away from wild fish feeds, thanks to
increased efficiency in aquaculture, plus a move towards plant-based feeds
that can provide all the nutrition that fishmeal and oils do. We can, for
example, create more concentrated feeds from algae. Humans have, again,
managed to solve this problem by engineering what would normally happen
in the wild. A future where we can farm fish without any wild fish is a very
real possibility. So, as a consumer, I wouldn’t stress. As an innovator,
policymaker or funder, you could help us get there even faster.

Footnotes
i The moratorium only applies to commercial whaling, so whaling classified for scientific research
purposes and aboriginal-subsistence provisions is still allowed.

ii When we look at the percentage of fish catch that is managed sustainably, the number is more than
80%. This is because some fish stocks – fish populations in particular locations – are bigger than
others. Rather than calculating the percentage of stocks that are managed sustainably, we can weigh
this by the quantity of fish we catch. By this measure, 83% of catch came from sustainable sources.

iii There have been some claims that the populations of all tuna species fell by 90%. These claims
have been proven to be incorrect. In this case, the 90% fall is for the southern bluefin tuna, but not all
tuna stocks across the Atlantic and Pacific.

iv There are two main types of corals: shallow, warm-water corals; and cold, deep-water corals. The
obvious difference between the two is that warm-water corals live close to the sea surface – usually
in coastal waters – whereas cold-water reefs can extend to depths of 3,000 metres below the surface.

Here we’re focusing on warm-water corals.

Conclusion
Sustainability is humanity’s North Star. Make sure current generations have
opportunities for a good life, shrink our environmental impact so that future
generations have the same (or better) opportunities, and let wildlife flourish
alongside us. That’s the dream. And I hope I’ve shown over the course of
the book why it’s one I believe we can achieve in our lifetimes.

No generation has done this before. As seen in Chapter 1,
‘sustainability’ has two halves. Our ancestors were never sustainable
because they never achieved the first half – meeting the needs of the current
generation. Half of all children died, preventable disease was common and
nutrition was often poor.

Over the last century the world has made unprecedented progress in
improving living standards across the world. In some places progress has
been slower, but every country has improved in health, education, nutrition
and other important indicators of well-being. Of course, we’re not done.

The world is still terrible in many ways: children and mothers die from
preventable diseases, nearly one in ten go hungry, and not every child gets
the opportunity to go to school. We’ve got serious work to do. But many of
the solutions are at our fingertips – we know what to do, and many
countries have done it already. It’s possible to achieve this everywhere over
the next few decades if we commit to it.

This book has focused on the second half: making sure we leave the
environment in a much better state than we found it. We’ve travelled
through seven big problems, looking at where we are, how we got here, and
what we need to do next. For every one of them, we’re either at the turning
point to a lower impact, or have already passed it.

Air pollution kills millions of people every year, but it doesn’t have to
be this way. We know how to get levels of air pollution very low. I am
breathing the UK’s cleanest air for centuries, if not millennia. The solution
is simple: stop burning stuff. Make sure that people have access to
electricity for cooking and heating, stop burning crops and fossil fuels,
regulate industrial plants, and focus on clean public transport networks.

These changes can be fast: China nearly halved its air pollution in just
seven years. Other countries might not be as fast, but a dramatic reduction
in air pollution is achievable in the next few decades. This will only get
easier as clean energy gets cheaper; poorer countries can skip straight to the
good stuff without burning fossil fuels along the way.

Leapfrogging a long fossil-fuel-powered development path will also be
essential if we’re to tackle climate change. Rich countries built their wealth
on economies run on fossil fuels. It brought countless benefits to human
well-being. But it obviously came at a climate cost. Moving forward, we
need to make sure that everyone can move through this pathway to
prosperity, but on a low-carbon energy source. This option was never there
for our ancestors. It was wood, fossil fuels or nothing. That’s not the case
today. The price of renewable energy has plummeted, and the same goes for
batteries and electric vehicles. Soon the low-carbon pathway will be the
cheap one. There used to be a trade-off: burn fossil fuels or stay poor. We’ll
be the first generations that don’t have to face this dilemma. Things are
already changing and will seem unrecognisable by the middle of the
century.

The trade-off for energy was also true for forests. First, for firewood and
building materials, then to clear land for agriculture. You either cut down
the forest or run out of land to grow food. Crop yields have increased
three-, four-, five-fold in the last century, breaking this deadlock. We can
grow more food without using more land. Global deforestation peaked in
the 1980s, has now also peaked in our most precious forests such as the
Amazon, and many emerging economies have committed to ending
deforestation by 2030. In the next few decades, deforestation will hit zero if
we continue to invest in productive crops and make better decisions on
what food to eat. We’ve lost one-third of the world’s forest over the last
10,000 years. This loss is slowing and can be stopped, and then we’ll see
more of the world’s forgotten forests return.

We won’t solve climate change, stop deforestation or protect
biodiversity without changes to how we eat. Hunger rates have fallen
quickly over the last 50 years, but one in 10 people still don’t get enough
food to eat. It’s not because we can’t grow enough food. It’s because we
feed it to livestock, put it into cars, or in the bin where it gets wasted. That’s
good news: it means the power to reshape the food system is in our hands.

Technologies are changing the way we make food. We can produce
products just like meat, without the environmental impact or the animal
slaughter. That would save an incredible amount of resources and help
alleviate global malnutrition at the same time. We just need to make these
products nutritious, tasty and cheap enough for the global stage. In 50 years,
we won’t be using half of the world’s land to grow food, or raising and
slaughtering billions of animals every year to feed ourselves. Everyone in
the world can be well fed on a planet that isn’t eating itself alive.

Humans have always been at war with other life on the planet. We were
either hunting them or fighting them for space. What’s changed is that
wildlife now faces a diverse list of threats: not just hunting but also climate
change, deforestation, nutrient pollution from farming, competition with
livestock, plastics, ocean acidification and overfishing. It really is ‘death by
a thousand cuts’. Tackling biodiversity loss on its own might seem
impossible, but we won’t tackle it in isolation; we’ll get most of the way
there by fixing the other problems. Do this in the next few decades and
we’ll see a great wildlife turnaround. Thousands of years of humans versus
other species will end, and both will be able to flourish at the same time.

Plastic pollution is the most tractable problem in this book. That is,
stopping plastic leaking into the environment and 1 million tonnes flowing
into the ocean every year. Invest in waste-management systems and we
could stop this. The biggest barrier is money. Most of the world’s plastic
pollution now comes from low- and middle-income countries. Rich
countries have a responsibility as manufacturers and trade partners to help
other countries make landfills and recycling centres a priority. Work
together, and plastic pollution will be solved in the next few decades. If it
was higher on the agenda, it’s one problem we could solve in just a fraction
of that time.

Our final problem is overfishing. Overfishing is almost inevitable in seas
with many fishermen and no way to monitor the health of fish populations
below the surface. Knowing how many fish there are, and how this is
changing, is essential to knowing how much we can sustainably catch. We
weren’t fishing beyond our means when our societies were small, but we’ve
become experts in plundering the oceans. However, we are getting a grip on
the problem: rates of overfishing have slowed, fish farms allow us to
produce more fish with less pressure, and in some regions our iconic
species of fish are making a recovery. It only took a decade or two for these
species to stage their comeback. We can do it at this pace – or faster –
everywhere.

The problems we’re facing are tightly interconnected. The worry is that this
gives us impossible trade-offs; we’ll be forced to prioritise one problem at
the expense of another. But it isn’t the case; instead, these
interdependencies mean we can solve a lot in one go. Move to renewable or
nuclear energy to improve air pollution and climate change; eat less beef to
improve climate, deforestation, land use, biodiversity and water pollution.

Improve crop yields to benefit the climate and humans.

The other commonality between our environmental problems is that
their historical arc is the same. We’ve told ourselves that all of our
environmental problems are recent. We believe they’ve been created in the
last few decades through an exploding population and greed. In reality,
nearly all of them have a long history. Humanity’s environmental impacts
date back hundreds of thousands of years. This damage was not deliberate –
our ancestors often had no other option. But their actions had consequences
for the environment and the species we shared it with.

What these problems also have in common is that progress is happening,
and it’s happening quickly. Not as fast as we would like, but, nevertheless,
attitudes, investments and attention have shifted dramatically. Sustainable
solutions are becoming the cheapest option. People are demanding action
from political leaders, who can no longer ignore these calls.

There is a real opportunity to solve all of these problems in the next 50
years. All going well, that should be in my lifetime. I’ll be old but still
pushing for change, right to the finish line.

Three things to bear in mind
(1) Being an effective environmentalist might make you feel like a ‘bad’
one
Some of the ‘solutions’ in this book might have made you uncomfortable.

They don’t sit quite right. For years I’ve battled with this personal dilemma:
being an effective environmentalist has often made me feel like a fraud. My
take on ‘cooking’ looks like an environmental disaster. I always use the
microwave. I try to cook as quickly as possible. It nearly always comes
from a packet. My avocados are shipped over from Mexico, and my
bananas are from Angola. My food is rarely produced locally. If it is, I don’t
check the label enough to notice.

Ask people what a ‘sustainable meal’ looks like, and they’d describe the
opposite of my eating habits. An ‘environmentally friendly meal’ is one
that’s sourced from the local market, produced on an organic farm without
nasty chemicals, and brought home in a paper bag, not a plastic wrapper.

Forget the processed junk: it’s meat and vegetables, as fresh as they come.

We should set aside time to cook them properly, in the oven.

But I know that my way of eating is low-carbon. Microwaves are the
most efficient way to cook, local food is often no better than food shipped
from continents away, organic food often has a higher carbon footprint, and
packaging is a tiny fraction of a food’s environmental footprint while often
lengthening its shelf life.

But it still feels wrong. I know I’m making effective choices for the
environment, but there’s still a part of me that feels like a traitor. I can see
the confusion on people’s faces when they hear about some of my
decisions. I worry that they might think I’m a ‘bad’ environmentalist.

This probably comes back to the good old ‘natural fallacy’: things that
seem more grounded in ‘natural’ properties must be better for us, where
natural equals good, and unnatural equals bad. We’re sceptical of synthetic
stuff that comes out of a factory. It’s easy to mock this ‘natural is best’ type
of thinking. In the past I’d brand it as ‘unscientific’ because it is
unscientific. But ridicule has never been an effective way to drive change,
and it’d make me a hypocrite because I haven’t totally rid myself of these
feelings either. I still get the instinctual pull towards ‘natural’ solutions.

Working against it takes repeated, and sometimes uncomfortable, effort.

Yet it’s something that we need to overcome. The fact that our intuitions
are so ‘off’ is a problem. At a time when the world needs to eat less meat,
we’ve seen a pushback against meat-substitute products because they’re
‘processed’. When we need to be using less land for agriculture we’ve seen
a recent resurgence in organic, but more land-hungry, farming. When more
of us need to be living in dense cities I hear more people dreaming of a
romantic life in the countryside with a self-sufficient garden plot.

If what we need to do is at odds with what feels right, then that’s a
problem. That means that the societal image of sustainability needs to
change. Lab-grown meat, dense cities and nuclear energy need a rebrand.

These need to be some of the new emblems of a sustainable path forward. I
hope this book can play a small role in changing that narrative. It’s only
then – when the image of ‘environmentally friendly’ behaviours line up
with the effective ones – that being a good environmentalist might stop
feeling so bad.

(2) Systemic change is the key
The reality is that we will not fix our environmental problems through
individual behaviour change alone. This became obvious during the
coronavirus pandemic. The world spent most of 2020 at home, at a huge
cost to the quality of life for millions of people. Our lives were stripped
back to the bare minimum. There were hardly any cars on the roads or
planes in the sky. Shopping malls and entertainment venues were shut.

Economies across the world tanked. There was a dramatic and almostuniversal change in how all of us lived. What happened to global CO2
emissions? They fell by around 5%.

That’s a hard pill to swallow. We want to believe in ‘people power’ –
that if we all just pull together and act a bit more responsibly then we’ll get
there. Unfortunately, to make real and lasting progress we need large-scale
systemic and technological change. We need to change political and
economic incentives.

That doesn’t mean we can’t contribute as individuals. As we’ve seen
throughout this book, there are some key and specific behaviours that can
make a difference. But there are three really big things we can do that
underpin it all. These are things that provide the vital shove for systemic
change.

The first is to get involved in political action and vote for leaders who
support sustainable actions. One positive policy change can almost
immediately trump the individual efforts of millions of people. In the
1970s, President Nixon set up the now pivotal Environmental Protection
Agency, and signed the Clean Air Act and the Clean Water Act to clean up
the US’s polluted air and rivers. These policies have transformed the natural
environment and saved many lives from toxic pollution. Incremental
behaviour changes across the population would never have achieved the
same – at least not as quickly.

We need to make sure environmental action has a seat at the table in
government. Leaders need to know the public cares. Nixon has gone down
as one of the ‘greenest’ leaders in history, but in fact he was quite apathetic
about the environment.1
It wasn’t a priority for him, personally. He had to
pretend to care because the public did. If politicians don’t match their
priorities with the public, they won’t get elected.

The second thing we can do is vote with our wallets. Every time we buy
something we’re sending a clear signal to the market – and those who bring
products to the shelves – that this is what we care about. Every time we buy
an electric vehicle, a solar grid connection or a plant-based burger, we’re
telling innovators across the world that there is demand, shouting ‘We’re
over here, come and serve us’.

These products are all new technologies, and most technologies cost
more when they first start out. They follow a learning curve, where the
more we produce the more we learn about how to do it efficiently. The price
starts to fall the more we buy. Richer consumers can play a key role in
being the early adopters that pull the price down. This might, initially, be at
a personal cost to them. But the point is that they can act as the early
signallers to show that there is a growing market for these goods.

Innovators – sensing an opportunity – start to move in like vultures. This
competition pushes the whole market forward. Before we know it, we have
amazing products battling it out for the lowest prices. In the 1990s, an
electric car battery would have cost as much as $1 million. Now it costs just
$5,000 to $12,000, and the market is flooded with competition to produce
the cheapest.

Another way to use your money well is to donate it to effective causes.

This isn’t something that everyone can afford to do. But those who can
could have a positive impact that extends far beyond themselves. A few
years ago, I took the ‘Giving what we can’ pledge, where I committed to
donating at least 10% of my income each year to effective causes. Where
we donate our money matters just as much as how much we give, if not
more. A dollar can go hundreds, thousands, even millions of times further
for some causes compared to others. We can give to environmentally
focused charities, but charities focused on other areas such as health,
education or poverty alleviation also help on our path to sustainability.

i
Remember, sustainability is about achieving a good standard of living for
everyone alive today, as well as those that come after us. One of the biggest
tragedies of our environmental damage is that it is the poorest in the world
that are most vulnerable to its impacts. Pulling people out of poverty has to
be central to our goal. If you’re looking for evidence-based
recommendations on where your donations can do the most good, the
charity evaluator GiveWell is my most trusted reference.2
The final thing you can do is to think about how you spend your time.

The problems in this book won’t solve themselves. It will take the creative,
determined effort of people spanning a range of roles. We’ll need
innovators and entrepreneurs to create new technologies and improve our
current ones. We’ll need funders to give them the money to do so. We’ll
need policymakers that support environmental action and make good
decisions on what to do about it.

The average person will spend around 80,000 hours at work throughout
their lifetime.ii Pick a great career where you can really make a difference
and your impact could be thousands, or millions, of times greater than your
individual efforts to reduce your carbon footprint.

(3) Stick with others pulling in the same direction
To make the solutions in this book a reality, we need to work with those
who also want to move us forward.

Step into any environmental space and you will find a range of opinions
on how we should proceed. Nuclear or renewables. Cycling or electric
vehicles. Strict vegan or flexitarian. What’s odd and counterproductive is
that people assume that solutions need to be all or nothing. One against the
other. You must pick a ‘team’, and you must berate the other side. But this
isn’t going to move us forward. As far as I’m concerned, most of us are on
the same team.

That’s how all of us should see ourselves as we try to build solutions. I
can’t claim credit for the following analogy, but I think it captures this
tension brilliantly.

iii Imagine you are an arrow, and you’re pushing in the
direction of where you think we should be headed. Let’s say you’re really
supportive of nuclear energy. Others around you are equally passionate
about building low-carbon energy infrastructure, but they hate nuclear and
love renewables. Their arrow is pushing at a slightly different angle to you
– maybe 10 degrees off to your left or right. But the most important point is
that both you and the other arrow are pushing pretty much in the same
direction: both want to build low-carbon energy as fast as possible. You are
teammates, whether you see it or not.

The problem is that we spend most of our time fighting with the arrows
closest to us. We squabble over nuclear versus solar energy, or solar versus
wind. We argue over whether people should be eating processed soy-based
burgers or lentils. We fight about whether we should focus on reducing
emissions from food or from energy. The point is that, at the most basic
level, all the people in these fights are trying to push in the same direction.

While we fight among ourselves, the arrows pointing in the opposite
direction pull against us. The fossil fuel companies, the meat lobbies and
those that oppose environmental action get a free ride. To counteract our
weight, they don’t have to do that much at all. We’re too distracted fighting
internally to put up any resistance to the real opponents to progress. A good
principle, then, is to be wary of attacking others that we’re broadly aligned
with. That doesn’t mean we can’t debate their ideas – we absolutely need
this critique to make sure we’re picking effective solutions – but we should
be constructive and generous in these discussions.

The arrows pointing in the same direction as me are those that are
focused on building solutions that move us forward. Doomsayers are not
interested in solutions. They have already given up. They often try to stand
in the way of them. At best, they are just counterweight to progress. At
worst, they’re actively pulling the other way; just as damaging as deniers.

Stick with others pushing in the same direction
We might have slightly different opinions on how we solve our environmental problems, but we are
on the same team.

Time to become the First Generation
If you are living today, you are in a truly unique position to achieve
something that was unthinkable for our ancestors: to deliver a sustainable
future. I believe that we can be the generation that meets the needs of
everyone while leaving the environment in a better state than we found it.

What makes us different from our ancestors is that economic and
technological changes mean we have options. We’re not stuck with the
default of whale oil, coal or cutting down trees. We’ve developed
alternatives that allow us to do the same thing in a much better way. That
optionality comes with responsibility. We can make responsible choices that
move us forward. But we can also stick with the status quo. A sustainable
future is not guaranteed – if we want it, we need to create it. Being the first
generation is an opportunity, but it’s not inevitable.

What makes me most optimistic is the number of people I meet who are
all pushing for this. Surround yourself with those people. Be inspired by
them. Ignore those who say that we are doomed. We are not doomed. We
can build a better future for everyone. Let’s turn that opportunity into
reality.

Footnotes
i I mostly give my monthly donations to global health and poverty alleviation charities. I have given
the most to the Against Malaria Foundation, and also support nutritional supplements for children in
low-income countries. These two causes are some of the most cost-effective in improving and saving
lives.

ii There is a great organisation, founded by the philosopher Will MacAskill, called ‘80,000 hours’ for
this reason. The charity gives evidence-based advice on how people can create the largest positive
impact by picking a career where they can contribute.

iii Credit to Andrew Dressler and Ken Caldeira, who I heard this metaphor from.

Acknowledgments
None of us can build a sustainable world alone. And this book would not
exist as a solo venture. My name is on the cover but I should take just a
fraction of the credit.

To my agent, Toby Mundy, at Aevitas Creative Management: thank you
for planting the idea to write a book, and for helping me navigate the
literary world.

I cannot express enough thanks to the amazing team at Chatto & Windus
at Penguin Random House. To my editor, Becky Hardie: thank you for
taking a gamble on this first-time author, and being as passionate about this
book as I am. I couldn’t have asked for more. To Chatto’s editorial assistant,
Asia Choudhry, for her invaluable feedback and support. Katherine Fry,
who copy-edited this book with the finest detail and precision. Rhiannon
Roy for guiding me through the process. Carmella Lowkis, and Anna
Redman Aylward, for getting this into the hands of readers. And the long
list of people that work tirelessly in the background: selling rights,
designing covers, marketing and promoting. You all deserve a spot on the
cover. This book wouldn’t be what it is without you – and neither would
this writer. A massive thanks also to my US editor, Marisa Vigilante, and
the team at Little, Brown Spark. I appreciate you all.

This book has been at least six years in the making. Much of the
research and data that underpins it has come from my time as a researcher
at Our World in Data. I started working there in 2017, after sending an
unsolicited email to volunteer my time. To Max Roser and Esteban OrtizOspina: thank you for not ignoring my email and giving me a shot. You’re
not only incredible mentors to me, but amazing friends too. I love you both,
and I’m proud of what we’ve built together. Thank you to the Oxford
Martin School for giving this misfit academic a home. Thank you to my
colleagues at Our World in Data: it’s special to be surrounded by people so
determined to make the world a better place. A special thanks to Fiona
Spooner for reading early chapter drafts and giving feedback. And Edouard
Mathieu for being one of the most supportive people I know: there are few
humans in the world I’d rather work with.

This book is about our investments in the future. I’ve been lucky to have
had incredible mentors that have invested and believed in me. To Dave
Reay and Pete Higgins: I owe you more than you know. I can only hope to
navigate life with half the integrity you do. To Hans and Ola Rosling, and
Anna Rosling Rönnlund for turning my world upside down (in the best
way) and changing a helpless pessimist into an impatient optimist. To Liz
Grant and Kate Storey for their continued support. And a long list of others
that have cheered me on along the way: Saloni Dattani, Sam Bowman, Ben
Southwood, and Nick Whitaker at Works in Progress; Will MacAskill,
Gavin Weinberg, and Abie Rohrig for their efforts in trying to make this a
success.

I’ve been fortunate to have some of the world’s top experts to reach out
to. Thanks to Joseph Poore, Boyan Slat, Matthias Egger, Laurent Lebreton,
Ray Hilborn, Michael Melnychuk, Max Mossler and Dave Reay for reading
and giving feedback on earlier chapter drafts in this book. Any factual
errors are on me, alone.

We all need friends that love us, whether our book turns out to be a flop
or not. A special thanks to Sarah Cannon and Matt Harwood for the endless
laughs and pick-me-ups. Emma Storey-Gordon for the relentless push to
keep striving. Michael Hughes for helping me fly (or fall). And here are just
a handful of others that I’ve leaned on over the last few years: Meredith
Corey, Shivam Hargunani, Thomas Alexander, Shona Denovan, Andy
Hamilton, Erin Miller, Eve Smith, Jenny Dybeck, Yanni Smith, Lyndsey
Vipond, Isla, Allison and Hamish. Thanks to David, Gillian and Andrew
Kerr for all of their support.

I would be nothing without my loving family. To Andrea, Tommy and
Kieran who have been the second set of parents and brother I didn’t need,
but wanted. You mean the world to me. My grandparents, who have kept
and cherished all of the ‘books’ I wrote for them as a kid. My gran is
convinced she’ll make a fortune with them if this becomes a bestseller. To
Aaron, who taught me how to have a thick skin on the football pitch so I
could have one on Twitter. I’m so proud to call you my brother. And
Megan, one of the kindest people I know. I hope we build a better world for
the little one on her way.

The biggest thanks go to my parents, Karen and David, to whom this
book is dedicated. Our hearts drive us to act, but we need our minds to
know what to do. My parents are the perfect blend of heart and mind: the
kindest and most intelligent pair I know. I hope what they’ve taught me
comes through on these pages. Thank you for the unconditional love, letting
me read my books in the corner of the party, and being the parents that
every child deserves.

Finally to Catherine, my favourite person. You make me a better person,
and this world a better place. Thank you for putting up with my 4 a.m. starts
and weekend writing marathons. I couldn’t hope for a better person by my
side, and I hope that you know the support is mutual. This book is just one
small chapter of my life, and there’s no one else I’d rather write the rest of
the story with.

